<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881107-0026 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-07-88.f2.A1025</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 215 / Monday, November 7, 1988/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 14, 100, 103, 104, 105, 106, 109, 110, 115 and 121</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-88-1425; FR-2565]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Fair Housing; Implementation of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of1988</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 prohibitsdiscrimination in the sale, rental, or financing of dwellings based onrace, color, religion, sex, or national origin. The Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988, which was enacted September 13, 1988 and will become effectiveon March 12, 1989, expands the coverage of Title VIII to prohibit discriminatoryhousing practices based on handicap and familial status, establishes anadministrative enforcement mechanism for cases where discriminatory housingpractices cannot be resolved informally, and provides for monetary penaltiesin cases where housing discrimination is found.The Fair Housing Amendments Act also created design and construction requirementsfor certain new multifamily dwellings for first occupancy on or after March13, 1991 (30 months after the enactment date of the law) and establishesan exemption from the prohibitions against discrimination on the basisof familial status for housing for older persons.   In addition, the Fair Housing Amendments Act authorizes the Secretary ofHousing and Urban Development to issue regulations to carry out the Act.Section 13 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act states that ``[I]n consultationwith other appropriate Federal agencies, the Secretary shall, not laterthan 180th day after the date of enactment of this Act, issue rules toimplement Title VIII as amended by this Act.''   This proposed rule is intended to implement the responsibility of the Secretaryof Housing and Urban Development to publish rules required in the FairHousing Amendments Act. Several rulemaking actions are proposed:<ITAG tagnum="4">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The regulatory material previously contained in Part 100 is proposedto be redesignated, as revised, as a new Part 121. A new Part 100 is proposedto be added, describing the nature of conduct made unlawful with respectto the sale, rental or financing of dwellings or in the provision of servicesand facilities in connection therewith.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">   </ITAG>The Department further is proposing to add a new Part 103 establishingprocedures relating to the investigation of complaints of discriminatoryhousing practices made unlawful under Title VIII of the Civil Rights Actof 1968 as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act (hereinafter referredto as the Fair Housing Act) and a new Part 104 establishing proceduresfor the conduct of formal administrative enforcement proceedings involvingdiscriminatory housing practices.   As part of this rulemaking the Department is also proposing to revise otherexisting regulations issued under Title VIII to reflect the expanded coverageof the Fair Housing Act. Specifically, the Department is proposing technicalrevisions to the Fair Housing Poster regulation (24 CFR Part 110), andthe Fair Housing Advertising regulation (24 CFR Part 109) as well as itsFair Housing Administrative Meetings under Title VIII of the Civil RightsAct of 1968 regulation (24 CFR Part 106). Revisions to the regulationsproviding for the recognition of state and local fair housing laws as providingrights and remedies which are substantially equivalent to those in TitleVIII (24 CFR Part 115) are also being proposed. In addition, the Departmentis proposing to redesignate and revise the existing Racial, Sex, and EthnicData regulation (24 CFR Part 100) as a new Part 121.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be received by December 7, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Interested persons are invited to submit comments onthe Proposed Rule to the Office of the General Counsel, Rules Docket Clerk,Room 10276, Department of Housing and Urban Development, Washington, DC20410-0500. Comments should refer to the above docket number and title.A copy of each communication submitted will be available for public inspectionand copying during regular business hours at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>For Part 100, Subparts D and E,David Enzel ((202) 755-6207); for Parts 103 and 104, Karen Osterloh ((202)755-7084); for all other parts, Charles Farbstein ((202) 755-5570), Officeof the General Counsel, Department of Housing and Urban Development, 451Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC, 20410-0500. (The above listed numbersare not toll-free numbers.) The toll-free TDD number is 1-800-543-8294.This proposed rule will be available on tape and in braille for personswith vision impairments in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk, Room 10276,at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The information collection requirementscontained in this rule have been submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980.No person may be subjected to a penalty for failure to comply with theseinformation collection requirements until they have been approved and assignedan OMB control number. The OMB control number, when assigned, will be announcedby separate notice in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>Public reporting burden for the collection ofinformation requirements contained in this rule are estimated to includethe time for reviewing the instructions, searching existing data sources,gathering and maintaining the data needed, and competing and reviewingthe collection of information. Information on the estimated public reportingburden is provided under the Preamble heading, <T3>Other Matters. </T3>Send comments regarding this burden estimate orany other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development, Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Room 10276, Washington,DC 20410; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503..Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3601-3619) made itunlawful to discriminate in any aspect relating to the sale, rental orfinancing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilitiesin connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color,religion, sex, or national origin. Under the provisions of Title VIII,persons who believed that they had been subjected to, or were about tobe subjected to a discriminatory housing practice could file a complaintwith the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development. Title VIII requiredthe Department of Housing and Urban Development to investigate each complaintand, where the Department determined to resolve the matters raised in acomplaint, to engage in informal efforts to conciliate the issues in thecomplaint.However, where these informal efforts to conciliate a case were unsuccessful,Title VIII did not provide the Secretary with any administrative mechanismfor redressing acts of discrimination against an individual. In addition,while the Secretary could refer a case involving a pattern or practiceof discrimination to the Attorney General for the initiation of a civilaction, Federal courts did not award individual relief to the victims ofdiscrimination in such cases.  The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-430, approved September13, 1988) was enacted to strengthen the administrative enforcement provisionsof Title VIII, to add prohibitions against discrimination in housing onthe basis of handicap and familial status, and to provide for the awardof monetary damages where discriminatory housing practices are found. Theamended law will become effective on March 12, 1989.  The provisions in the Fair Housing Act describing the nature of conductwhich constitutes a discriminatory housing practice have been revised toextend the protections of the Fair Housing Act to persons with handicapsand families with children. In this respect sections 804, 805, and 806of the Fair Housing Act prohibit discrimination in any aspect relatingto the sale or rental of dwellings, in the availability of residentialreal estate-related transactions or in the provision of services and facilitiesin connection therewith because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.  In addition to prohibiting discrimination against persons with handicaps,the Fair Housing Act makes it unlawful to refuse to permit, at the expenseof the handicapped person, reasonable modifications of existing premisesoccupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications are necessaryto afford such person full enjoyment of the premises (section 804(f)(3)(A)).With respect to rental housing, the Fair Housing Act provides that a landlordmay, where reasonable, condition permission for a modification on the renter'sagreeing, on vacating the unit, to restore the interior or the premisesto the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wearand tear excepted. The Act also makes it unlawful to refuse to make reasonableaccommodations in rules, policies, practices, or services to afford a handicappedperson equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling.  Further, the Fair Housing Act makes it unlawful to design and constructcertain multifamily dwellings, for first occupancy after March 13, 1991,in a manner that makes them inaccessible to persons with handicaps. Allpremises within such dwelling also are specifically required to containseveral features of adaptive design so that dwellings are readily accessibleto and usable by persons with handicaps.  With respect to familial status the Fair Housing Act provides an exemptionfrom the prohibitions against discrimination because of familial statusfor housing for older persons.  Section 805 of the Fair Housing Act as revised prohibits discriminationrelated to ``residential real estate-related transactions'' rather thanmerely referring to ``financing''. In addition, the definition of the termresidential real estate-related transaction specifically indicates thatthe Fair Housing Act applies to the selling, brokering and appraising ofdwellings and secondary mortgage market activities with respect to securitiesaffected or supported by dwellings as well as the making and purchasingof loans and other financial assistance for dwellings. The Act, however,does not prohibit a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisalsfrom taking into consideration factors other than race, color, religion,national origin, sex, handicap, or familial status.  Section 810 of the Fair Housing Act provides that any person who believesthat he or she has been, or will be, subjected to a discriminatory housingpractice because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin may file a complaint with the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development. This section also authorizes the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to file complaints on the Secretary's own initiativeand to investigate housing practices in order to determine whether a complaintshould be filed. Complaints must be filed not later than one year afteran alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated.Upon the filing of a complaint the Secretary is required to notify anyrespondent named in the complaint of the acceptance of the complaint andthe discriminatory housing practices alleged in the complaint. The respondentmay file not later than 10 days after receipt of the notice of a complaint,an answer to the complaint. The Secretary is required to make an investigationof the alleged discriminatory housing practice and to complete the investigationwithin 100 days after the filing of the complaint, unless it is impracticableto do so.  At the end of each investigation the Secretary is required to prepare afinal investigation report. Under section 810(d) the final investigationreport will be available to an aggrieved person or a respondent, upon request,at any time after the investigation is complete.Section 810(b) of the Act directs the Secretary, to the extent feasible,to engage in efforts to conciliate the matters raised in the complaintat any time after the filing of the complaint. Section 810(e) of the Act empowers the Secretary to authorize the AttorneyGeneral to file a civil action seeking appropriate preliminary or temporaryrelief pending final disposition of a complaint if, at any time after thefiling of such complaint, the Secretary concludes that such action is necessaryto carry out the purposes of the Act. Whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice within aState or locality which has a Fair Housing law or ordinance which has beencertified by the Secretary as being substantially equivalent to the FairHousing Act, the Secretary must refer the complaint to the agency administeringsuch law or ordinance before taking any action with respect to the complaint.Except with the consent of a certified agency, or in other limited situationssuch as where a complaint is not being processed in a timely fashion orthe State or local law or ordinance is found to no longer be substantiallyequivalent, the Secretary may not take any further action with respectto complaints referred to such agencies. Section 810(f) of the Act permits the Secretary to certify an agency onlywhere the Secretary determines the rights protected by the agency, theprocedures followed by the agency, the remedies available to the agency,and the availability of judicial review of the agency's actions are substantiallyequivalent to those created in the Fair Housing Act. This section also provides that agencies which the Secretary has determinedadminister State and local fair housing laws which provided rights andremedies for discriminatory housing practices that were substantially equivalentto those contained in Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 or whichhad been recognized for interim referral of complaints under Title VIIIwould be considered certified for a period not to exceed 48 months forthe purpose of referring complaints under the Fair Housing Act with respectto matters for which they had been certified on the day before the dateof enactment of the Fair Housing Act (<T3>i.e., </T3>September 12, 1988). Section 810(g) of the Act requires the Secretary, in cases where the mattersraised in a complaint cannot be resolved by conciliation, to determine,based upon the facts, whether reasonable cause exists to believe a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur. Such a finding mustbe made by the Secretary within 100 days after the filing of a complaintor within 100 days after the Secretary has commenced action on a complaintwhich had been referred to a certified agency, unless it is impracticableto do so. Where the Secretary makes a determination that reasonable causeexists the Secretary immediately issues a charge on behalf of the aggrievedperson commencing a formal administrative proceeding before an administrativelaw judge. Section 812(a) of the Act provides a complainant, an aggrieved person,and the respondent with an opportunity to elect not to proceed before anadministrative law judge but to move the case to an appropriate Federaldistrict court. Such an election must be made within 20 days after thereceipt of the service upon such person of the charge filed by the Secretary.Upon notification that a person has elected to proceed to Federal districtcourt the Secretary is directed to authorize the Attorney General to filea civil action on behalf of the aggrieved person or complainant. Such civilactions authorized by the Secretary must be brought within 30 days afterthe election is made. Where no election is made, the case will be heard by the administrativelaw judge. Under section 812(c) of the Act the Federal Rules of Evidencewill apply to the presentation of evidence in the same manner that theyapply to evidence presented in a civil action in Federal district court.Section 812(g) requires the administrative law judge to issue findingsof fact and conclusions of law within 60 days after the end of a hearing.Where the administrative law judge finds that a respondent has engagedin a discriminatory housing practice the Fair Housing Act provides forthe issuance of an order for such relief as is appropriate, which may includeactual damages and injunctive or other equitable relief. In order to vindicatethe public interest the order of an administrative law judge may assessa civil penalty against the respondent. The decision of the administrative law judge can be reviewed by the Secretary.However, this review must be completed within 30 days after the decisionis issued. Any final agency decision on the issue of discrimination issubject to review on appeal by the United States Courts of Appeal. The Fair Housing Amendments Act directs the Secretary of Housing and UrbanDevelopment to issue regulations implementing the Fair Housing Act. Section13 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that ``[I]n consultationwith other appropriate Federal agencies, the Secretary shall, not laterthan the 180th day after the enactment of this Act, issue rules to implementTitle VIII as amended by this Act.'' That section also requires the Secretaryto give notice and opportunity for comment with respect to such rules.This Notice of Proposed Rulemaking provides the interpretation of the Secretaryof Housing and Urban Development on the scope of the coverage providedand the nature of activities made unlawful by the Fair Housing Act. TheNotice of Proposed Rulemaking also contains the procedures which will beapplicable to the receipt and processing of complaints and the initiationand conduct of formal enforcement proceedings. Specifically, the Department is proposing to add three new Parts to SubtitleB of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A new Part 100 woulddescribe the conduct made unlawful under the Fair Housing Act. A new Part103 would set forth the procedures for the receipt, investigation and conciliationof complaints and for the issuance of charges commencing formal administrativeproceedings. A new Part 104 would establish rules for the conduct of administrativehearings before administrative law judges and would provide rules of discoveryin connection with such administrative proceedings. The existing departmental regulations authorizing the Secretary to collectracial, sex and ethnic data in departmental programs, currently locatedat 24 CFR Part 100, would be redesignated as 24 CFR Part 121. This regulationwould be revised to reflect the additional data requirements for HUD programsto meet the Department's responsibility to provide reports to Congressand to make available to the public data on persons eligible to participateand who are participating in HUD programs. This Notice of Proposed Rulemaking also would make revisions in four existingdepartmental regulations implementing the Fair Housing Act to reflect theexpansion of the coverage of the law to include provisions regarding handicapand familial status. Regulations affected by these changes are; Fair HousingAdministrative Meetings under Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968(24 CFR Part 106), Fair Housing Advertising (24 CFR Part 108), Fair HousingPoster (24 CFR Part 110) and for the Recognition of Substantially EquivalentFair Housing Laws (24 CFR Part 115). <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 100_DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT UNDER THE FAIR HOUSING ACT </ITAG>Part 100 would be retitled ``Unlawful Housing Practices Under The FairHousing Act'' and revised. The new Part 100 would: _Indicate the conduct which is made unlawful under the Fair Housing Act;_Include guidance as to the responsibility of persons to permit reasonablemodifications to dwellings and to make reasonable accommodations to rulesand practices for persons with handicaps and further provide informationas to the design and construction requirements applicable to certain newconstruction multifamily housing for first occupancy after March 13, 1991;and _Describe the requirements which must be met for housing to be exemptedfrom the prohibitions against discrimination based on familial status becauseit is housing for older persons. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General </ITAG>Section 100.1 Authority. The Fair Housing Amendments Act authorizes the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development to issue regulations implementing the provisions of theFair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620). This section indicates that theregulations contained in Part 100 are being issued under the Secretary'sauthority for the administration and enforcement of the Fair Housing Act.Section 100.5 Scope. The Fair Housing Act provides, within constitutional limitations, for fairhousing throughout the United States. It provides that no person shall,on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin be subject to discrimination in the sale, rental oradvertising for sale or rental of dwelling, in the provision of brokerageservices, or in residential real estate-related transactions. Section 100.5(a) and (b) indicates that this part provides guidance as to the Department'sinterpretation of the coverage of the Fair Housing Act regarding discriminationrelated to the sale or rental of dwellings, the provision of services inconnection therewith, and the availability of real estate-related transactions.The provisions of this part generally reflect the language of the statutoryprohibitions against discrimination under the Fair Housing Act. The specificprohibitions in each section are amplified by examples of unlawful conductunder the provision. Many of the practices identified in these sectionsof the proposed rule have been the subject of court decision since thepassage of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968. In other cases,the examples reflect the interpretation of HUD based on its experiencein the investigation of complaints of discriminatory housing practicessince 1968. However, it must be noted that the illustrations in Part 100are only examples of the conduct made unlawful under the Fair Housing Act.Although the prohibitions against discrimination because of handicap andfamilial status are new, the Department believes that it is appropriateto interpret the protections afforded these new classes in the same manneras the protections provided to others under provisions of the Fair HousingAct. However, the Fair Housing Act prohibitions against discriminationbecause of handicap provide protection only to persons who are handicapped.A housing provider does not violate the Fair Housing Act by restrictingoccupancy in dwellings to persons with handicaps and the exclusion of nonhandicapped persons from such dwellings would not constitute a discriminatoryhousing practice. The determination to treat the new protected classes in the same manneralso is supported by the development of fair housing law in the area ofdiscrimination because of sex. In enacting the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974 Congress amended sections 804, 805, and 806 by adding sex tothe classes of persons protected under Title VIII. (See section 808(b)(1)of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974. Pub. L. 93-383.)Although there was no legislative history regarding this expansion of thecoverage of the law, courts in deciding cases involving discriminatoryhousing practices because of sex have held that conduct found to be unlawfulwhen based on race, color, religion or national origin was also unlawfulwhen based on sex. As discussed earlier in this preamble, Congress not only added the protectionsof the existing law to persons with handicaps but provided additional requirementswith respect to the treatment of persons with handicaps. In the Fair HousingAmendments Act, in addition to the general prohibition against discriminationCongress further made it unlawful to refuse to permit reasonable modifications,to make reasonable accommodations or to design and construct certain newconstruction multifamily dwellings in a manner to make dwellings accessibleto and usable by handicap persons. In this regard Subpart D of this ruleprovides guidance on the additional practices made unlawful under the FairHousing Act. Section 100.5(c) indicates that nothing in this part relieves persons participatingin a Federal or Federally assisted program or activity from complying withother requirements applicable to buildings and dwellings under those programsor activities. Section 100.10 Exemptions. The Fair Housing Act exempts certain types of housing from the coverageof the law. Section 807 of the Fair Housing Act provides that under certaincircumstances religious organizations and private clubs may limit the sale,rental or occupancy of housing, owned or operated for other than a commercialpurpose, to their members. Section 807 also provides that nothing in theprovisions regarding familial status applies to housing for older persons.Section 803 of the Fair Housing Act provides that nothing in the Fair HousingAct, other than the prohibitions against discriminatory advertising, appliesto the sale or rental by an owner of certain single family houses or tothe rental of rooms in dwellings containing living quarters occupied byno more than four families, provided that the owner actually occupies oneof the units. Section 100.10 of this part reflects these exemptions tothe coverage of the law. Section 100.10(a)(3) states that nothing in this regulation limits theapplicability of any reasonable local, State or Federal restrictions onthe maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling unit. Thisparagraph incorporates into the regulation the revisions to section 807of the Fair Housing Act contained in section 6(d) of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988. That provision is intended to allow reasonable governmentallimitations on occupancy to continue as long as they are applied to alloccupants, and do not operate to discriminate on the basis of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. H.R. Rep.No. 711, 100th Congress, 2d Sess. 31 (1988) (``House Report''). Section 100.10(a)(4) provides that nothing in this part prohibits the refusalto sell or rent a dwelling or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwellingto a person because such person has been convicted by any court of competentjurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlledsubstance as defined in section 102 of the Controlled Substances Act (21U.S.C. 802). This exemption was intended to allow landlords to protecttenants by refusing to provide housing to persons convicted of distributingor manufacturing illegal drugs. The exemption must be based upon a conviction.It does not apply to those who are not convicted of a drug offense. Oneconviction is sufficient for the exemption. However, as in the case ofthe exemption for governmental restrictions on the number of persons occupyingdwellings, this exemption cannot be applied in a selective of differentmanner to exclude persons because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (134 Cong. Rec. S10468-9 (daily ed.August 1, 1988) (colloquy between Sen. Thurmond and Sen. Kennedy)). This section also provides that the prohibitions against discriminationbased on familial status do not apply to housing for older persons andindicates that the definition of housing for older persons is set forthin Subpart E of this part. Section 100.10 also contains the limited exemptionfrom the applicability of the provisions of the Fair Housing Act, otherthan the prohibitions against discriminatory advertising, for the saleor rental of certain single family houses by an owner and for rentals ofrooms in dwellings in which the owner also occupies a room (Mrs. Murphyhousing). Section 100.20 Definitions. Section 100.20 proposes definitions to be used for terms in this part.The term ``aggrieved person'' means any person who claims to have beeninjured by a discriminatory housing practice, or who believes that he orshe will be injured by a discriminatory housing practice that is aboutto occur. (Aggrieved person includes a fair housing organization as wellas a tester or other person who seeks information about the availabilityof dwellings to determine whether discriminatory housing practices areoccurring.) A ``broker'' or ``agent'' means any person authorized to perform an actionon behalf of another person regarding any matter related to the sale orrental of dwellings, including offers, solicitations or contracts and theadministration of matters regarding such offers, solicitations or contractsor any real estate related transactions. A ``discriminatory housing practice'' is defined as an act that is unlawfulunder section 804, 805, 806, or 818. The definition of discriminatory housingpractices reflects the addition of unlawful interference, coercion or intimidationin connection with housing under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act (formerlysection 817 of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968) as a discriminatoryhousing practice which can be a basis for a complaint under the Fair HousingAct. A ``dwelling'' means any building, structure or portion thereof, whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale orlease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structureor portion thereof, including mobile home parks, trailer courts, condominiums,cooperatives, and time-sharing properties. ``Fair Housing Act'' means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 asamended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620).``Familial status'' means one or more individuals (who have not attainedthe age of 18 years) being domiciled with a parent or another person havinglegal custody of such individual or indivduals, or the designee of suchparent or other person having such custody, with the written permissionof such parent or other person. The definition would also indicate thatthe protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familialstatus apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securinglegal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years.``Handicap'' means any person defined as handicapped under andSection;100.201of Subpart D of this part. The term ``person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers,fiduciaries, governmental entities, banks, building and loan associations,or other firms or enterprises. A ``person in the business of selling or renting'' is any person who: (1) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as principal inthree or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwellingor any interest therein, or (2) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as agent, otherthan in the sale of their own personal residence, in providing sales orrental facilities or sales or rental services in two or more transactionsinvolving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein, or(3) Is the owner of any dwelling designed or intended for occupancy by,or occupied by, five or more families. Section 100.20 also contains definitions of the terms ``Secretary'', ``State''and ``Department''. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices </ITAG>Section 100.50 Realestate practices prohibited. This section of the rule indicates that Subpart B contains the Department'sinterpretation of the conduct made unlawful under section 804 and section806 of the Fair Housing Act. In general, these provisions describe conductmade unlawful with regard to any aspect related to the sale, rental, oradvertising of dwellings and to the provision of brokerage services andfacilities in connection with the sale or rental of dwellings. Section 100.50(b) enumerates the specific conduct made unlawful in relationto the sale or rental of dwellings. The conduct described in this sectionforms the basis for the subsequent sections in this subpart. Each of thefollowing sections provides illustrations of the scope and applicabilityof the rule to specific sales, rental and brokerage activities. While the illustrations are set forth under the section of this subpartwhich is most applicable to the discriminatory conducted described, andSection;100.50indicates that an action described in one section can constitute a violationunder other sections as well. In addition, it should be noted that theillustrations of discriminatory conduct in this subpart are only examplesof discriminatory conduct which violates the Fair Housing Act and are notintended to limit the scope of discrimination in housing made unlawfulunder the Fair Housing Act. Section 100.60 Unlawful refusal to sell or rent or to negotiate for thesale or rental.This section of the rule describes the activities which constitute a refusalto sell or rent to a <T3>bona fide</T3> homeseeker or a refusal to negotiate with persons forthe sale or rental of dwellings and which are unlawful when they are takenbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.The illustrations in andSection; 100.60(b)(3) through (6) are intended toindicate the Department's position that certain activities in which differenttreatment is provided to persons because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin also can be tantamount toan unlawful refusal to negotiate under this section.Section 100.65 Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and inservices and facilities.Section 100.65 indicates that differences in the treatment of persons inconnection with the provision of services and facilities or in the termsor conditions relating to the sale or rental of a dwelling because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin constitutea discriminatory housing practice.The illustrations in andSection; 100.65(b) indicate that the coverage ofthis section extends beyond restrictions or differences in a lease or salescontract and the provision of different maintenance. This section wouldprovide that denials of, or limitations on the amount of discounts, rebatesor gifts, or on the use of privileges, services or facilities relatingto the sale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin are also discriminatory housingpractices.Section 100.70 Other prohibited sale and rental conduct.This section would indicate that restricting or attempting to restrictthe housing choices of persons as well as engaging in any conduct relatingto the sale or rental of a dwelling that otherwise makes unavailable ordenies dwellings because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin, is a discriminatory housing practice.Section 100.70(c) describes actions which result in limitations of housingchoice which would violate the Fair Housing Act. These practices, whichare commonly referred to as ``steering'', include practices designed todiscourage persons from seeking housing in a particular community, neighborhood,or development in addition to those used to direct or assign persons toa particular community, neighborhood, or development because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.With respect to practices which otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling,the illustrations focus primarily on activities with respect to the saleor rental of dwellings which may not be taken against a specific personbut nonetheless result in housing being made unavailable to persons becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.This section indicates, for example, that a policy of encouraging or rewardingdiscriminatory housing practices or of taking adverse actions against employeesrefusing to participate in such discriminatory practices would violatethe Fair Housing Act. In these cases, the actions taken will result ina limitation on the housing opportunities and choices available to persons.This section also states that the denial of the approval of an otherwisequalified person by a cooperative association because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin which results in theinability of a person to complete a sale or rental transaction constitutesa violation of the Fair Housing Act. This example illustrates the broadreach of the ``otherwise make unavailable'' language in the Fair HousingAct which covers the denial of benefits essential to the sale or rentalof a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.In view of the broad reach of the ``otherwise make unavailable'' languagein the Fair Housing Act, it is especially important to note that the illustrationsin this subpart are only examples of discriminatory conduct and are notintended to limit the scope of discrimination in housing made unlawfulunder the Act. For instance, although not set forth as an example in thissubpart, discrimination in the provision of services and facilities whichare prerequisites to obtaining dwellings, including discriminatory refusalsto provide municipal services or adequate property or hazard insuranceas well as discriminatory appraisal and financing practices, has been interpretedby the Department and by courts to render dwellings unavailable under the``otherwise make unavailable'' in the Fair Housing Act.The language regarding the ``otherwise make unavailable'' provisions ofthe Fair Housing Act has not been interpreted to impose upon private individualsan affirmative obligation to construct or offer housing of a particulartype or cost. Rather, a private individual's decisions based solely onlegitimate business reasons other than race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status or national origin will not violate the Act. Thus, forexample, a private developer's market-based decision to include only efficiencyapartments in a development would not violate the Act solely because, asa practical matter, such housing would be unavailable to families withchildren. For that reason, the unlawful conduct described in this sectiondoes not include such actions. The obligations of developers to make newmultifamily housing accessible to handicapped persons are addressed inandSection; 100.205.Section 100.75 Discriminatory advertisements, statements, and notices.Although the Fair Housing Advertising Regulation (24 CFR Part 109) appliesto all advertising for dwellings, the Department believes it is appropriatein connection with regulations describing prohibited conduct related tothe sale or rental of housing to include additional guidance as to prohibitedconduct in the making of advertising, notices and statements regardingthis specific area. Section 100.75 describes prohibited conduct relatedto advertisements, notices and statements, by persons engaged in the saleor rental of housing or in the printing and publishing of such advertisements,notices and statements.Section 100.80 Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings.Section 100.80 indicates that the provision of inaccurate or untrue informationabout the availability of dwellings for sale or rent because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin constitutesa violation of the Fair Housing Act. In this regard, it should be notedthat a person who receives the inaccurate or untrue information need notbe an actual seeker of housing in order to be the victim of a discriminatoryhousing practice under this section.Section 100.85 Blockbusting.Blockbusting consists of any effort, for profit, to induce or attempt toinduce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by representations regardingthe entry into a neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin or with a handicap.Section 100.85(b) indicates it is not necessary that there be in fact aprofit realized as a result of blockbusting as long as the availabilityof profit was a factor involved in the blockbusting activity. In addition,the illustrations of unlawful blockbusting activity include uninvited solicitationsfor listings in a neighborhood which are different than uninvited solicitationsin other neighborhoods because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin of the neighborhood.Section 100.90 Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services.This section reflects the prohibition in the Fair Housing Act against denyingany person access to, or membership or participation in, any multiple listingservice, real estate brokers' organization or facility relating to thebusiness of selling or renting dwellings. This section also indicates thatit is unlawful to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditionsof such access, membership or participation because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Discrimination in Residential Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG>Section100.110 Discriminatory practices in residential real estate-related transactions.Section 100.110 indicates the general prohibition against discriminationin the availability of, or in the terms or conditions imposed in any residentialreal estate-related transaction because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin. The prohibitions againstdiscrimination in this subpart apply to any person or other entity whosebusiness includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions.Section 100.115 Residential real estate-related transactions.This section incorporates into this part the definition of the term ``residentialreal estate transaction'' contained in section 6(c) of the Fair HousingAmendments Act of 1988.Section 100.120 Discrimination in the making of loans and in the provisionof other financial assistance.This section indicates that it is unlawful for a person or entity engagedin residential real estate transactions to discriminate against personsbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin in making available loans and other financial assistance relatingto dwellings. The prohibitions against discrimination in the making ofloans and in the provision of other financial assistance reflects the languagerelating to discrimination in the financing of housing under Title VIIIof the Civil Rights Act of 1968.In connection with the development of the illustrations of activities whichwould constitute discriminatory practices under the Fair Housing Act relatingto the making available of loans and other assistance the Department hasbeen guided by its experiences in connection with the administration andenforcement of the current law.The definition of the term residential real estate-related transactionsincludes loans and other financial assistance which are secured by residentialreal estate. This revision expands the types of financing transactionswhich are covered by the nondiscrimination requirements of Title VIII ofthe Civil Rights Act of 1968. However, there is nothing in the legislativehistory of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 which indicates thatthe Congress intended that loans and other assistance secured by a dwellingbe treated any differently than loans for the purchase, construction, improvement,repair, or maintenance of a dwelling. Thus, the illustrations in this sectionapply equally to both types of loans.The illustrations of unlawful conduct under this section include the makingof statements, notices and advertisements which indicate a preference ofan intention to make a preference because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin. Although the Fair HousingAdvertising Regulation (24 CFR Part 109) applies to all advertising fordwellings, the Department has determined that it is appropriate in connectionwith regulations describing prohibited conduct related to residential realestate-related transactions to include additional guidance as to prohibitedconduct in the making of advertising, notices and statements regardingthis specific area. Section 100.120(b)(3) describes prohibited conductrelated to advertisements, notices and statements in connection with residentialreal estate-related transactions.Section 100.125 Discrimination in the purchasing of loans and other financialassistance.The principal change in the nature of the conduct made unlawful regardingloans and other assistance with respect to dwellings is the inclusion ofactivities relating to the purchase of such loans. In prohibiting discriminationin the purchasing of loans Congress extended the coverage of the Fair HousingAct to conduct in the secondary mortgage market. The House Report on theFair Housing Amendment Act of 1988 states, with regard to this expandedcoverage however, that ``[T]he Committee does not intend that those purchasingmortgage loans be precluded from taking into consideration factors justifiedby business necessity (including requirements of Federal law) which relateto the financial security of the transaction or the protection againstdefault or diminution in the value of the property.'' (House Report at30).Section 100.125 indicates the new coverage of secondary mortgage marketactivities under the Fair Housing Act. Since the protections provided underthis section are new, the illustrations of discriminatory housing practicesin this section focus on general areas of unlawful conduct under the Act.In this respect, the illustrations indicate that conduct made unlawfulwith regard to secondary mortgage market activities include actions takenwith respect to the purchase and pooling of loans as well as the termsand conditions of the sale of securities issued based on such loans. Section 100.130 Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making availableloans or other financial assistance.Section 100.130 indicates that it is unlawful to impose different termsor conditions for the availability of a loan or other financial assistancefor a dwelling or which is, or will be secured by a dwelling because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.The illustrations of the unlawful activities indicate that requirements,procedures, policies or practices relating to loans or other financialassistance which are different or imposed in a different manner becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originare discriminatory housing practices. This section also indicates thatimposing different loan provisions (such as the interest rate or the durationof the loan), or providing different types of loans because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin are unlawful.In addition, andSection; 100.130(b)(4) indicates it is unlawful to fail tomake available a loan or other assistance because of the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of the present or prospectiveresidents or occupants of dwellings in the area of the dwelling for whichthe loan or other financial assistance is sought, or in the area in whichthe dwelling which is provided as security for the loan or other assistanceis located.The practice of refusing to make loans or certain types of loans or otherassistance for dwellings in particular areas has been generally referredto as ``redlining''. However, the determination of the nature and typesof loans and other financial assistance to be offered by a person or entityengaged in residential real estate-related transactions in many cases involveslegitimate business judgments and complex financial, economic and socialissues and problems. Unless the failure to provide loans or other assistanceto a particular area is because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin of persons, it does not violate theFair Housing Act. In order to avoid confusion as to the nature of conductprohibited under the Fair Housing Act the term redlining has not been usedin this section of the rule.Section 100.135 Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering, or appraisingof residential real property.The prohibitions against discrimination because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin in connection with residentialreal estate-related transaction apply to the selling, brokering and appraisingof residential real property. Section 100.135 states that it is unlawfulfor any person whose business includes engaging in the selling, brokeringor appraising of residential real property to discriminate against anyperson in making available such activities, or in the terms or conditionsof such activities because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.For the purpose of this rule the term ``appraisal'' means an estimate oropinion of the value of a specified residential real property made in acommercial context in connection with the sale, rental, financing or refinancingof a dwelling or with any other residential real estate-related transactions,whether the appraisal is oral or written, or transmitted formally or informally.While the Fair Housing Act provides a specific exemption for appraisalsstating that nothing in the Act prohibits a person in the business of furnishingappraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other thanrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin,the illustrations of unlawful conduct make clear that consideration ofany factor because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin <T3>does </T3>constitute a discriminatory housing practice.Section 100.135(d)(3) would provide that it is unlawful, in a commercialcontext, by either statements or conduct, to instruct or encourage anyperson, or to impose standards requiring such person, to consider any factorin making an appraisal of a dwelling which relates to race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status or national origin. This illustration isintended to cover, among other activities, instruction or training of appraisersby professional appraiser associations, or the adoption of discriminatoryappraisal standards by governmental agencies providing home mortgage financing.By limiting its application to activities undertaken in a commercial context,the Department intends to indicate that activities which may be subjectto First Amendment protections, such as the publication of treatises, articles,etc., regarding appraisal theory or practices, are excluded from coverage.In addition, andSection; 100.135(d)(4) provides that it is unlawful for anyperson to (a) use any appraisal or appraisal report if such person knowsor reasonably should know that the appraisal takes into account a factoror factors based on race, color, religion, sex or national origin, or (b)use any information relating to race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus or national origin which is contained in an appraisal report. Thisrule is intended primarily to prohibit lenders or other persons who engagein residential real estate-related activities from utilizing a discriminatoryappraisal, or information relating to race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin contained in an appraisal report, indetermining the eligibility or the terms and conditions for financing.This illustration would also relate to other persons, such as real estatebrokers, who might use an appraisal report in establishing the sales priceof a dwelling.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Prohibitions Against Discrimination Because of Handicap</ITAG>The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 extended the principle of equalhousing opportunity to persons with handicaps. The Act makes ``a clearpronouncement of a national commitment to end the unnecessary exclusionof persons with handicaps from the American mainstream. It repudiates theuse of stereotypes and ignorance, and mandates that persons with handicapsbe considered as individuals.'' House Report at 18. The Act makes it unlawfulto discriminate or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling toany buyer or renter because of a handicap of that individual, someone associatedwith that individual, or of a resident or potential resident (section 804(f)(1)).It also prohibits discrimination against the same person in the terms,conditions, or privileges of sale or rental, or provision of services orfacilities (section 804(f)(2)). It requires that persons with handicapsbe permitted to make reasonable modifications, at their expense, to existingpremises to afford them full enjoyment of the premises (section 804(f)(3)(A)).It also requires that after March 13, 1991, new multifamily dwellings offour or more units be designed and constructed to allow ready access toand use by persons with handicaps (section 804(f)(3)(C)).Section 100.200 Purpose.Section 100.200 explains that the purpose of Subpart D is to effectuatethe provisions concerning handicap in the Fair Housing Amendments Act of1988.Section 100.201 Definitions.Section 100.201 proposes definitions to be used for terms used only insubpart D. The definitions in subpart A also apply to subpart D.``Accessible'', when used with respect to the public and common use areasof a building containing covered multifamily dwellings, means that thepublic or common use areas of the building can be approached, entered,and used by individuals with physical handicaps. The phrase ``readily accessibleto and usable by'' is synonymous with accessible. A public or common usearea that complies with the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1 oranother standard that affords handicapped persons access essentially equivalentto or greater than that required by ANSI A117.1 is ``accessible'' withinthe meaning of this definition.``Accessible route'' means a continuous unobstructed path connecting accessibleelements and spaces in a building or within a site that can be negotiatedby a person with a severe disability using a wheelchair and that is alsosafe for and usable by people with other disabilities. Interior accessibleroutes may include corridors, floors, ramps, elevators and lifts. Exterioraccessible routes may include parking access aisles, curb ramps, walks,ramps and lifts. A route that complies with the appropriate requirementsof ANSI A117.1 is an ``accessible route''. This definition is consistentwith the definition of ``accessible route'' in ANSI A117.1.``ANSI A117.1'' means the American National Standard for buildings andfacilities providing accessibility and usability for physically handicappedpeople. The American National Standards Institute, Inc. (ANSI) is a private,national organization that publishes standards on a wide variety of subjects.The Secretariat that developed the 1986 edition of the ANSI standard wascomposed of the National Easter Seal Society, the President's Committeeon Employment of the Handicapped, and HUD. The current version of thesestandards was published in 1986 and is referred to as ``ANSI A117.1-1986''.Whenever ANSI A117.1 is used in subpart D, the reference is to the mostrecently published edition of ANSI A117.1 as of the date bids for constructionof a particular building are solicited.``Building'' means a structure, facility or the portion thereof that containsor serves one or more dwelling units. For example, a structure that servesone or more dwelling units includes a structure containing recreationalfacilities for residents of an apartment complex.``Building entrance on an accessible route'' means an accessible entranceto a building that is connected by an accessible route within the boundaryof the site accessible to public transportation stops, to accessible parkingand passenger loading zones, and to public streets or sidewalks, if available.A building entrance that complies with ANSI A117.1 complies with the requirementsof this definition.``Common use areas'' means rooms, spaces or elements inside or outsidea building that are made available for the use of residents of a buildingor the guests thereof. Examples of common use areas include hallways, lounges,lobbies, laundry rooms, refuse rooms and passageways among and betweenbuildings.``Controlled substance'' means any drug or other substance, or immediateprecursor included in the definition in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802).``Covered multifamily dwellings'' means buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and groundfloor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or more dwellingunits. A single structure consisting of 5 two-story townhouses is not a``covered multifamily dwelling'' if the units do not have elevators becausethe entire dwelling unit is not on the ground floor.``Dwelling unit'' means any building, structure or portion thereof whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone person or family. Examples of dwelling units include single familydetached houses, townhouses, apartments, and condominiums.``Entrance'' means any access point to a building used by residents forthe purpose of entering.``Exterior'' means all areas of the premises outside of an individual dwellingunit. The term exterior is used in the definition of ``premises''.``First occupancy'' means a building that has never before been used forany purpose.``Ground floor'' means a floor of a building with a building entrance onan accessible route. A building may have more than one ground floor.``Handicap'' means, with respect to a person, a physical or mental impairmentwhich substantially limits one or more of such person's major life activities;a record of having such an impairment; or being regarded as having suchan impairment. However, this term does not include current, illegal useof or addiction to a controlled substance. The term also does not includean individual solely because that individual is a transvestite. Paragraphs(a), (b), (c) and (d) of the definition clarify the key phrases in thedefinition: ``physical or mental impairment''; ``major life activities'';``has a record of such an impairment''; and ``is regarded as having animpairment''.With the exception of current, illegal use of or an addiction to a controlledsubstance, the definition of ``handicap'' in the Act is very similar tothe definition of the term ``individual with handicaps'' in the RehabilitationAct of 1973. 29 U.S.C. 706. Congress intended that the definition of ``handicap''in the Fair Housing Amendments Act to be interpreted in a manner that isconsistent with regulations interpreting the meaning of the similar provisionfound in section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.House Report at 22; 134 Cong. Rec. S10492 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (statementof Sen. Chafee); 134 Cong. Rec. H4689 (daily ed. June 23, 1988) (statementof Rep. Pelosi); 134 Cong. Rec. H4612 (daily ed. June 22, 1988) (statementof Rep. Schroeder).Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act prohibits discrimination againstotherwise qualified individuals with handicaps in programs or activitiesreceiving federal financial assistance as well as in federally conductedprograms and activities. The Department of Justice section 504 coordinationregulation for federally assisted programs is at 28 CFR Part 41. HUD'ssection 504 regulation for federally assisted programs is at 24 CFR Part8. Paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of the definition of ``handicap'' closelyfollow the definitions of these key phrases used in regulations interpretingsection 504.Paragraph (a) of the definition of ``handicap'' in andSection;100.201 closelyfollows the definition in HUD's section 504 regulation for federally assistedprograms and activities (24 CFR 8.3), except that this rule's definitiondoes not include drug addiction caused by current illegal use of a drugthat is a controlled substance. Section 5(b) of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct expressly excludes from the definition of ``handicap'' current, illegaluse of or addiction to a controlled substance, as defined by the ControlledSubstances Act (21 U.S.C. 802). The legislative history of the Fair HousingAmendments Act demonstrates that the Act does not exclude from protectionpersons who take controlled substances for a medical condition under thecare of, or by prescription from, a physician. Use of a medically prescribeddrug does not constitute illegal use of a controlled substance. Similarly,individuals who have a record of drug use or addiction but do not currentlyuse illegal drugs would continue to be protected if they fell within thedefinition of ``handicap.'' It is not the intent of the Act to excludefrom protection individuals who have recovered from an addiction or areparticipating in a self-help group. House Report at 22; 134 Cong. Rec.S10553 (daily ed. August 2, 1988) (statement of Sen. Domenici). However,individuals who are participating in a self-help group (<T3>e.g., </T3>Narcotics Anonymous) are not automatically thereby includedwithin the definition of ``handicap.'' Rather, they are protected onlyif they fall within the definition of ``handicap,'' <T3>i.e., </T3>they are not illegally using controlled substances.Paragraph (b) defines the term ``major life activities'' the same way theconcept is defined in regulations implementing section 504. A major lifeactivity includes functions such as caring for one's self, performing manualtasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning and working.Paragraph (c) defines the phrase ``has a record of such an impairment''as that phrase is used in the definition of handicap. A person who hasa history of, or has been misclassified as having, a mental or physicalimpairment that substantially limits one or more major life activitiesis a handicapped person under the Fair Housing Act.Paragraph (d) defines the phrase ``is regarded as having an impairment''to mean a person who:(1) Has a physical or mental impairment that does not substantially limitone or more major life activities but that is treated by a person as constitutingsuch a limitation;(2) Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one ormore major life activities only as a result of the attitudes of otherstoward such impairment; or(3) Has none of the impairments defined in paragraph (a) but is treatedby a person as having such an impairment.``Interior'' means the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individualdwelling unit. The term ``interior'' is used in andSection;100.203 relatingto modifications of existing premises and in the definition of ``premises''.The kitchen and bathroom of an apartment are examples of elements of adwelling unit and are also part of the ``interior'' of the premises.``Modification'' means any change to the public or common use areas ofa building or any change to a dwelling unit.``Premises'' means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components orelements of a building or a dwelling unit, including individual dwellingunits and the public and common use areas of a building.``Public use areas'' means rooms or spaces of a building that are madeavailable to the general public. Public use may be provided at a buildingthat is privately or publicly owned. ``Site'' means a parcel of land bounded by a property line or a designatedportion of a public right of way.Section 100.202 General prohibitions against discrimination because ofhandicap.Section 100.202 contains the general prohibitions against discriminationbecause of handicap and serves as the analytical foundation for the remainingsections of the subpart. The remaining sections of Subpart D explain ingreater detail what conduct is discriminatory. Thus, whenever a personhas violated any of the subsequent sections of Subpart D, that person hasalso violated andSection;100.202.Paragraph (a) restates the Fair Housing Amendments Act's mandate of nondiscriminationin the sale or rental of dwellings. Under paragraph (a), it is unlawfulto discriminate against any person in the sale or rental of or to otherwisemake unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because ofa handicap of that buyer or renter, a person residing in or intending toreside in that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made unavailable,or any person associated with that buyer or renter. Under this provision,a landlord may not, for example, refuse to rent to an individual solelybecause the applicant uses a wheelchair or has a history of physical ormental illness. Paragraph (b) restates the Act's ban of discrimination in the terms, conditions,or privileges of the sale or rental of a dwelling. Paragraph (b) makesit unlawful to discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions,or privileges of the sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provisionof services or facilities in connection with such dwelling because of ahandicap of that buyer or renter, a person residing in or intending toreside in that dwelling after it is so sold, rented, or made available,or any person associated with that person. This provision is intended toprohibit special restrictive covenants or other terms or conditions, ordenials of service because of an individual's handicap and which have theeffect of excluding, for example, congregate living arrangements for personswith handicaps. Under this provision it is unlawful to bar discriminatorilya person with handicaps from access to recreation facilities, parking privileges,cleaning and janitorial services and other facilities, uses of premises,benefits and privileges made available to other tenants, residents, andowners. House Report at 23. Paragraphs (a) and (b) prohibit not only discrimination against the primarypurchaser or named lessee, but also prohibit denials of housing opportununitiesto applicants because they have children, parents, friends, spouses, roommates,patients subtenants or other associates who have disabilities. House Reportat 24. The legislative history of the Fair Housing Amendments Act makes it clearthat the Act was intended to prohibit landlords and owners for asking prospectivetenants and buyers blanket questions about the individuals' disabilities.The House Report explains that the approach taken in section 504 regulationsdealing with pre-employment inquiries should apply also to the Fair HousingAmendments Act. House Report at 30. Under section 504 regulations, employersmay not inquire, as part of pre-employment inquiries, whether an applicantis a handicapped person. Employers may only make preemployment inquiresinto an applicant's ability to perform job-related functions. <T3>See </T3>45 CFR 84.14; 24 CFR 8.13. Paragraph (c) is an adaptation of the ``pre-employment inquiries'' provisionsin section 504 regulations; it prohibits inquiries to determine whetheran applicant for a dwelling, a person intending to reside in that dwellingafter it is sold, rented or made available, or any person associated withthat person has a handicap or to make inquiry as to the nature or severityof a handicap of such person. Paragraph (c) also states that it does not prohibit five types of inquires,provided these inquiries are made of all applicants, whether or not theyhave handicaps. Paragraph (c)(i) clarifies that a housing provider may inquire into anapplicant's ability to meet the requirements of ownership or tenancy. Thus,in assessing an application for tenancy, a landlord or owner may ask anindividual the question that he or she asks of all other applicants thatrelate directly to the tenancy (<T3>e.g., </T3>questions relating to rental history or a targeted inquiryas to whether the individual has engaged in acts that would pose a directthreat to the health or safety of other tenants), but may not ask an applicantblanket questions with regard to whether the individual has a disability.A housing provider may also not ask an applicant questions which wouldrequire the applicant to waive his or her right to confidentiality concerninghis or her medical condition or history. House Report at 30. Paragraph (c) (ii) states that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiryto determine whether an applicant is qualified for a dwelling that is availableonly to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particular type ofhandicap. The Fair Housing Amendments Act does not prohibit the exclusionof non-handicapped persons from dwellings. A housing facility may lawfullyrestrict occupancy to persons with handicaps. For example, some Federaland State housing programs are designed for, and occupied by, persons withhandicaps. Only persons with handicaps are eligible to live in such dwellings.The owner or operator of such a housing facility may inquire of applicantsto determine whether they have a handicap for the purpose of determiningeligibility. Paragraph (c)(iii) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibit an inquiryto determine whether an applicant for a dwelling is qualified for a priorityavailable to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particular typeof handicap. A housing provider may choose to offer some or all of itsunits to persons with handicaps on a priority basis and may inquire whetherapplicants qualify for such a priority. For example, a housing providermay offer accessible units to persons with mobility impairments on a prioritybasis and may ask applicants whether they have a mobility impairment whichwould qualify them for such a priority. Paragraph (c)(iv) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiringwhether an applicant for a dwelling is a current illegal abuser of or addictto a controlled substance. The definition of ``handicap'' in the Fair HousingAmendments Act does not include current, illegal use of or addiction toa controlled substance. <T3>See </T3>House Report at 30.Paragraph (c)(v) provides that paragraph (c) does not prohibit inquiringwhether an applicant has been convicted of the illegal manufacture or distributionof a controlled substance. Section 807(b)(4) of the Fair Housing Act statesthat nothing in the Act prohibits conduct against a person because suchperson has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of theillegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance. Paragraph (d) restates new section 804(f)(9) of the Fair Housing Act whichprovides that nothing in section 804(f) requires that a dwelling be madeavailable to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threatto the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would resultin substantial physical damage to the property of others. This provisionwas included ``to allay the fears of those who believe that the non-discriminationprovisions of this Act could force landlords and owners to rent or sellto persons whose tenancies could pose such a risk.'' House Report at 28(footnote omitted). However, this provision was not intended to createor permit a presumption that individuals with handicaps generally posea greater threat to the health or safety of others than do individualswithout handicaps. In adopting this provision, the House Committee on the Judiciary affirmedthat all individuals with handicaps, with the exception of current illegalabusers of or addicts to controlled substances, are entitled to the protectionsunder the Act. <T3>Id. </T3>This approach differs in one significant respect from thattaken in the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. The definition of ``individualswith handicaps'' in the Rehabilitation Act does not <T3>per se </T3>exclude persons who currently, illegally use or are addictedto a controlled substance. The Rehabilitation Act's definition of ``individualswith handicaps'' excludes, with regard to employment, ``any individualwho is an alcoholic or drug abuser whose current use of alcohol or drugsprevents such individual from performing the duties of the job in questionor whose employment, by reason of such current alcohol or drug abuse, wouldconstitute a direct threat to property or the safety of others.'' 29 U.S.C.706(8)(B). With respect to individuals with contagious diseases and infections, section804(f)(9) is, however, parallel to the corresponding provision of the CivilRights Restoration Act of 1988 (CRRA) (Pub. L. 100-259, 102 Stat. 28 (March22, 1988)). Section 9 of the CRRA amended the Rehabilitation Act's definitionof ``individuals with handicaps'' further to exclude, for purposes of section504 as it relates to employment, ``an individual who has a currently contagiousdisease or infection and who, by reason of such disease or infection, wouldconstitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individualsor who, by reason of the currently contagious disease or infection, isunable to perform the duties of the job.'' The provision was added to the CRRA in order to codify the decision ofthe Supreme Court in <T3>School Board of Nassau County v. Arline, </T3>107 S. Ct. 1123 (1987).House Report at 29. In <T3>Arline, </T3>a case involving an allegation of employment discriminationunder section 504, the Supreme Court held that a person who has the contagiousdisease of tuberculosis can be an ``individual with handicaps'' withinthe meaning of section 504. 107 S.Ct. at 1132. The Court in <T3>Arline </T3>further explained that an employee ``who poses a significantrisk of communicating a contagious disease to others in the workplace willnot be otherwise qualified for his or her job if reasonable accommodationwill not eliminate that risk.'' 107 S.Ct. at 1131, n. 16.The legislative history of the Fair Housing Amendments Act indicates thatthe ``direct threat'' language restated in paragraph (d) should be interpretedconsistently with <T3>Arline. </T3>House Report at 29. The House Report states that ``[w]hile <T3>Arline </T3>dealt with employment in the context of section 504, theCommittee intends that same standard to apply in the context of housingunder this Act. Thus, the direct threat requirement incorporates the <T3>Arline </T3>standards, and a dwelling need not be made available toan individual whose tenancy can be shown to constitute a direct threatand a significant risk of harm to the health or safety of others.'' <T3>Id. </T3>However, if a reasonable accommodation could eliminate therisk, entities covered by the Act are required to provide such accommodationunder andSection; 100.203. <T3>Id.</T3> The provision concerning direct threat posed by an individual's tenancyis formulated to require that the landlord or property owner establisha nexus between the fact of the particular individual's tenancy and theasserted direct threat. Any claim that an individual's tenancy poses adirect threat and substantial risk of harm must be established on the basisof objective evidence, <T3>e.g., </T3>a history of overt acts or current conduct. Generalizedassumptions, subjective fears, and speculation are insufficient to provethe requisite direct threat. For instance, if a landlord determines, byobjective evidence that is sufficiently recent to be credible, and notfrom unsubstantiated inferences, that the applicant will pose a directthreat to the health or safety of others, the landlord may reject the applicantas a tenant. In assessing information, the landlord may not infer thata history of a physical or mental illness or disability, or treatment forsuch illnesses or disabilities, constitutes proof that an applicant willbe unable to fulfill his or her tenancy obligations. House Reports at 29-30.Paragraph (d) also states that nothing in subpart D requires that a dwellingbe made available to an individual whose tenancy would result in ``substantialphysical damage to the property of others.'' The legislative history ofthis provision makes it clear that this provision was intended to be readin conjunction with the other provisions in the Act providing access forpersons in wheelchairs. 134 Cong. Rec. S 1064 (daily ed. August 1, 1988)(statement of Sen. Harkin). Thus, this provision should not be construedto allow a landlord to exclude a person in a wheelchair because of effectsof using a wheelchair upon property. For example, the normal wear and tearto a dwelling unit that might be expected on the part of an individualwho uses a wheelchair, such as the nicking of doorframes or of walls, would<T3>not </T3>constitute ``substantial'' physical damage within the meaningof paragraph (d). 134 Cong. Rec. H4932 (daily ed. June 29, 1988) (statementof Rep. Edwards); 134 Cong. Rec. S1064 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (statementof Sen. Harkin). In addition, the individual's tenancy would have to beshown to cause substantial physical harm to significant pieces of property.Thus, the fact that a person might damage some piece of property wouldalso not be sufficient to trigger this provision. <T3>Id.</T3> Section 100.203 Reasonable modifications of existing premises. Paragraph (a) implements section 804(f)(3)(A) of the Fair Housing Act,as amended. Under paragraph (a), it is illegal to refuse to permit tenantswith disabilities to make reasonable modifications, at their expense, ofexisting premises if the proposed modifications are necessary for theirfull enjoyment of the premises. In the case of a rental, the landlord may,where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modificationon the renter ageeing to restore the interior of the premises to the conditionthat existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.The premise of andSection; 100.203 is that a housing provider's refusal toallow reasonable modifications ``operates, at worst, to deny housing tohandicapped persons, and, at least, to deny them the opportunity to enjoytheir premises safely and fully.'' House Report at 25. The term ``fullenjoyment'' was used because Congress recognized ``that the nature of individualhandicaps, and therefore the potential need for environmental modificationsvaries greatly.'' <T3>Id. </T3>The Department wishes to stress that any modifications protectedby this section must be reasonable and must be made at the expense of theindividual with handicaps. Paragraph (a) allows reasonable modifications at the expense of the individualwith handicaps to existing ``premises''. ``Premises'' is defined in andSection;100.201 to mean the interior or exterior parts, components or elementsof a building or a dwelling unit, including the public and common use areasof a building. Thus, an individual with handicaps would be able, at hisor her own expense, to make reasonable accommodations to lobbies, mainentrances of apartment buildings, laundry rooms and other common and publicuse areas necessary to the full enjoyment of the premises. The Departmenthas proposed to define the term ``premises'' to encompass the public andcommon use areas because it appears that this is what Congress intended.The Act allows reasonable modifications of ``existing premises'' if necessaryto afford the handicapped person full enjoyment of the premises. If thelaundry room is not accessible, for example, a person with a mobility impairmentwill not have ``full enjoyment'' of the premises. Beyond this, section 15 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that,in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to doso, condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restorethe <T3>interior</T3> of the premises to the condition that existed beforethe modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted. The use of the word``interior'' in the language of the Act dealing with the restoration ofmodifications, but not in the language allowing reasonable modificationsof existing ``premises'' further indicates that Congress intended thatthe term ``premises'' encompass public and common use areas as well asindividual dwelling units. Of course, modifications to public and commonuse areas must be reasonable and must be made at the expense of the individualwith handicaps. It also follows from the language of section 15 of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct that landlords may not condition approval of modifications to the premiseson the renter agreeing to restore the ``exterior'' of the premises to thecondition that existed before the modification. Since the term ``interior''is not defined in the Fair Housing Amendments Act the distinction between``interior'' and ``exterior'' must be addressed in this subpart. The term ``interior of the premises'' in section 15 of the Fair HousingAmendments Act may have two possible meanings. The term ``interior'' mightbe interpreted to refer to any area ``inside'' existing premises (<T3>i.e., </T3>not out-of-doors), whether the area is an individual dwellingunit or a public or common use area. If the term is interpreted in thisway then a landlord would be able to condition permission for a modificationon the renter agreeing to restore any area located ``inside'' existingpremises to the condition that existed before the modification, where itis reasonable to do so. For example, under this possible interpretationa landlord could, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permissionfor modifications to a lobby on the renter agreeing to restore the lobbyto the condition that existed before the modification. However, under thisinterpretation the landlord would not be able to condition permission onthe renter agreeing to restore a public or common use area located in theexterior portion of existing premises (<T3>e.g., </T3>a curb cut or ramp to a building entrance) to the conditionthat existed before the modification. In the alternative, the word ``interior'' might refer to the interior spaceof an individual dwelling unit but not to public and common use areas,whether located on the ``inside'' or ``outside'' of existing premises.Under this interpretation, the landlord would not be able to conditionpermission for making a modification on the renter agreeing to restoreany public or common use area to the condition that existed before themodification. The Department proposes to adopt the second interpretation of the term``interior'' discussed above because the Department believes that the phrase``interior of the premises'' in section 15 of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct was intended to distinguish between individual dwelling units and publicand common use areas rather than between elements of premises that happento be in or out of doors. Section 15 was added to the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct on the Senate floor near the end of the legislative process. As a result,there is little legislative history on section 15. Nonetheless, the examplesof modifications that a landlord may require that a tenant restore thatwere discussed during the Senate debate of section 15 all concern the restorationof modifications made to elements of individual dwelling units. 134 Cong.Rec. S10548 (daily ed. August 2, 1988) (statements of Sens. Kennedy andSpecter). Further, the examples in the legislative history indicate that it wouldnot be reasonable for a landlord to condition permission for modificationson the tenant agreeing to restore the premises to the condition that existedbefore the modifications, where the modifications will not interfere withthe use and enjoyment of the dwelling unit by future occupants. Some modificationsto an individual dwelling unit might interfere with or detract from theuse and enjoyment of the dwelling unit by future occupants. For example,if a tenant with a handicap seeks permission to modify the bathroom wallsin order to install grab bars it would be reasonable for the landlord torequire that the walls to which the grab bars are to be attached be restoredto their original condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted. The grabbars might interfere with or detract from the next tenant's use and enjoymentof the bathroom. However, if it is necessary to add blocking behind thewalls to affix the grab bars, it would be unreasonable for the landlordto require the tenant to remove the blocking since the reinforced wallswill not interfere with the use and enjoyment of the premises by futureoccupants. <T3>Id. </T3>(statement of Sen. Kennedy). The Department does not believe that <T3>reasonable</T3> modifications to public and common use areas woulddetract significantly from the public and common use areas modified andindeed may be of benefit to other persons with and without handicaps. Moreover,this should be the case whether the public or common use area is on theinside or on the outside of a structure. For example, an accessible buildingentrance, laundry room or curb would not significantly detract from, andindeed may enhance, the use and enjoyment of the lobby, laundry room orcurb by persons with and without handicaps. An accesible element may beeasier and more convenient for everyone to use. Furthermore, if a specificmodification to a public or common use area proposed by a tenant with ahandicap can reasonably be expected to interfere significantly with theuse or enjoyment of the public or common use area in question by personswithout handicaps then the proposed modification would not be reasonable.For the foregoing reasons, ``interior'' is defined in andSection; 100.201as the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individual dwellingunit. Thus, the ``interior of the premises'' <T3>excludes</T3> all public and common use areas, including lobbies, laundryrooms, party rooms, as well as curbs and outside elements of a premises.It follows that under andSection; 100.203(a) of the proposed rule a landlordcould, where it is reasonable to do so, condition approval of modificationsto an individual dwelling unit on the renter agreeing to restore the dwellingunit to the condition that existed before the modification. However, alandlord would <T3>not</T3> be able to condition approval of modifications to public orcommon use areas on the tenant agreeing to restore the public or commonuse area to the condition that existed before the modification and would<T3>not</T3> be permitted to charge such tenants an additonal securitydeposit. The Department specifically invites public comment on these issues.Paragraph (b) contains two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (a). The first example involves a tenant who seeks the permissionof a landlord to install grab bars in the bathroom. The second examplerelates to an applicant for rental housing who has a child who uses a wheelchairand seeks the permission of the landlord to widen the bathroom door. Bothexamples are close adaptations of the examples specifically discussed bySenators Kennedy and Specter during Senate debate of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct. 134 Cong. Rec. S10548 (daily ed. August 2, 1988). These examples areillustrative and not exhaustive. Section 100.204 Reasonable accommodations. Section 100.204 implements section 804(f)(3)(B) of the Fair Housing Actwhich makes it unlawful to refuse to make reasonable accommodations inrules, policies, practices, or services if necessasry to afford a personwith handicaps equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling. The conceptof ``reasonable accommodation'' is also used in regulations and case lawinterpreting section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. <T3>See, </T3>28 CFR 41.53; 24 CFR 8.11 and 8.33; <T3>Southeastern Community College v. Davis,</T3> 442 U.S. 397 (1979);<T3>Alexander v. Choate, </T3>469 U.S. 287 (1985). The legislative historyof the Fair Housing Amendments Act indicates that this was the source fromwhich the concept of ``reasonable accommodation'' was drawn. House Reportat 25; 134 Cong. Rec. H4923 (daily ed. June 29, 1988) (statement of Rep.Owens). The term ``reasonable'' means that ``feasible, practical modifications''must be made, ``but that extreme, infeasible modifications are not required.''134 Cong. Rec. H4923 (daily ed. June 29, 1988) (statement of Rep. Owens).Paragraph (b) illustrates the application of paragraph (a) with two examplesof reasonable accommodations. Section 100.205 Design and construction requirements. Section 100.205 implements section 804(f)(3)(C) of the Fair Housing Actwhich places ``modest accessibility requirements on `covered multifamilydwellings' designed and built for first occupancy 30 months after enactment.''House report at 25. The term ``covered multifamily dwellings'' means buildings consisting of4 or more dwelling units if the building has one or more elevators and``ground floor'' dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units. The ground floor is any floor of a building with a buildingentrance on an accessible route. A building may have more than one groundfloor. A ``building'' is a structure, facility or the portion thereof thatcontains one or more dwelling units. Paragraph (a) requires that ``covered multifamily dwellings'' for firstoccupancy after March 13, 1991 be designed and constructed to have at leastone building entrance on an accessible route unless it is impractical todo so because of the terrain or unusual characteristics of the site. Thelegisltative history makes it clear that Congress ``was sensitive to thepossibility that certain natural terrain may pose unique building problems.''House Report at 27. For example, some sites cannot be made accessible becauseof hilly terrain. In some locales it is common to construct housing onstilts because of flooding problems. A requirement that housing on suchsites have an accessible entrance on an accessible route would be tantamountto prohibiting the construction of covered multifamily housing on suchsites. This is not what Congress intended. Thus, paragraph (a) requiresthat a ``covered multifamily dwelling'' for first occupancy after March13, 1991 have an accessible entrance on an accessible route unless it wouldbe impractical to do so. The Department expects that it will be feasibleand practical for the vast majority of covered multifamily dwellings tohave at least one accessible building entrance on an accessible route.The burden of establishing impracticality because of terrain or unusualsite characteristics is on the person or persons who designed and constructedthe housing facility. Residents of such buildings would, of course, beable to make reasonable modifications at their own expense to accommodateany other disabilities, as permitted under andSection;100.203(a).An ``entrance'' means any access point to a building or portion of a buildingused by residents for the purpose of entering. Thus, a service entrancewould not qualify as an entrance under the proposed rule because it isnot used by residents. Handicapped persons should be able to enter a newlyconstructed building through an entrance used by persons who do not havehandicaps. Paragraph (b) contains three examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (a). The first two examples are drawn from examples in the Reportof the House Committee on the Judiciary. <T3>See</T3> House Report at 27. Paragraph (c) requires that all covered multifamily dwellings for firstoccupancy after March 13, 1991 with a building entrance on an accessibleroute satisfy certain accessibility requirements set forth in paragraph(c). If, in accordance with paragraph (a), a covered multifamily dwellingdoes not have an accessible entrance on an accessible route because itis impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusual characteristicsof the site then none of the units in the building are required to meetthe accessibility requirements in paragraph (c). Since, in these relativelyinfrequent cases, persons with mobility impairments will not be able toenter the building there is no reason to require that the building andthe dwelling units therein satisfy the accessibility requirements of paragraph(c). The accessibility requirements of paragraph (c) apply to all ``coveredmultifamily dwellings'' for first occupancy after March 13, 1991 with anaccessible entrance on an accessible route. Thus, all of the dwelling unitsin elevator buildings consisting of 4 or more dwelling units must be accessible.Furthermore, the ``ground floor'' dwelling units in non-elevator buildingswith 4 or more units must be accessible. The definition of ground flooris functional: The ground floor is any floor that has an accessible entrance.That is, if persons with mobility impairments are able to enter a floorof a building through an accessible route, then the dwelling units on thatfloor must be designed and constructed in accordance with the accessibilityrequirements of paragraph (c). The remainder of paragraph (c) sets forth the sepcific accessibility requirementsfor covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991with a building entrance on an accessible route. The Department intendsto publish proposed accessibility guidelines to help builders understandand comply with the specific accessibility requirements of the Fair HousingAct. The guidelines would, of course, not be mandatory. Rather, they wouldprovide technical assistance to persons who must comply with paragraph(c). Paragraph (c)(1) requires that the public and common use areas be readilyaccessible to and usable by handicapped persons. A common use area, asthat term is defined in andSection; 100.201, means interior and exteriorrooms, spaces or elements of a building that are made available for theuse of residents of a building or the guests thereof. This provision meansthat hallways, lounges, lobbies, laundry rooms, refuse rooms and passagewaysamong and between buildings and other common areas and facilities not containbarriers to entrance and use by persons with disabilities. House Reportat 26. Public use areas include interior or exterior rooms or spaces ofa building that are made available to the general public. Public use maybe provided at a building that is privately or publicly owned. Paragraph(c)(1) further requires that one regular entrance to public and commonuse areas be accessible to persons with handicaps for the same purposefor which it is used by others. Thus, paragraph (c)(1) does not requirethat all entrances be made accessible to handicapped persons. Moreover,in a building without an elevator, only the public and common use areason the ``ground floor'' of the building need be made accessible. At leastone of each type of public and common use area available to residents ofthe building, however, must be accessible from the dwelling units on theground floor. Paragraph (C)(2) requires that all of the doors ``designed to allow passage''into and within all covered premises be sufficiently wide to allow passageby handicapped persons in wheelchairs. This requirement does not applyto doorways not designed to allow passage, such as into a linen closet,but does apply to a walk-in closet since such a doorway is designed toallow passage. House Report at 26. Paragraph (c)(3) requires that all premises within covered multifamilydwelling units contain four features of adaptive design. Under paragraph (c)(3)(i), there must be an accessible route into and throughthe covered dwelling unit. An ``accessible route'' is defined in andSection;100.201 to mean a continuous unobstructed path connecting accessible elementsand spaces in a building that can be negotiated by a person with a severedisability using a wheelchair and that is also safe for and usable by peoplewith other disabilities. Under paragraph (c)(3)(ii) light switches, electrical outlets, thermostatsand other environmental controls must be provided in accessible locations.That is, the controls must neither be too high or too low. This provisionis not intended to increase the risk of danger to others or necessarilyto require waist high controls. House Report at 26-27. Under paragraph (c)(3)(iii), bathroom walls must be reinforced to allowlater installation of grap bars around the toilet, tub, shower stall andshower seat, where such facilities are provided. Under paragraph (c)(3)(iv), the kitchens and bathrooms in covered dwellingunits must be ``usable * * * such that an individual in a wheelchair canmaneuver about the space.'' Paragraph (c)(3)(iv) would <T3>not</T3> require that fixtures, cabinetry or plumbing be adjustable.<T3>Id.</T3> 134 Cong. Rec. S10535 (daily ed. August 2, 1988) (statementof Sen. Harkin). The legislative history of this provision indicates thatdesign of standard sized kitchens and bathrooms can be done in such a wayas to assure usability by persons with handicaps without necessarily increasingthe size of the space. House Report at 27. The provision requires thatsuch space be usable by persons with handicaps, but does not require thata turning radius be provided ``in every situation.'' <T3>Id.</T3> The Department will address this requirement in greater detailin accessibility guidelines to be published in the near future. These guidelinesare expected to contain examples of kitchens and bathrooms that meet the``usability'' requirement of paragraph (c)(3)(iv). Paragraph (d) provides two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (c). Paragraph (e) states that compliance with the appropriate requirementsof ANSI A117.1 suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(3).Paragraph (e) implements section 804(f)(4) of the Fair Housing Act. Thissection does not require that designers and builders follow ANSI A117.1exclusively. However, if designers and builders do follow ANSI A117.1 thenthey will have satisfied the requirements of paragraph (c)(3). House Reportat 27.  A dwelling unit that complies fully with ANSI A.117.1 goes beyond whatis required by the Fair Housing Act. For example, under ANSI A117.1 thekitchen cabinets either must be at the proper height for a person in awheelchair or must be capable of being adjusted to the proper height. Rangesand cooktops must have controls which are accessible to a person in a wheelchair.All rooms and spaces must meet minimum space allowances which allow forwheelchair turning space. As previously explained, the language of theFair Housing Act and its legislative history make it plain that the Actdoes not require these features of accessibility or adaptability.Paragraphs (f) and (g) implement the provisions of the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct designed to encourage enforcement by the States and local governmentsof the provisions of the Act regarding adaptability and accessibility requirementsfor newly constructed multifamily dwellings. 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (dailyed. August 1, 1988) (Memorandum of Senators Kennedy and Specter RegardingTheir Substitute Amendment).Paragraph (f) states that compliance with a duly enacted law of a Stateor unit of general local government that includes the requirements of paragraphs(a) and (c) satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c).Paragraph (g)(1) explains that it is the policy of HUD to encourage Statesand units of local government to include in their existing procedures forthe review and approval of newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings,determinations as to whether the design and construction of such dwellingsare consistent with paragraphs (a) and (c). HUD will provide technicalassistance to States and localities, and to private individuals to assistthem in interpreting the new construction requirements. The accessibilityguidelines which the Department intends to propose in the near future willprovide technical assistance.Paragraph (g)(2) states that a State or unit of general local governmentmay review and approve newly constructed multifamily dwellings for thepurpose of making determinations as to whether the requirements of paragraphs(a) and (c) are met.Paragraph (h) states that determinations of compliance or noncomplianceby a State or a unit of general local government under paragraph (f) or(g) are not conclusive in enforcement proceedings under the Fair HousingAmendments Act.Paragraph (i) states that subpart D does not invalidate or limit any lawof a State or political subdivision of a State that requires dwellingsto be designed and constructed in a manner that affords handicapped personsgreater access than is required by this subpart. Many states and localitieshave enacted accessibility and equal opportunity requirements for personswith disabilities. The Fair Housing Act establishes minimum standards foraccessibility, and does not supplant or replace State or local laws whichimpose higher standards. House Report at 28.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons</ITAG>Section 100.300 Purpose.The Fair Housing Amendments Act exempts ``housing for older persons'' fromthe prohibitions against discrimination because of familial status. Thepurpose of the prohibitions against discrimination because of familialstatus and the housing for older persons exemption is to protect familieswith children from discrimination in housing without unfairly limitinghousing choices for elderly persons. 134 Cong. Rec. S10465-66 (daily ed.August 1, 1988) (statement of Sen. Karnes). Section 100.300 explains thatthe purpose of subpart E is to effectuate the housing for older personsexemption in the Fair Housing Amendments Act.Section 100.301 Housing for older persons exemption.Section 100.301 provides the analytical framework for subpart E. Paragraph(a) implements the second sentence of section 807(b)(1) of the Fair HousingAct, as amended. It states that the prohibitions against discriminationbecause of familial status in this part do not apply to housing which satisfiesthe requirements of andSection;andSection; 100.302 (``<T3>State and Federal Elderly Housing Programs''</T3>), 100.303 (``<T3>62 or Over Housing''</T3>), or 100.304 (``<T3>55 or Over Housing''</T3>).Paragraph (b) states that nothing in this part limits the applicabilityof any reasonable local, State, or Federal restrictions regarding the maximumnumber of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling. Paragraph (b) implementsthe first sentence section 807(b)(1) of the Fair Housing Act. Many jurisdictionslimit the number of occupants per unit based on a minimum number of squarefeet in the unit or the sleeping areas of the unit; HUD also enforces occupancystandards in its assisted housing programs. Reasonable limitations do notviolate the Fair Housing Act as long as they apply equally to all occupants.Section 100.302 State and Federal elderly housing programs.Section 100.302 implements section 807(b)(2)(a) of the Fair Housing Act.Section 100.302 exempts housing provided under any Federal or State programthat the Secretary determines is specifically designed and operated toassist elderly persons, as defined in the State or Federal program fromthe prohibitions against discrimination because of familial status in thispart.For example, section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959, 12 U.S.C. 1701 (``section202''), provides Federal financial assistance to private sponsors who providehousing for elderly or handicapped persons. There are three distinct categoriesof eligible handicapped persons in the section 202 program, those who arephysically handicapped; developmentally disabled; and chronically mentallyill. Thus, including elderly persons (age 62 or over) there are actuallyfour separate groups of persons eligible for section 202 assistance, andeach group has distinct needs. Accordingly, section 202 developments arecustom-tailored to the specific client population or populations the sponsorwas approved by HUD to serve. For instance, many section 202 projects arelawfully limited to elderly (62 years of age or older) and physically handicappedpersons. It follows that persons who are not elderly or physically handicappedare not eligible for projects designed and approved for elderly and physicallyhandicapped persons and cannot be admitted to them. Section 100.302 makesit clear that such a policy does not violate the Fair Housing Act becausethe housing is a Federal program specifically designed and operated toassist elderly persons. State programs determined by the Secretary to bespecifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons are also exemptfrom the prohibitions against discrimination in this part. Section 100.303 62 or over housing.Section 807(f)(2)(B) exempts housing intended for, and solely occupiedby, persons 62 years of age or older. If <T3>all </T3>of the persons occupying a housing facility are 62 or older,then that housing facility is exempt from the prohibitions against discriminationbecause of familial status in this part, regardless of what other featuresthe housing may or may not have. 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (daily ed. August1, 1988) (Memorandum of Sens. Kennedy and Specter Regarding Their SubstituteAmendment). <T3>See also, </T3>134 Cong. Rec. S10466 (daily ed. August 1, 1988) (statementof Sen. Karnes) (``Elderly housing is . . . exempted . . . from the requirementto admit families with children if no one in the building is under 62 yearsof age . . .'').Paragraph (a)(1) contains a transition provision to ensure that the interestsof current residents of housing that excludes children will not be undulydisturbed by the Fair Housing Amendments Act. 134 Cong. Rec. S10456 (dailyed. August 1, 1988) (Memorandum of Sens. Kennedy and Specter RegardingTheir Substitute Amendment). It provides that housing satisfies the requirementsof andSection; 103.303 even though three persons residing in such housingon September 13, 1988 who are under 62 years of age, <T3>provided that </T3>all new occupants thereafter are persons 62 yearsof age or older. Section 6(d) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that housing shallnot fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by reasonof ``persons residing in such housing <T3>as of the date of enactment of this Act </T3>[<T3>i.e., </T3>September 13, 1988]'' who do not meet the age requirementsof the housing for older persons exemption, provided that all new occupantsmeet the age requirements of the housing for older persons exemption. Section13(a) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act provides that ``[t]his Act andthe Amendments made by this Act shall take effect on the 180th day beginningafter the date of enactment of this Act.'' The date described in section13(a) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act is March 12, 1989. This presentsa question as to whether the appropriate date for the transition provisionin andSection; 100.303(a)(1) is September 13, 1988 or March 12, 1989. Ifsection 6(d) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act is applied literally thenhousing providers, in order to avail themselves of this transition provision,had to begin filling units in accordance with the age requirements of thehousing for older persons exemption on September 13, 1988, which is beforethe effective date of the Act. The proposed rule follows the plain meaning of section 6(d) of the FairHousing Amendments Act. Thus, paragraph (a)(1) of andSection;100.303 providesthat housing satisfies the requirements of the housing for older personsexemption even though there were persons on September 13, 1988 who didnot meet the age requirements, provided that new occupants after September13, 1988 satisfy the applicable age requirements. The Department has proposedthis date instead of the effective date in section 13(a) of the Fair HousingAmendments Act (March 12, 1989) because the Department believes that thegeneral language in section 13(a) was not intended to render the more specificlanguage in section 6(d) a nullity. Moreover, under this interpretationof the Act there is not inconsistency between sections 6(d) and 13(a) ofthe Fair Housing Act. The Act will take effect on March 12, 1989 and, byits terms, the housing for older persons exemption will be satisfied eventhough, on September 13, 1988, there were persons in the housing facilitywho did not meet the age requirements, provided that all new occupantsconcepts after September 13, 1988 meet the age requirements. The same date(September 13, 1988) is, for the same reasons, referenced in andSection;100.304(d)(1)(``<T3>55 or Over Housing</T3>''). This interpretation of the Act may seem unduly restrictive because, sincethe date of enactment, some owners may have already filled vacant unitsin a manner which substantially restricts them from converting their propertyto housing for older persons within the meaning of the Act. Such an interpretationis driven by the statutory language. The transition provision in Section805(b)(3) of the statute relating to persons residing in a housing facilitywho do not meet the age restrictions for housing for older persons is expresslylimited to ``persons residing in such housing as of the date of enactmentof this Act.'' In view of the consequences of this interpretation of theAct, the Department invites public comment on this issue. Paragraph (a)(2) states that housing satisfies the requirements of andSection;100.303even though there are occupied units (at any time), provided that suchunits are reserved for occupancy by persons 62 years of age or over. Paragraph (b) contains two examples that illustrate the application ofparagraph (a). The purpose of the first example is to show that all personsoccupying the housing in question must be 62 years of age or older. Thepresence of one person per unit 62 years of age or older is not sufficientto qualify a housing facility for this exemption to the prohibition ofdiscrimination against families with children. However, a housing facilitythat does not qualify for the ``62 or over'' exemption in andSection; 100.303may nonetheless qualify for the ``55 or over exemption'' in andSection; 100.304.The second example in paragraph (b) illustrates the application of paragraphs(a)(1) and (a)(2). Section 100.304 55 or over housing. Section 100.304 implements section 807(b)(2)(C) of the Fair Housing Actwhich exempts housing communities intended and operated for occupancy byat least one person 55 years of age or over per unit that satisfy certaincriteria. Paragraph (a) exempts from the prohibitions against discrimination becauseof familial status in this part housing intended and operated for occupancyby at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit <T3>provided </T3>the housing satisfies the requirements of andSection; 100.304(b)(1)<T3>or </T3>(b)(2) <T3>and </T3>the requirements of andSection; 100.304(c). Paragraph (b)(1) is satisfied if the housing facility has significant facilitiesand services specifically designed to meet the physical and social needsof older persons. ``Significant facilities and services specifically designedto meet the physical or social needs of older persons'' include an accessiblephysical environment, congregate dining facilities, social and recreationalprograms, emergency and preventive health care or programs, continuingeducation, welfare, information and counseling, recreational, homemaker,outside maintenance and referral services, transportation to facilitateaccess to social services, and services designed to encourage and assistresidents to use the services and facilities available to them. The physical environment of the housing facility is one factor the Departmentmay consider in determining whether a housing facility has significantfacilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or socialneeds of older persons. While residents of a housing facility for persons55 years old or older may generally be of good health when they enter adevelopment, they are likely to experience a diminution of physical capacityas the years pass. A physical environment designed to accommodate the changingneeds of its residents might include hand rails along steps and interiorhallways to reduce the risk of falls, reinforcement for grab bars in bathrooms,routes that allow the use of wheelchairs, canes and walkers, lever typedoorknobs and single lever faucets. House Report at 32. All of these featuresneed not be present for a housing facility to be considered as having beendesigned to accommodate the changing needs of its residents. The list of significant facilities and services designed to meet the socialneeds of older persons in the proposed rule is drawn from section 202(f)of the Housing Act of 1959, 12 U.S.C. 1701q, listing examples of facilitiesand services for older persons. The House Report (at p. 32) relies heavilyupon the listing in section 202(f) of the Housing Act of 1959 in its discussionof such facilities. The provision of significant facilities and servicesdesigned to meet the social needs of older persons may extend the periodof independence of older persons and enhance the quality of their lives.House Report at 31-32.The facilities and services designed to meet the physical and social needsof older persons must be ``significant'' in order to satisfy paragraph(b)(1). For example, the installation of a ramp at the front entrance ofa housing facility would not constitute a ``significant'' facility designedto meet the physical needs of older persons. Similarly, the provision ofminor amenities, such as putting a couch in a laundry room and labelingit a recreation center would not constitute a ``significant'' facilitydesigned to meet the social needs of older persons. House Report at 32.The listing of facilities and services in paragraph (b)(1) is not exclusivenor is a facility required to have all of the items listed.A housing facility may qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemption even ifit does not satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b)(1). Under paragraph(b)(2), a housing facility that does not provide significant facilitiesand services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needsof older persons may nonetheless qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemption.Such a housing facility must demonstrate that it is not practicable forit to provide significant facilities and services designed to meet thephysical and social needs of older persons and also demonstrate that thehousing facility is necessary to provide important housing opportunitiesfor older persons.The following factors, among others, are relevant in determining whethera housing facility satisfies the requirements of paragraph (b)(2)_(i) Whether the owner or manager of the housing facility has endeavoredto provide significant facilities and services designed to meet the physicaland social needs of older persons.(ii) The cost of providing such services, including the availability ofsuch services at little or no cost to the owners or managers of the facility.(iii) The amount of rent charged, if the dwellings are rented. The priceof the dwellings, if they are offered for sale.(iv) The income range of the residents of the housing facility.(v) The demand for housing for older persons in the relevant geographicarea.(vi) The range of housing choices for older persons in the relevant geographicarea.(vii) The availability of other similarly priced housing for older personsin the relevant geographic area.(viii) The vacancy rate of the housing facility. For example, a housingfacility satisfies paragraph (b)(2) if the housing facility can demonstratethat the cost of providing significant facilities and services designedto meet the physical or social needs of older persons would result in deprivinglow- and moderate-income persons of needed and desired housing. 134 Cong.Rec. S10549 (daily ed. August 2, 1988) (statement of Sen. Kennedy).In order to qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemption a housing facility,in addition to satisfying the requirements of paragraph (b)(1) <T3>or</T3> (b)(2) must also satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(1)and (c)(2).Paragraph (c)(1) requires that at least 80% of the units in the housingfacility be occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older perunit <T3>except that</T3> a newly constructed housing facility for first occupancyafter March 12, 1989 need not comply with paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionuntil 25% of the units in the facility are occupied. The exception forpartially occupied newly constructed housing facilities is designed todeal with the practical problem of filling units in a new and unoccupiedhousing facility in a reasonable manner, consistent with the ``55 or over''exemption. For example, a large newly constructed housing facility thatintends to qualify for the exemption should not lose its right to claimthe exemption simply because the first unit happens to be filled with personsall of whom are under 55 years of age. However, once a reasonable percentageof units has been filled the housing facility can reasonably be expectedto comply with the percentage requirement in paragraph (c)(1). The proposedrule would require a housing facility to comply with the 80% requirementin paragraph (c)(1) once 25% of the units in the housing facility havebeen filled. The Department invites comment on the question of whetherthe 25% point is too high or too low.Under paragraph (c)(2), the owner or manager of a housing facility mustalso publish and adhere to policies and procedures which demonstrate anintent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons 55 yearsof age or older. The following factors, among others, are relevant in determiningwhether the owner or manager of a housing facility has complied with therequirements of paragraph (c)(2): (i) The manner in which the housing facility is described to prospectiveresidents. (ii) The nature of any advertising designed to attract prospective residents.(iii) Age verification procedures. (iv) Lease provisions. (v) Written rules and regulations. (vi) Actual practices of the owner or manager in enforcing relevant leaseprovisions and relevant rules or regulations. Paragraph (d)(1) states that housing satisfies the requirements of thissection even though on September 13, 1988, under 80% of the occupied unitsin the housing facility are occupied by at least one person 55 years ofage or older per unit, provided that at least 80% of the units that arenewly occupied after September 13, 1988 are occupied by at least one person55 years of age or older. Paragraph (d)(1), like paragraph (a)(1) of andSection;100.303, is a transition provision to ensure that the interests of currentresidents of housing that excludes children will not be be unduly disturbedby the Fair Housing Amendments Act. Under paragraph (d)(2), housing satisfies the requirements of $100.304even though there are unoccupied units, provided that at least 80% of suchunits are reserved for occupancy by at least one person 55 years of ageof over. Paragraph (e) contains three examples that illustrate the application ofandSection; 100.304.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion or Intimidation </ITAG>Section 100.400Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation. The Fair Housing Amendments Act revises the statutory definition of discriminatoryhousing practices in the Fair Housing Act to include actions to intimidate,coerce or interfere with persons engaged in activities protected underthe Fair Housing Act. Under Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968such actions were violations of the law, but vindication of these rightscould be obtained only through the initiation of a private civil actionor through an action brought by the Attorney General in Federal districtcourt. The inclusion of interference, coercion and initimidation as discriminatoryhousing practices means that allegations that such conduct has occurred,or is about to occur because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familiarstatus, or national origin can be the subject of an administrative complaintunder the Fair Housing Act. This subpart provides the interpretation ofthe Department as to the conduct which constitutes a discriminatory housingpractice in this area. Section 100.400(b) states that the Fair Housing Act makes it unlawful tocoerce, intimidate, threaten or interfere with any person in the exerciseor enjoyment of, or on account of that person having exercised or enjoyed,or on account of that person having aided or encouraged any other personin the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by thispart. The illustrations in this section indicate any type of activity can constitutea discriminatory housing practice. Threatening or intimidating actionsinclude acts against the possessions of persons such as damage to automobilesor vandalism which limits a person's ability to have full enjoyment ofa dwelling. Threatening or intimidating actions include acts against thepossessions of persons such as damage to automobiles or other acts of vandalismwhich limit a person's ability to have full enjoyment of a dwelling. Inaddition, the protections against discrimination reach any person, includingpersons selling or renting dwellings and persons engaged in activitiespromoting fair housing. Further, persons who are not involved in any aspectof the sale or rental of a dwelling are nonetheless prohibited from engagingin conduct to coerce, intimidate, threaten or interefere with persons inconnection with protected activities or to retaliate against any personinvolved in any way in proceeding under the Fair Housing Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 103_FAIR HOUSING COMPLAINT PROCESSING</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions</ITAG>Section 103.1 Purpose and applicability.Proposed Part 103 would contain the procedures established by the Departmentfor the investigation and conciliation of complaints under section 810of the Act, as amended by the 1988 Amendments. Part 105 would be retainedto govern the investigation and conciliation of complaints under section810 of the Act as it existed before the 1988 Amendments. (andSection;andSection;103.1 and 105.1)Except for complaints that involve allegations of discriminatory housingpractices that occur before and continue after the effective date of the1988 Amendments (March 12, 1989), the proposed rule provides that:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices that occurredbefore the effective date of the 1988 Amendments would be governed by theprocedures in Part 105. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Complaints alleging discriminatory housing practices that occur onor after the effective date of the 1988 Amendments would be governed bythe procedures in Part 103.</ITAG>To the extent that complaints allege violations that occur before and continueafter the effective date of the 1988 Amendments, complainants should beaccorded the full range of remedies provided under the 1988 Amendments.(For example, an applicant for rental housing who was unlawfully excludedbefore the effective date of the Act may continue to be unlawfully excludedafter the effective date.) Accordingly, andSection; 103.1(b)(1)(i) providesthat complaints filed after March 12, 1989 alleging such continuing discriminatoryhousing practices would be processed under Part 103. The proposed ruleat andSection; 105.81 would ensure that complainants who filed complaintsbefore March 12, 1989 alleging such continuing discriminatory housing practiceswill have an opportunity to have their complaints processed under the newPart 103 procedures. While such complaints initially would be processedunder Part 105, if during the investigation or conciliation of the complaintthe Department determines that the complaint involves an alleged discriminatoryhousing practice that continues after March 12, 1989, the Department willprovide the complainant with a reasonable opportunity to elect to havethe complaint processed under Part 103 in lieu of the Part 105 procedures.This notice would describe the procedures available to the complainantunder each part. If the complainant makes the election, HUD would notifythe respondent of the election and process the complaint under Part 103.(Also see andSection;andSection; 103.1 and 105.1.)This section would also include a provision requiring HUD to conduct investigationsand conciliations in accordance with section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794). A related amendment to existing Part 105 isalso proposed. Section 103.9 Definitions.The proposed rule would adopt the definitions currently contained in Part105 with the following major changes:<ITAG tagnum="15">_The proposed definition of ``discriminatory housing practice'' wouldinclude acts that are unlawful under section 818 of the Act. Section 818makes it unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with anyperson in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his having aidedor encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any rightgranted or protected by section 804, 805 or 806 of the Act. Before the1988 Amendments, this section could only be enforced by an appropriatecivil action. This expanded definition of discriminatory housing practicewould permit the enforcement of this section through complaints filed withHUD. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_``Complainant'', as defined under the proposed rule, would implementsections 802(j) and 810(a)(1)(A)(i) of the Act by clarifying that any person,</ITAG><T3>including HUD, </T3>may file a complaint under Part 103.<ITAG tagnum="15">_New definitions added to section 802 of the Act by the 1988 Amendmentsincluding ``aggrieved person'', ``conciliation'', ``conciliation agreement''and ``respondent'' would be added and other miscellaneous definitions including``substantially equivalent State or local agency'', ``Attorney General'',and ``General Counsel'' would be included for clarity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Complaints</ITAG>Subpart B of Part 103 would contain the procedures for the filing of complaintsand answers. These procedures reflect the current requirements for thefiling of complaints and answers described in Part 105 with the followingmajor revisions:Section 103.15 Who may file complaints. As required by section 810(a)(1)(A)(i) of the Act, complainants may submitcomplaints not later than one year after an alleged discriminatory housingpractice has occurred or terminated. This language is intended to reaffirmthe concept of continuing violations, under which the statute of limitationsis measured from the date of the last asserted occurrence of the unlawfulpractice. The one-year limitation represents an increase from the pre-1988Amendment limitation of 180 days, but is less than the two-year periodprovided for civil cases. See H. R. Rep. No. 711, 100th Cong., 2d Sess.33 (1988). Section 103.45 Service of notice on aggrieved person. Proposed andSection; 103.45 implements section 810(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Actwhich requires the Secretary to serve notice upon the aggrieved personacknowledging the filing of a complaint and advising the person of thetime limits and choice of forums provided under Title VIII. In accordancewith this statutory requirement, the proposed rule would require the AssistantSecretary to notify each aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaintwas filed. The notice would: (1) Acknowledge the filing of the complaintand state the date that the complaint was accepted for filing; (2) includea copy of the complaint; (3) advise the person of the time limits applicableto complaint processing and of the procedural rights and obligations ofthe aggrieved person under Parts 103 and 104; (4) advise the aggrievedperson of the right to commence a civil action under section 813 of theAct, not later than two years after the occurrence or termination of thealleged discriminatory housing practice; and (5) advise the aggrieved personthat retaliation against a person because he or she made a complaint, ortestified, assisted, or participated in an investigation or conciliationunder Part 103 or an administrative proceeding under Part 104, is a discriminatoryhousing practice prohibited under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act.Section 103.50 Notification of respondent; joinder of additional or substituterespondents. Section 810(a)(1)(B)(ii) of the Act requires the Secretary to serve a noticeon the respondent within 10 days of the filing of the complaint (or within10 days of the identification of a substitute or additional respondent).In accordance with these provisions, proposed andSection; 103.50 would requirethe Assistant Secretary to serve a notice on the respondent. The noticewould: (1) Identify the alleged discriminatory housing practice upon whichthe complaint is based and include a copy of the complaint; (2) state thedate that the complaint was accepted for filing; (3) advise the respondentof the time limits applicable to complaint processing under Part 103 andof the procedural rights and obligations of the respondent under Parts103 and 104, including the opportunity to submit an answer; (4) notifythe respondent of the aggrieved person's right to commence a civil actionunder section 813 of the Act; (5) if the respondent was not named in thecomplaint, but is being joined as an additional or substitute respondent,explain the basis for HUD's belief that the joined person is properly joined(see section 810(a)(2) of the Act); and (6) advise the respondent thatretaliation against a person because he or she made a complaint, or testified,assisted or participated in an investigation or conciliation under Part103 or an administrative proceeding under Part 104, is a discriminatoryhousing practice under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act. Section 103.55 Answer to complaint. Under existing procedures, respondents are given only seven days to answera complaint. Section 810(a)(1)(B)(iii) of the Act provides that each respondentmay file an answer to the complaint not later than 10 days from the dateof receipt of the notice. Proposed andSection; 103.55 reflects this increasedtime period. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies</ITAG>Section103.100 Notification and referral to substantially equivalent State orlocal agencies. Section 810(f)(1) of the Act provides: ``whenever a complaint alleges adiscriminatory housing practice_(A) Within the jurisdiction of a Stateor local public agency; and (B) as to which such agency has been certifiedby the Secretary under this subsection; the Secretary shall refer the complaintto that cetified agency before taking any action with respect to the complaint.''Proposed andSection; 103.100 would state the procedures for the notificationand referral of complaints to substantially equivalent State and localagencies; and would provide for the notification of the aggrieved personand the respondent of the referral, including a notification of the rightto file a civil action under section 813 of the Act. Under andSection; 103.9, HUD is permitted to file complaints alleging discriminatoryhousing practices. To ensure that HUD-initiated complaints will be investigatedand conciliated by HUD, the memorandum of understanding executed by HUDand the substantially equivalent State or local agency will include theagency's consent to HUD's processing of the complaint. Section 103.105 Cessation of action on referred complaints. Proposed andSection; 103.105 would address HUD's responsibilities regardingreferred complaints. As required under section 810(f)(2) of the Act, aftera complaint is referred, the Assistant Secretary shall not take any furtheraction with respect to the complaint, except reactivation as describedbelow. The proposed rule would provide, however, that the referral of thecomplaint to a substantially equivalent State or local agency would notprohibit the Assistant Secretary from taking appropriate actions underother civil rights authorities applicable to departmental programs. Section 103.110 Reactivation of referred complaints. In accordance with section 810(f)(2) of the Act, proposed andSection; 103.110would permit HUD to reactivate a complaint referred to a substantiallyequivalent State or local agency if:<ITAG tagnum="15">_The substantially equivalent State or local agency consents to thereactivation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_The Assistant Secretary determines that the agency no longer qualifiesfor recognition as a substantially equivalent State or local agency andmay not accept interim referrals with respect to the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_The substantially equivalent State or local agency has failed tocommence proceedings with respect to the complaint within 30 days of thedate that the agency received the notification and referral of the complaint,or the agency commenced proceedings within this 30-day period, but theAssistant Secretary determines that the agency has failed to carry theproceedings forward with reasonable promptness. HUD would not reactivatea complaint under these conditions, however, until the appropriate HUDRegional Office has conferred with the agency to determine the reason forthe delay in the processing of the complaint. If the Assistant Secretarybelieves that the agency will proceed expeditiously following the conference,HUD may leave the complaint with the agency for a reasonable time. </ITAG>Before the 1988 Amendments, section 810(d) of the Act permitted the reactivationof complaints where the Secretary certifies that ``in his judgment, underthe circumstance of the particular case, the protection of the rights ofthe parties or the interests of justice requires such actions.'' This statutorybasis for reactivation of complaints was not retained in the new act. Accordingly,reactivation on this basis would not be permitted under Part 103. The 1988 Amendments permit HUD to make referrals for up to 48 months followingthe date of enactment to agencies that are certified (including agenciesthat are certified for interim referrals under Part 115) on the day beforeenactment of the 1988 Amendments. It is unlikely that such agencies willimmediately provide the full range of remedies accorded complainants underthe 1988 Amendments. However, given the limited statutory authorizationfor reactivation provided under section 810(f)(2) of the Act, it does notappear that HUD has the authority to reactivate such complaints to providethe complainant with the full range of remedies available under the 1988Amendments. However, where an agency consents, HUD may resume processingof a complaint.Section 103.115 Notification upon reactivation. Proposed andSection;103.115 would require the Assistant Secretary to notifythe substantially equivalent of State or local agency, the aggrieved personand the respondent of the reactivation of a complaint. The notificationwould advise the aggrieved person and the respondent of the time limitsapplicable to complaint processing and of the procedural rights and obligationsof the aggrieved person and respondent under Parts 103 and 104. The notificationwould also describe the aggrieved person's right to commence a civil actionunder section 813 of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures </ITAG>Section 103.200 Investigations.Under andSection;103.200 of the proposed rule, investigations would be initiatedupon the filing of a complaint (see section 810(a)(1)(B)(iv) of the Act).The purposes of such investigations would be to obtain information concerningthe events or transactions that relate to the alleged discriminatory housingpractice identified in the complaint; to document the policies and practicesof the respondent involved in the alleged discriminatory housing practiceraised in the complaint; and to develop factual data necessary for theGeneral Counsel to make a determination whether reasonable cause existsto believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is aboutto occur, and to take other actions under Part 103. In addition to investigations initiated by complaints, the 1988 amendmentspermit HUD to initiate an investigation of housing practices to determinewhether a complaint should be filed under Subpart B (see section 810(a)(1)(A)(iii)of the Act). The proposed rule would permit such investigations upon thewritten direction of the Assistant Secretary. Section 103.205 Systemic processing. Three specialized types of investigations are available under existingPart 105. These include: systemic processing, accelerated processing, andrapid response processing. Rapid response and accelerated processing weredeveloped to enable HUD to expeditiously resolve certain types of recurringcomplaints without first conducting an extensive investigation. Since the1988 Amendments permit HUD to begin conciliation upon the filing of a complaintwithout first completing an investigation, a specific reference to thesetwo procedures in the regulation is not necessary. Provisions permittingsystemic processing, however, would be retained. Section 103.215 Conduct of investigations. Proposed andSection;103.215 would continue HUD's existing practice of seekingthe voluntary cooperation of persons to obtain access to information necessaryto further the investigation. Additionally, this rule would implement section811 of the Act which addresses the issuance of subpoenas and the conductof discovery in aid of investigations. The proposed rule would state thatthe Assistant Secretary and the respondent may conduct discovery in aidof the investigation by the same methods and to the same extent that partiesmay conduct discovery in an administrative hearing under Part 104, exceptthat the Assistant Secretary would have the power to issue subpoenas asdescribed in andSection;104.590 in support of the investigation or at therequest of the respondent. Subpoenas issued by the Assistant Secretarywould require the approval of the General Counsel before issuance. Section 103.220 Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies. Proposed andSection;103.220 reflects provisions currently contained in Part105 which permit the Assistant Secretary, in processing Fair Housing Actcomplaints, to seek the cooperation and utilize the services of State andlocal agencies and of other appropriate Federal agencies. To ensure thatother Federal agencies are aware of their responsibility under section808(d) and (e) of the Act and under Executive Order No. 12259, the proposedrule would add that Federal agencies, including agencies having regulatoryor supervisory authority over financial institutions, are responsible forensuring that their programs and activities relating to housing and urbandevelopment are administered in a manner affirmatively to further the goalof fair housing, and for cooperating with the Assistant Secretary in furtheringthe purposes of the Fair Housing Act, including investigations. Section 103.225 Completion of investigation. The Assistant Secretary is required to complete investigations within 100days after the filing of the complaint (or, when the Assistant Secretaryreactivates a complaint referred to a substantially equivalent State orlocal agency, within 100 days after service of the notification of reactivation),unless it is impracticable to do so. If the investigation cannot be completedwithin this time limit, HUD is required to notify the aggrieved personand the respondent of the reasons for the delay (see section 810(a)(1)(B)(iv)and (C) of the Act). These requirements are included in the proposed ruleat andSection;103.225. Section 103.230 Final investigative report. Section 810(b)(5)(A) of the Act requires the Secretary to prepare a finalinvestigative report at the end of the investigation. This section alsoincludes specific requirements for the contents of the investigative report.These requirements are included in the proposed rule at andSection;103.230.Under the proposed rule, the report shall contain:<ITAG tagnum="15">_The names and dates of contacts with witnesses. The proposed rulewould provide for the nondisclosure of the names of witnesses that requestanonymity, but notes that HUD may be required to disclose the names ofsuch witnesses during the course of an administrative hearing under Part104 or in a civil action under Title VIII. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_A summary and the dates of correspondence and other contacts withthe aggrieved person and the respondent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_A summary description of other pertinent records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_A summary of witness statements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Answers to interrogatories.</ITAG>The proposed rule, in accordance with section 810(d)(2) of the Act, wouldprovide that the Assistant Secretary shall make information derived froman investigation, including the final investigative report, available tothe aggrieved person and the respondent, upon request, at any time followingthe completion of the investigation. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures </ITAG>The 1988 Amendments provide for the continuation of conciliation proceduresas a primary feature of fair housing enforcement. Thus, while HUD is investigatingthe complaint, HUD will also seek to resolve the complaint and issues raisedduring the investigation of the complaint through informal negotiationsinvolving the aggrieved person, the complainant and the respondent (seedefinition of ``conciliation'' at andSection;103.9). Section 103.300 Conciliation. Proposed andSection;103.300 provides that the Assistant Secretary shall,to the extent feasible, attempt to conciliate the complaint during theperiod beginning with the filing of the complaint and ending with the filingof a charge or the dismissal of the complaint by the General Counsel. Inconducting conciliation, HUD would attempt to achieve a just resolutionof the complaint and to obtain assurances that the respondent will satisfactorilyremedy violations of the rights of the aggrieved person and take such actionas will assure the elimination of discriminatory housing practices in thefuture. Proposed andSection;103.300(c) would prohibit officers, employees, and agentsof HUD engaged in the investigation of the complaint under Part 103 fromparticipating or advising in the conciliation of the same complaint orin any factually related complaint. The purpose of this prohibition isto ensure that information gathered during the conciliation process isnot used in the investigation of the complaint. HUD recognizes, however,that there may be circumstances where a dual role for the HUD employeemay be necessary. Accordingly, andSection;103.300(c) states that the investigatormay suspend fact finding and engage in efforts to resolve the complaintby conciliation where the rights of the aggrieved person and the respondentcan be protected and the prohibitions with respect to the disclosure ofinformation obtained during conciliation can be observed. (These prohibitionsare discussed below at andSection;103.330.)   Section 103.310 Conciliation agreement; Section 103.315 Relief sought foraggrieved persons; and Section 103.320 Provisions sought for the publicinterest. If conciliation is successful, the terms of the settlement of a complaintwould be reduced to a written conciliation agreement (see andSection;103.310and definition of conciliation agreement at andSection;103.9). The agreementwould seek to protect the interests of the aggrieved person, other personssimilarly situated, and the public interest. The types of relief that maybe sought are described at andSection;andSection;103.315 and 103.320 and arethe same as those permitted under existing Part 105, except that the proposedrule would also permit binding arbitration of the dispute arising underthe complaint (see section 810(b)(3) of the Act). Section 810(b)(2) of the Act provides that a conciliation agreement shallbe an agreement between the respondent and the complainant, and shall besubject to the approval of the Secretary. The proposed rule at andSection;103.310(b)would incorporate these requirements. In addition, this rule would statethat the Assistant Secretary will indicate HUD approval of the conciliationagreement by signing the agreement. The assistant Secretary would execute(as a complainant) or approve a conciliation agreement only if: The complainantand the respondent agree to the relief accorded the aggrieved person; theagreement will adequately vindicate the public interest; and, where theAssistant Secretary is the complainant, the aggrieved person is satisfiedwith the relief provided to protect his or her interest. Propsed andSection;103.310(b)(2)would preserve the General Counsel's ability to issue a charge under andSection;103.405,where the aggrieved person and the respondent have executed a conciliationagreement that has not been approved by the Assistant Secretary. Section 103.330 Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosureof information obtained during conciliation. Section 810(d) of the Act contains prohibitions and requirements with respectto the disclosure of information. Under this section, nothing said or donein the course of conciliation may be made public or used as evidence ina subsequent proceeding under Title VIII without the written consent ofthe persons concerned. This section would be implemented at andSection;103.330with the clarifying statement that information disclosed during conciliationwould not be used in the investigation of the complaint. Section 810(b)(4) recognizes an exception to the prohibition against disclosureof conciliation information. To encourage enforcement and compliance withthe law, this section provides that conciliation agreements will be madepublic, unless the aggrieved person and the respondent request nondisclosureand the Assistant Secretary determines that disclosure is not requiredto further the purposes of the Fair Housing Act. This statutory provisionis implemented at andSection;103.330(b). This proposed rule would also permitthe publication of tabulated descriptions of the results of <T3>all </T3>conciliation efforts. Section 103.335 Review of compliance with conciliation agreements. Proposed andSection;103.335 would permit HUD to continue its current practiceof monitoring and reviewing compliance with the terms of conciliation agreements,and would implement section 810(c) of the Act. Section 810(c) providesthat whenever HUD has reasonable cause to believe that a respondent hasbreached a conciliation agreement, HUD shall refer the matter to the AttorneyGeneral with a recommendation that a civil action be filed under section814(b)(2) of the Act for the enforcement of the terms of the conciliationagreement. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge </ITAG>While conciliation will continue to be a primary feature of fair housingenforcement, the 1988 Amendments provide for a new enforcement mechanismwhen conciliation fails. This mechanism permits the Act to be enforcedby HUD in an administrative proceeding under Part 104 or, if the complainant,the aggrieved person or the respondent elects, through a civil action commencedand maintained by the Attorney General under section 812(o) of the Act.Section 103.400 Reasonable cause determination. If a conciliation agreement has not been executed by the complainant andthe respondent and approved by the Assistant Secretary, section 810(g)(1)of the Act requires HUD to determine whether reasonable cause exists tobelieve that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is aboutto occur. Under the proposed rule at andSection;103.400, the responsibilityfor this determination would be delegated to the General Counsel of HUD.As indicated in section 810(g)(1), this determination is to be based onthe totality of the factual circumstances concerning the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. Inasmuch as this determination will in the case of anelection to proceed in Federal court under andSection;103.410 form the basisfor the civil action, in making this determination the general Counselwould apply the same standard that is appropriate for a determination ofwhen to proceed with a civil action of this kind in federal court. This determination would be made within 100 days after the filing of thecomplaint (or where the Assistant Secretary has reactivated a complaintreferred to a substantially equivalent State or local agency, within 100days after service of the notice of reactivation), unless it is impracticableto do so. If the determination cannot be made within this time period,HUD would notify the aggrieved person and the respondent of the reasonsfor the delay (see section 810(g)(1) of the Act). The proposed rule provides that the investigation would remain open untila reasonable cause determination is made (see andSection;103.225). This permitsthe General Counsel to request that the Assistant Secretary make a furtherinvestigation, where the investigative report is insufficient to determinewhether reasonable cause exists. Where appropriate, the General Counselmay make direct inquiries to supplement the investigation. If the General Counsel determines that reasonable cause exists, section810(g)(2)(A) of the Act requires the immediate issuance of a charge onbehalf of the aggrieved person. The charge forms the basis for furtheradministrative proceedings or a civil action under section 812(o) of theAct. A charge would not, however, be issued if the matter involves thelegality of a State or local zoning or other land use law or ordinance,since HUD is required to refer such matters to the Attorney General forappropriate action under section 814(b)(1) of the Act (see the proposedrule at andSection;103.400(a)(1)). Furthermore, section 810(g)(4) of theAct prohibits the issuance of a charge after the beginning of a trial ina civil action commenced by the aggrieved person under an Act of Congressor a State law, seeking relief with respect to the discriminatory housingpractice (see proposed rule at andSection;103.400(b)).   If the General Counsel determines that no reasonable cause exists, section810(g)(3) of the Act requires the dismissal of the complaint and publicdisclosure of the dismissal. The proposed rule at andSection; 103.400(a)(2)would state that HUD shall notify the aggrieved person and the respondentof such a dismissal and shall make public disclosure of the dismissal.The Department notes that the dismissal of a complaint under this sectionwould not preclude the filing of a new complaint based on newly discoveredor previously unavailable information, provided the statutory one-yeartime limit for the filing of the complaint is met.Section 103.405 Issuance of charge.Section 810(g)(2)(B) of the Act provides that the charge: Shall consistof a short and plain statement of the facts upon which HUD has found reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur; shall be based on the final investigative report; andneed not be limited to the facts or grounds alleged in the complaint. Thisstatutory language is reflected in andSection; 103.405(a).Within three days of the issuance of the charge, the General Counsel would:(1) Obtain a time and a place for an administrative hearing from the ChiefDocket Clerk in the Office of Administrative Law Judges; (2) file and servethe charge along with notifications concerning the rights of the complaint;the respondent, and the aggrieved person to elect to have the claims assertedin the charge decided in an administrative hearing or civil action (thecontents of the notification and requirements for service of the chargeare more fully described below); and (3) notify the Assisant Secretaryof the filing of the charge (see proposed andSection; 103.405(b)).Section 103.410 Election of administrative hearing or civil action.The claims asserted in the charge will be decided either in a civil actionunder section 812(o) of the Act or in an administrative proceeding underPart 104. In accordance with section 812(a) of the Act, proposed andSection;103.410 provides that upon the issuance of a charge, the complainant (includingthe General Counsel, if HUD filed the complaint), the respondent, or theaggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed may elect thecivil action. If none of the parties elects the civil action, the GeneralCounsel would maintain an administrative proceeding under Part 104 basedon the charge. If an election is made, the General Counsel would promptlynotify and authorize the Attorney General to commence and maintain a civilaction under section 812(o) of the Act on behalf of the aggrieved personin an appropriate United States District Court. The notification and authorizationwould include the transmission of the file in the case, including a copyof the final investigative report and the charge, to the Attorney General.The election must be made not later than 20 days after the receipt of serviceof the charge, or in the case of the General Counsel, not later than 20days after service. The notice of the election must be filed with the ChiefDocket Clerk in HUD's Office of Administrative Law Judges and served onthe General Counsel, the respondent, and the aggrieved persons on whosebehalf the complaint was filed. The notification shall be filed and servedin accordance with the procedures established under Part 104.The General Counsel would be available for consultation concerning anylegal issues raised by the Attorney General regarding how best to proceedin the event that commencement of a civil action would implicate Rule 11of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Other Actions by the Department</ITAG>Section 103.500 Promptjudicial action.Proposed andSection; 103.500 would implement section 810(e) of the Act. Ifat any time following the filing of a complaint, the General Counsel concludesthat prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposes of Part103 or 104, the General Counsel would request that the Attorney Generalcommence a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminary reliefpending the final disposition of the complaint. Before making the determinationto request such action the proposed rule also requires the General Counselto consult with the Assistant Attorney General for the Civil Rights Division.Inasmuch as under section 810(e) of the Act it is incumbent upon the AttorneyGeneral to promptly commence an action upon receipt of such a request andin view of the Assistant Attorney General's prior experience in seekingsuch relief in different factual situations and before different forums,such prior consultation is appropriate and desirable. The commencementof the civil action would not affect the initiation or administrative proceedingsunder Part 103 or 104.Paragraph (b) of this proposed rule would require the General Counsel totransmit information to the Attorney General and to State and local governmentallicensing or supervisory authorities, as appropriate, whenever the GeneralCounsel has a reason to believe that a basis exists for the commencementof proceedings under section 814(a) of the Act (Pattern or Practice Cases),proceedings under section 814(c) of the Act (Enforcement of Subpoenas),or proceedings by any governmental licensing or supervisory authority.Section 103.510 Other action by HUD. Proposed andSection; 103.510 would address other actions that HUD may takewith respect to matters asserted in a complaint. These would include: (1)The referral of matters to the Attorney General for appropriate action(e.g., enforcement of criminal penalties, under section 811(c) of the Act);the initiation of debarment proceedings or other action leading to theimposition of administrative sanctions; the initiation of proceedings underother civil rights authorities; or the provision of information to otherFederal agencies with an interest in the enforcement of respondent's obligationswith respect to nondiscrimination in housing. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 104_ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS UNDER SECTION 812 OF THE FAIRHOUSING ACT </ITAG>Part 104 would contain the rules of practice and procedure for administrativeproceedings before an administrative law judge (ALJ) adjudicating the claimsasserted in a charge issued under Part 103. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General Information </ITAG>Subpart A would contain general information concerning administrative proceedingsbefore an ALJ. This subpart would include provisions addressing: The scopeof the rules (andSection; 104.10(a)); the requirement that hearings underthe rules should be conducted as expeditiously and inexpensively as possibleconsistent with the needs and rights of the parties to obtain a fair hearingand a complete record (see section 812(d)(2) of the Act) (andSection; 104.10(b));a statement that the Department would reasonably accommodate persons withdisabilities who are participants in the hearing or interested membersof the public (andSection; 104.10(c)); the definitions used in the part (andSection;104.20); the computation of time periods (including provisions permittingthe ALJ to modify any time period, except for time periods required bystatute) (andSection; 104.30); and the service and filing of documents bythe parties and by the ALJ (andSection; 104.40). <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge </ITAG>Subpart B would prescribe provisions governing the designation of the presidingadministrative law judge and the powers of the ALJ. As required by section812(b) of the Act, the conduct of administrative proceedings under Part104 is delegated to an ALJ appointed under 5 U.S.C. 3105. The presidingALJ in a proceeding would be appointed by HUD's Chief ALJ (see proposedandSection; 104.100). This subpart would also: Prescribe the powers of the ALJ in the administrativehearing (andSection; 104.110); contain provisions for the disqualificationof the ALJ (andSection; 104.120); prohibit ex parte communications (andSection;104.130); and provide for the separation of all investigative, conciliatoryand prosecutorial functions from the decision-making function of the ALJ(andSection; 104.140). <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Parties </ITAG>Subpart C would describe the parties to the proceeding. The parties wouldinclude: HUD, the respondent named in the charge and against whom reliefis sought, and any intervenors. In accordance with section 812(c) of theAct, the proposed rule would permit the intervention by any aggrieved person.No other intervention is permitted in the proceedings, although briefsof amicus curiae may be permitted at the discretion of the ALJ (andSection;104.200 (a) and (c)).The rights of the parties to the proceeding are addressed in section 812(c)of the Act and would be implemented at andSection; 104.200(b). These includethe right to appear in person, to be represented by counsel, to examineand crossexamine witnesses, to introduce documentary or other relevantevidence into the record, and to request the issuance of subpoenas. Therepresentation of the parties (including notice of appearance and withdrawalof representation) is described at proposed andSection; 104.210. Standardsof conduct for parties and their representatives are addressed at proposedandSection; 104.220. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Pleadings and motions </ITAG>Provisions governing pleadings and motions in an administrative proceedingare included at Subpart D. The requirements for the filing, service andcontents of the charge are found at andSection; 104.410. This rule wouldrequire filing with the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of the AdministrativeLaw Judges, and service upon the respondent and the aggrieved person onwhose behalf the complaint was filed. The charge would consist of a shortand plain statement of the facts upon which the General Counsel has reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur. The charge would be served with a notice of the rightsof the complainant, the respondent and the aggrieved person on whose behalfthe complaint was filed, to elect to have the claims asserted in the chargedecided in a civil action under section 812(o) of the Act, in lieu of anadministrative hearing under Part 104. The notice would also state thatif an administrative proceeding under Part 104 is elected: The partieswould have an opportunity for a hearing at a date and place specified inthe notice; the respondent would have a right to submit an answer to thecharge within 30 days of the service of the charge; the aggrieved personmay intervene as a party within 30 days of the service of the charge; andall discovery must be concluded 15 days before the date set for hearing.Proposed andSection; 104.420 would govern the contents and the submissionof the respondent's answer to the charge. This rule would require the submissionof an answer if the respondent contests material facts alleged in a chargeor contends that the respondent is entitled to judgment as a matter oflaw. Answers would be required to include: A statement that the respondentadmits, denys or does not have sufficient information to admit or deny,each allegation made in the charge; and a statement of each affirmativedefense (and a statement of facts in support of each affirmative defense)claimed by the respondent. This subpart also would contain: Provisions governing requests for intervention(andSection; 104.430); amendments and supplemental pleadings (andSection; 104.440);motions (andSection; 104.450); and general requirements for the form, signatureand timely filing of all pleadings, motions, briefs and other documents.(andSection; 104.400). <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Discovery </ITAG>Section 811(a) of the Act states, in part, that the Secretary may orderdiscovery in aid of administrative hearings under Title VIII. In accordancewith this statutory authority, discovery procedures are included in SubpartE of the proposed rule. Consistent with section 812(d) of the Act, theprocedures were designed to permit the parties to conduct discovery asexpeditiously and inexpensively as possible, consistent with the need ofall parties to obtain relevant evidence (see andSection; 104.500(b)). Exceptfor the time periods stated in the rule, to the extent that the rules prescribedin Subpart E conflict with discovery procedures in aid of civil actionsin the United States District Court for the district in which the investigationtook place, andSection; 104.500 would provide that the rules of the DistrictCourt apply. Specific discovery methods would include: Deposition upon oral examinationand written interrogatories (andSection;andSection; 104.510 and 104.520); writteninterrogatories (andSection; 104.530); requests for the production of documentsor other evidence, entry upon land for inspection and other purposes, andphysical and mental examinations (andSection; 104.540); and requests foradmissions (andSection; 104.550). The frequency and sequence of these methodsis not limited, except that discovery must be completed 15 days beforethe date scheduled for the hearing (andSection; 104.500 (d) and (e)). Theproposed rule would also include provisions governing the supplementationof responses (andSection; 104.560); the issuance of protective orders (andSection;104.570); and motions to compel discovery and the imposition of sanctions(andSection; 104.580). <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Subpoenas </ITAG>In accordance with the authorization contained in section 811(a) of theAct, Subpart F would provide for the issuance of subpoenas in aid of administrativehearings. Consistent with this statutory authority, the subpart would providethat the rules of the United States District Court for the district inwhich the investigation of the discriminatory housing practice took placewould apply to the extent that Subpart F conflicts with procedures forthe issuance of subpoenas in civil actions in that district court (exceptfor time periods stated in the rules). Under proposed andSection; 104.590, the Chief ALJ or the presiding ALJ wouldbe permitted to issue subpoenas upon the written request of a party. Thesubpoena could require: The attendance of a witness for the purpose ofgiving testimony at a deposition; the attendance of a witness for the purposeof giving testimony at a hearing; or the production of relevant books,papers, documents, or tangible things. As required by section 811(b) ofthe Act, witnesses summoned by subpoenas issued under Part 104 would beentitled to the same witness and mileage fees as witnesses in proceedingsin United States District Courts. Witness and mileage fees would be paidby the party requesting the subpoena or, where the party is unable to paythe fees, by HUD. Proposed andSection; 104.590 would also address the timeof the request for issuance of subpoena; the service of subpoenas; motionsto quash or limit subpoenas; and referral to the Attorney General for enforcementunder section 814(c) of the Act where a person fails to comply with a subpoena.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Prehearing procedures</ITAG>Subpart G would permit the ALJ to direct the parties to file prehearingstatements (andSection; 104.600) and to participate in prehearing conferences(andSection; 104.610). These proposed procedures are designed to aid in theclarification of the issues and facts in dispute and to promote the orderlyand expeditious disposition of the proceeding.Subpart G would also provide for settlement negotiations before a settlementjudge. The ALJ conducting the settlement negotiations would be appointedby the Chief ALJ and would not be the ALJ presiding at the hearing.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart H_Hearing Procedures</ITAG>Procedures for the conduct of the hearing are described at Subpart H. Underthis subpart:_The hearing would be conducted at a place in the vicinity in which thediscriminatory housing practice is alleged to have occurred or to be aboutto occur (see section 812(b) of the Act). This requirement is includedin the proposed rule at andSection; 104.700(b)._The hearing would commence not later than 120 days following the issuanceof the charge, unless it is impracticable to do so. If the hearing cannotbe commenced within this time period, the ALJ would be required to notifyHUD, the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge was filed, and therespondent in writing of the reasons for the delay (see section 812(g)of the Act). This requirement is included in the proposed rule at andSection;104.700(a)._The hearing would be conducted in accordance with the Administrative ProcedureAct (5 U.S.C. 551-59) (andSection; 104.710)._The Federal Rules of Evidence would apply to the presentation of evidenceat the hearing, as required by section 812(c) of the Act (andSection; 104.730)._The parties may waive the right to an oral hearing and present the matterfor decision on a written record (andSection; 104.720)._The ALJ may hear oral arguments following the submission of all evidenceat the oral hearing and may permit the submission of written briefs (andSection;104.790).Part H would also include provisions governing: Notification and changeof time and place of hearing (andSection; 104.700(c)); the issuance of incamera and protective orders (andSection; 104.740); the submission, identificationand exchange of exhibits (andSection; 104.750); the authenticity of documents(andSection; 104.760); stipulations of the parties (andSection; 104.770); therecord of the hearing (andSection; 104.780); the end of the hearing (andSection;104.800); and the receipt of evidence following the end of the hearing(andSection; 104.810).<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG>Section 104.900 Dismissal.Under andSection; 104.900 of the proposed rule, the ALJ would be requiredto dismiss the proceeding: (1) Where the complainant, the respondent, orthe aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed makes a timelyelection to have the claims asserted in the charge decided in a civil actionunder section 812(o) of the Act; or (2) where an aggrieved person has commenceda civil action under an Act of Congress or a State law seeking relief withrespect to the discriminatory housing practice and the trial of the civilaction has commenced.Section 104.910 Initial decision of administrative law judge.Proposed andSection; 104.910 describes the initial decision of the ALJ. Underthis proposed rule, the ALJ would be required to issue an initial decisioncontaining findings of fact and conclusions of law upon each material issueof fact or law presented on the record. The decision must be issued within60 days after the end of the hearing, unless it is impracticable to doso. If the ALJ is unable to issue the decision within this time period(or within a succeeding 60-day period), the ALJ would be required to notifyHUD, the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge was filed, and therespondent in writing of the reasons for the delay (see section 812(g)(2)of the Act).Proposed andSection; 104.910(b) would require the ALJ to issue an initialdecision against the respondent and to order appropriate relief, if theALJ determines that the respondent has engaged, or is about to engage ina discriminatory housing practice. Relief that may be ordered includes:_Damages to the aggrieved person (including damages caused by humiliationor embarassment). _Injunctive or such other equitable relief as may be appropriate. No suchrelief, however, may affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummatedbefore the issuance of the initial decision that involves a bona fide purchaser,encumbrancer, or tenant without actual knowledge of the charge (see sections810(g) (3) and (4) of the Act)). _Civil penalties subject to ceilings of $10,000 to $50,000. The ceilingon the civil penaly will depend on the number of previous discriminatoryhousing practices the respondent has been adjudged to have committed withindesignated time periods in any administrative hearing or civil action permittedunder the Fair Housing Act or any State or local fair housing law, or inany licensing or regulatory proceeding conducted by a Federal, State orlocal governmental agency. In determining the number of previous adjudications,the ALJ would consider adjudications that occurred before the effectivedate of the Act. Determinations to resolve issued under andSection; 105.55would not be included as an adjudication of a previous discriminatory housingpractice. If the ALJ determines that more than one respondent has beenengaged or is about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice, theALJ would be permitted to assess the civil penalty, up to the maximum permittedunder the rule, against each respondent. (See section 812(g)(3) of theAct.) Proposed andSection; 104.910(c) would provide that the ALJ will make an initialdecision dismissing the charge if the ALJ finds that the respondent hasnot engaged and is not about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice(see section 812(g)(7) of the Act). Section 104.920 Service of initial decision. Simultaneously with the issuance of the initial decision, the ALJ wouldbe required to serve the decision on the respondent, the aggrieved personon whose behalf the charge was filed any intervenors, the General Counsel,and the Secretary of HUD. The initial decision would state that it willbecome the final decision of the Department unless the Secretary issuesa final decision within 30 days (see andSection; 104.920). Section 104.925 Resolution of the charge. Section 812(e) of the Act provides that any resolution of the charge beforethe issuance of a final decision by the Secretary requires the consentof the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge is filed. Proposed andSection;104.925 would permit the parties to submit an agreement resolving the chargeat any time before the issuance of the final decision. The agreement mustbe signed by the respondent, all aggrieved persons on whose behalf thecharge was issued, and the General Counsel. The ALJ would accept the agreementby issuing an initial decision based on the agreed findings. The submissionof an agreement resolving the charge would waive any right to challengeor contest the validity of a decision based on the agreement. Section 104.930 Final decision. In accordance with section 812(h) of the Act, proposed andSection; 104.930would permit the Secretary to review findings of fact, conclusions of law,or orders contained in the ALJ's initial decision, and issue a final decision.The Secretary may affirm, modify or set aside, in whole or in part, theinitial decision, or remand the initial decision for further proceedings,Such a final decision would be served on the respondent, the aggrievedperson on whose behalf the charge was filed, intervenors, and the GeneralCounsel no later than 30 days from the date of issuance of the initialdecision. If no final decision is issued by the Secretary within this timeperiod, the initial decision of the ALJ would become the final decisionof the Department. Such a final decision would be considered to have beenissued 30 days following the date of issuance of the initial decision.Under section 812(g)(7), HUD is required to make public disclosure of ordersdismissing charges based on findings that the respondent has not engagedand is not about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice. The proposedrule at andSection; 104.930 provides that HUD would make public disclosureof all final decisions, including those based on finding in favor of oragainst a respondent. Section 104.935 Action upon issuance of a final decision. Where a final decision includes a finding that the respondent engaged oris about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice in the course ofa business subject to licensing or regulation by a Federal, State or localgovernmental agency, section 812(g)(5) requires HUD within specified timelimits, to send copies of the findings of fact, conclusions of law, anddecision to the governmental entity, and to recommend appropriate disciplinaryaction (including the suspension or revocation of the license of the respondent).This statutory requirement is implemented at andSection; 104.935(a) of theproposed rule. Where a final decision includes a finding that a respondent is engagedor about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice and another finaldecision including such a finding was issued under Part 104 within fiveyears preceding the date of the issuance of the final decision, section812(g)(6) requires HUD to send the Attorney General copies of the decisions.This requirement is contained in andSection; 104.935(b). Section 104.940 Attorney's fees and costs. Section 812(p) of the Act provides that the ALJ may allow the prevailingparty, other than HUD, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and that HUDshall be liable for such fees and costs to the extent provided in 5 U.S.C.504 (Equal Access to Justice Act). Section 802(o) provides that prevailingparty has the same meaning as this term has under 42 U.S.C. 1988 (CivilRights Attorney's Fees Awards Act). Proposed andSection; 104.940 would provide that any prevailing party, exceptHUD, may apply to the ALJ for attorney's fees and costs following the issuanceof the final decision under andSection; 104.940. The initial decision onfees and costs would become the final decision of HUD unless the Secretaryreviews the decision and issues a final decision within 30 days. The recovery of fees and costs would be permitted as follows: If the respondent is the prevailing party, HUD shall be liable for reasonableattorney's fees and costs to the extent provided under the Equal Accessto Justice Act and HUD's regulations at 24 CFR Part 14; and intervenorsshall be liable for reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the extentthat the intervenor's participation in the administrative proceeding wasfrivolous or vexatious, or was for the purpose of harassment. To the extent that an intervenor is a prevailing party, the respondentshall be liable for reasonable attorney's fees and costs unless specialcircumstances make the recovery of such fees and costs unjust.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart J_Judicial Review and Enforcement of Final Decision </ITAG>Judicial review of the final decision is addressed in andSection; 104.950.This proposed rule is based on section 812(i) and (1) of the Act and wouldprovide that: _Any party adversely affected by a final decision under andSection; 104.930may file a petition for review of the decision in the appropriate UnitedStates Court of Appeals within 30 days of the date of issuance of the finaldecision. _If no such petition for review is filed within 45 days of the date ofissuance of the final decision, the findings of fact and final decisionwould be conclusive in connection with any petition for enforcement filedthereafter. Enforcement of the final decision would be addressed in andSection; 104.955.Under this rule, HUD may petition the appropriate United States Court ofAppeals for enforcement of the final decision and for appropriate temporaryrelief or restraining orders under section 812(j) of the Act at any timefollowing the issuance of the final decision. Any person entitled to reliefunder the final decision may petition the appropriate United States Courtof Appeals for enforcement under section 812(m) of the Act if before theexpiration of 60 days from the date of issuance of the final decision,no petition for judicial review of the final decision has been filed andthe General Counsel has not sought enforcement of the final decision. Section 812 of the Act contains references to judicial proceedings involvingthe ALJ's initial decision and to judicial proceedings involving the finaldecision of the Secretary. For example, section 812(i) of the Act providesfor judicial review of the ``final order for relief under this section'';section 812(j) of the Act provides for the enforcement by HUD of ``theorder of the administrative law judge''; section 812(1) of the act describesthe effect of the ``administrative law judge's findings of fact and order''where a petition for review under section 812(i) of the Act has not beenfiled; and section 812(m) of the Act describes the enforcement of ``theadministrative law judge's order'' by parties other than HUD. The provisionsfor Secretarial review of the initial decision of the administrative lawjudge were added as an amendment on the floor of the House of Representativesand were clearly intended to provide for review and enforcement of thefinal rather than the initial HUD decision. (E.g., 134 Cong. Rec. H4676-77(daily edition June 23, 1988) (remarks of Rep. Fish). Accordingly, HUDhas interpreted the statutory references to the administrative law judge'sorder to be references to the final decision of the Department. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 106_FAIR HOUSING ADMINISTRATIVE MEETINGS UNDER TITLE VIII OFTHE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1968 </ITAG>Part 106 was adopted in 1972 to establish procedures for the schedulingof public meetings or conferences to gather information to assist the AssistantSecretary for Equal Opportunity (now the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity) in achieving the aims and objectives of title VIIIof the Civil Rights Act of 1968 for the promotion and assurance of equalopportunity in housing with regard to race, color, religion, or nationalorigin. Part 106 was amended in 1975 to add ``sex'' as a basis of equalopportunity in housing. The Department proposes to revise the heading of 24 CFR Part 106 and andSection;andSection;106.1, 106.2(b) and 106.2(c) to reflect the new short title of Title VIIIof the Civil Rights Act of 1968, now known as the Fair Housing Act. ``Handicap''and ``familial status'' would be inserted in andSection; 106.1 as additionalprotected classes, and appropriate editorial modifications would be madefor clarification purposes and for consistency in terminology. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 109_FAIR HOUSING ADVERTISING </ITAG>The Fair Housing Advertising Regulations (Part 109) would be revised toreflect the expansion of the classes of persons protected under the FairHousing Act from discriminatory advertising. <ITAG tagnum="81">General </ITAG>The purpose of the HUD Fair Housing Advertising Regulations is to assistall advertising media, advertising agencies and advertisers in complyingwith the requirements of the Fair Housing Act with respect to advertisementsfor the sale, rental or financing of housing. These regulations also describethe matters which the Department will consider in evaluating compliancewith the Fair Housing Act in connection with the investigation of complaintsalleging discrimination in advertising. Section 804(c) of the Fair Housing Act has been amended to expand the prohibitionson discrimination in advertising for the sale or rental of a dwelling.The amendment added ``handicap'' and ``familial status'' to the existingprohibitions of discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex,or national origin. The Department is proposing to revise the Fair Housing Advertising Regulationsto reflect the expanded coverage of the Fair Housing Act with respect todiscrimination in advertising. Following is a section-by-section descriptionof the proposed changes. Section 109.5 Policy. This section describes the statutory provisions on which the Fair HousingAdvertising Regulations are based. The two new protected coverages of theamended statute_``handicap'' and ``familial status''_would be added intwo places to the existing list of bases on which discrimination is prohibited.In addition, a reference to appraisal services would be inserted in thelist of discriminatory practices specifically made unlawful under the FairHousing Act. Because of the exemption in section 807(b) of the Fair HousingAct for ``housing for older persons'', it is also proposed to add a sentenceto andSection; 109.5 to explain that the prohibitions of the act regardingfamilial status do not apply with respect to such housing. In addition, references to Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 wouldbe changed to the new short title of the statute, the ``Fair Housing Act'',both in this section and throughout the regulations. Section 109.10 Purpose. The Department is proposing only editorial changes to this section.Section 109.15 Definitions.This section contains definitions of the major terms used in Part 109.The Department proposes to add definitions of the terms ``handicap'' and``familial status'' in paragraph (g) and (h), respectively. These new definitionsare the same as the definitions contained in the Fair Housing Act. In addition,the definition of ``Secretary'' would be eliminated since the term is notused in the regulations, and the definitions of ``person'' and ``discriminatoryhousing practice'' would be revised to reflect statutory changes.Section 109.16 Scope.This section explains the use of the criteria contained in Part 109 bythe Assistant Secretary with regard to action on complaints alleging discriminatoryadvertising with respect to advertising media and persons placing advertisements.The Department has proposed changes in the introductory language of paragraph(a) and in the language of paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) to reflect thechanges in complaint processing brought about by the Fair Housing Act amendments.Under the new procedure, the Assistant Secretary will make determinationsas to whether there is reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatoryhousing practice (or a violation of section 804 of the Fair Housing Act)has occurred or is about to occur.Section 109.20 Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.This section discusses how certain words, phrases, symbols and forms havebeen used in residential real estate advertising to convey either overtor tacit discriminatory intent.In the undesignated introductory paragraph, it is proposed that the AssistantSecretary will consider whether, in a particular case, there is a needfor ``further proceedings on'' the complaint, rather than a need for ``seekingresolution of'' the complaint. This change would reflect the new complaintprocessing procedures under the amended act.In paragraph (a), which provides examples of words descriptive of dwelling,landlord, and tenants which should not be used in advertising, the Departmentproposes to add the phrase ``adult building''.In paragraph (b), which lists examples of words indicative of persons inthe protected groups covered by the Fair Housing Act, the Department proposesto add specific provisions on words relating to handicap and familial status.In proposed paragraph (b)(6), the rule would provide that nothing in thepart restricts the inclusion of information about the availability of accessiblehousing in advertising of dwellings. In proposed paragraph (b)(7), concerningfamilial status, the Department would include a statement making it clearthat nothing in Part 109 would restrict advertisements of dwellings whichare intended and operated for occupancy by older persons and which constitute``housing for older persons'' as defined in section 807(b) of the FairHousing Act.In paragraphs (c) and (d), the words ``handicap'' and ``familial status''would be added to the list of protected groups.Section 109.25 Selective use of advertising media or content.This section indicates examples of how the selective use of advertisingmedia or content can be used exclusively with respect to particular housingdevelopments or sites, with discriminatory results.In paragraph (c), which concerns selective use of human models when conductingan advertising campaign, the Department is proposing changes in the lasttwo sentences of the paragraph to provide an example of selective advertisingwith respect to familial status.Section 109.30 Fair housing policy and practices.This section discusses actions that advertisers can take which would beconsidered as evidence of compliance with the prohibitions against discriminationin advertising under the Fair Housing Act.The Department proposes to add the words ``handicap'' and ``familial status''where appropriate in paragraphs (a) and (b). In addition, the Departmentproposes to add language in paragraph (c), concerning use of human models,to indicate that models used in display advertising should represent familieswith children, when appropriate, as well as both majority and minoritygroups in the metropolitan area and both sexes.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix to Part 109</ITAG>The appendix to Part 109 contains three tables intended to serve as a guidefor the use of the Equal Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, slogan,and publisher's notice for advertising. The Department proposes to addthe words ``handicap'' and ``familial status'' where appropriate in thethree tables.<ITAG tagnum="81">PART 110_FAIR HOUSING POSTER</ITAG>Part 110 sets forth the procedures established by the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development with respect to the display of a fair housing posterby persons subject to sections 804 through 806 of the Civil Rights Actof 1968, 42 U.S.C. 3604-3606.The Department proposes to amend Part 110 to comply with the requirementsof the Fair Housing Act (Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 asamended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, approved September13, 1988). The major changes are in andSection;110.25, Description of Posters.The proposal would change the legend of the poster to add ``handicap''and ``familial status'' to the bases of illegal discriminatory acts. Thelegend would also be revised to show that discrimination in the appraisingof housing is illegal. In addition to the above amendments, editorial modificationwould be made for clarification purposes and for consistency in terminology.<ITAG tagnum="81">PART 115_RECOGNITION OF JURISDICTIONS WITH SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENTLAWS</ITAG>On August 9, 1984 the Department published 24 CFR Part 115 as a final rule(49 FR 32042) with an effective date of October 8, 1984. Part 115 setsforth the procedures and criteria used to determine whether a State orlocal fair housing law provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatoryhousing practices that are substantially equivalent to those provided inTitle VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968. The Department proposes torevise Part 115 to comply with the requirements of the Fair Housing Act(the Civil Rights Act of 1968 as amended by the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988, enacted September 13, 1988). The principal changes proposedwould: (1) Provide for than a recognition process as provided in the currentPart 115; (2) define the requirements for certification with the specificityrequired by the Act; (3) define the effect of the Act on agencies recognizedas substantially equivalent under current Part 115; (4) require that inorder to become certified agencies must provide protection against discriminationbased on ``handicap'' and ``familial status''; and (5) provide a prohibitionagainst coercion, intimidation and threats.To obtain certification, State and local agencies must administer lawswhich prohibit all discriminatory housing practices which are prohibitedby the Act and must include as protected classes all classes protectedby the Act. Discrimination on the basis of handicap is described in thestatutory language and only those provisions of section 804(f) of the Actwhich clearly do not apply to State or local agencies may be omitted fromthe law or ordinance the agency administers if certification is to be granted.Further the remedies available to a certified agency must be substantiallyequivalent to the remedies available under the Act. Final agency actionsmust be subject to judicial review and aggrieved persons must have theright of access to a State or local court. The Act also requires that theprocedures followed by a certified agency be shown to be substantiallyequivalent to those created by the Act. Such procedures as: Filing of complaintsby the agency; acknowledgment of receipt of complaints and notice of proceduralrights and obligations, completion of investigation and investigative reportwithin 100 days and notice of cause for delay; provision for conciliationand a conciliation agreement which shall be made public under certain conditions;are examples of procedural matters which must be included in the law orordinance administered by a certified agency.The regulations require that the law or ordinance provide for resolutionof a complaint by a body empowered to grant relief substantially equivalentto the relief which mat be granted by the Secretary under the Act.The following revisions to Part 115 are proposed:Section 115.1 Purpose.Paragraph (a) is amended to permit the Secretary to take further actionwith regard to a complaint referred to a certified agency when the agencyhas consented; or the certified agency has failed to commence proceedingswith respect to the complaint before the end of the 30th day after thedate of such referral; or having commenced such proceedings, fails to carryforward such proceedings with reasonable promptness; or when the Secretaryhas determined that the agency no longer qualifies for certification withrespect to the relevant jurisdiction. It is further amended to remove theprovision permitting the Secretary to take further action with regard toa referred complaint on certification that the protection of the rightsof the parties or the interests of justice require such action. This reflectsthe removal of comparable language from the statute.Only technical changes are required in paragraph (b) to accommodate thechange from ``recognition'' to ``certification.''Section 115.2 Basis of determination.The Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, section 810(f)(3)(A), makes itclear that the Secretary may certify a State or local agency for the purposeof referral of complaints of housing discrimination ``* * * only if theSecretary determines that: (i) The substantive rights protected by suchagency in the jurisdiction with respect to which certification is to bemade; (ii) the procedures followed by such agency; (iii) the remedies availableto such agency; and (iv) the availability of judicial review of such agency'saction are substantially equivalent to those created by and under thistitle.'' The language of Title VIII, before the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988, required only that a State or local law provide rights andremedies for alleged discriminatory housing practices which are substantiallyequivalent to the rights and remedies provided in Title VIII.As revised the section retains the current two-phase determination processfor recognition. Paragraph (a) requires a determination that the law administeredby the agency, on its face, provides that: (1) The substantive rights protectedby the agency; and (2) the procedures followed by the agency; (3) the remediesavailable to the agency; and (4) the availability of judicial review ofsuch agency's action; are substantially equivalent to those created byand under the Act.Paragraph (b) requires a determination that the current practices and pastperformance of the agency demonstrate that in operation the law in factporvides rights and remedies which are substantially equivalent to thoseprovided in the Act.Section 115.3 Criteria for adequacy of law.This section is retained in substantial part. However, extensive revisionsare proposed.Paragraph (a)(1) is expanded to show that the law or ordinance of a certifiedagency must provide that (1) complaints must be in writing, (2) the agencymust serve notice on complainant acknowledging receipt of the complaintand advising the complainant of the time limits and choice of forums provided,(3) the agency promptly serve notice of the filing of a complaint on therespondent or person charged advising of his or her procedural rights andobligations under the law or ordinance together with a copy of the complaint,and (4) that a respondent may file an answer.Paragraph (a)(2) is expanded to show that a certified agency must, as adjunctto its authority to investigate complaints, have subpoena power. The subsectioncodifies the longtime practice of the Department to require that, withfew exceptions, a certified agency have subpoena power. Title VIII of theCivil Rights Act granted the Department subpoena power and the Departmentfound it an effective and necessary adjunct in the investigative process.When the department had no authority beyond conciliation, it was thoughtthat an agency that could grant relief might have more power to assurethe cooperation of respondents than did HUD. Since the Act empowers HUDto grant relief this reasoning is no longer suasive and the exception tothe requirement of subpoena power no longer valid.Paragraph (a)(2) is further expanded to show that a certified agency mustadminister a law or ordinance which requires that: (1) The agency commenceproceedings with respect to a complaint within thirty days of receipt ofthe complaint; (2) the agency investigate the complaint and complete itsinvestigation within 100 days of receipt of the complaint; (3) the agencynotify the complainant and respondent in writing if it is unable to completethe investigation within the 100 day period; (4) the agency make finaladministrative disposition of a complaint within one year of date of receiptof a complaint, unless it is impractical to do so, and notify the complainantand respondent in writing of the reasons for not doing so.Although the one year time limitation within which the agency must makefinal administrative disposition of a complaint is not verbatim from theAct the requirement is consonant with the provisions of the Act. The Act(section 810(g) requires that the Secretary, within 100 days after thefiling of a complaint, make a reasonable cause determination and when appropriate,issue a charge. Section 812 provides for a hearing before an administrativelaw judge to commence no later than 120 days following the issuance ofthe charge; the administrative law judge to make findings of fact and conclusionsof law within 60 days after the hearing. The Secretary has 30 days thereafterto review the administrative law judge's findings. This completes the administrativedisposition of the complaint. The approximate time allotted by the Actfrom date of receipt of complaint to final disposition is 310 days. Therequirement that a certified agency make final disposition of a complaintwithin one year from date of receipt of a complaint, unless it is impracticalto do so, is reasonable and within the time limitations prescribed in theAct. Paragraph (a)(2) also requires that a criterion for certificationbe the power to conciliate and that conciliation agreements must, undercertain conditions, be made public as does the Act.Paragraph (a)(3) is retained and examples of improper burdens on complainantare given: (1) A provision that a complaint must be filed within less than180 days after the alleged discriminatory housing act (The Act providesone year to file a complaint. No complaint would be referred if filed withHUD within the one year period provided in the Act but after a lesser timefor filing required by a certified agency.); (2) anti-testing provisions(courts have held that testing is a protected activity under Title VIII;(3) provisions that could subject a complainant to costs, criminal penaltiesor fees in connection with the filing of complaints, since they would havea chilling effect on prospective complainants.Paragraph (a)(4) is retained verbatim.Paragraph (a)(5) is expanded to include `'familial status'' to reflectthe statutory change.Paragraph (a)(5) is further expanded by substituting the term ``discriminationin residential real estate related transactions'' for the term discriminationin financing and the prohibition of such practices is practically verbatimfrom the Act. A new subsection is added describing certain coercion, intimidation,threats or interference as acts which must be prohibited by the law administeredby a certified agency.The proviso to paragraph (a)(5) which permitted recognition even if thelaw did not contain adequate prohibitions with respect to blockbusting,discrimination in financing and access to or membership in brokers' organizations,has been removed. A certified agency should be able to process these typesof complaints as well as other paragraph (a)(5) complaints. These rightscreated by Title VIII in 1968 should by now be fully protected by any certifiedagency.Paragraph (b) is a substitute section and requires that the law administeredby a certified agency grant that agency authority to: (1) Seek prompt judicialrelief pending final disposition of a complaint; (2) issue subpoenas; (3)grant actual damages, or arrange to have adjudicated in court at agencyexpense the award of actual damages to an aggrieved person; (4) grant injunctiveor other equitable relief; and (5) assess a civil penalty against the respondentor arrange to have adjudicated in court at agency expense the award ofpunitive damages against the respondent. The Act grants this authorityto the Secretary and a substantially equivalent agency must include thisauthority in its arsenal of remedies to combat housing discrimination effectively.Paragraph (b) provides that actions by certified agencies must, under thelaw or ordinance the agency administers, be subject to judicial review.The agency must provide administrative and judicial remedies substantiallyequivalent to those required by the Act. The Act requires that a Stateor local agency administer a law which provides remedies which are substantiallyequivalent to those provided by the Act; it does not require that theybe identical to those provided by the Act.Paragraph (c) codifies section 807(b)(1) of the Act.Paragraph (d) requires that the State or local law assure that no prohibitionbased on familial status applies to housing for older persons. Previouslywe have not required States or localities to include in their laws or ordinancesthose exceptions or exemptions pertaining to unfair housing practices whichthe Federal law contains. However, Congress exhibited serious concern thatthe prohibition against discrimination because of familial status not impingeon housing for older persons. The Congressional concern is reflected inthis requirement.Paragraph (e), formerly paragraph (c), is adopted and expanded to showthat an analysis of the adequacy of a State or local fair housing law ``onits face''must take into account regulations, directives and rules of procedureof a State or local agency as well as other relevant matters of State orlocal law or interpretations by competent authorities.Paragraph (f) provides that a law administered by a certified agency maynot permit it to contract out or delegate to a non-governmental authorityits decision making authority, including the dismissal of a complaint andany action specified in andSection;andSection; 115.3(a)(2)(iv) or 115.3(b)(1).This provision is considered to be necessary since some agencies appearto have relinquished their responsibilities and obligations under the lawby entering into contracts with private organizations. The Department wouldhave no authority to monitor such organizations and could not assure thata complaint filed with the Department would, when referred, receive theattention required by the Act.Paragraph (g) provides for civil action by an aggrieved person and is basedon section 813 (Enforcement by Private Persons) of the Act. The State orlocal agency must administer a law or ordinance which provides for suchcivil enforcement and the court should be empowered to: award actual andpunitive damages; grant temporary or permanent injunctions; and allow reasonableattorney's fees and costs.Section 115.3a Criteria for adequacy of the law_prohibition of discriminationbecause of handicap.This section codifies the provisions of law prohibiting discriminationon the basis of handicap which must be included in a fair housing law administeredby a certified agency. The uniqueness of the handicap prohibitions justifiesthis separate section. The prohibition against discrimination because ofa handicap also provides that the law must contain certain provisions relatingto design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings (as definedin Part 100) for first occupancy after March 13, 1991. While this dateis 30 months after enactment of the regulations, it is important for aState or locality that desires to have its law certified in the near futureto enact these provisions at or before the time it enacts the other provisionsrequired by this section, so as to allow sufficient lead time for personsto have sufficient notice to include the necessary considerations in thedesign and construction phases of their development efforts.Section 115.4 Performance standardsThis section is retained in substantial part with editorial changes. Thesubsections of andSection; 115.4(b) have been rearranged for clarity. Timelimits for the commencement and processing of complaints are imposed andandSection; 115.4(b)(3) requires that compliance reviews be conducted.Section 115.5 Request for recognition.This section only required editorial changes.Section 115.6 Procedure for certification.This section has been retained with editorial changes. A new paragraph(d) has been added (other paragraphs have been relettered) describing theeffect of the act on agencies recognized prior to enactment.The paragraph delineates the time period during which certification underthis section is effective, <T3>i.e.</T3>, March 12, 1988 (effective date of the law) through January13, 1992 unless the Secretary determines in an individual case that theState or local agency has not been able to meet the certification requirementsbecause of exceptional circumstances and the Secretary extends the periodto no later than September 13, 1992.The States and localities which were recognized as substantially equivalenton September 12, 1988 (and whose agencies are therefore deemed certifiedfor a limited period) are:States <ITAG tagnum="15">Alaska </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">California</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Colorado </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Connecticut </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Delaware </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Florida </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Hawaii </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Illinois </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Indiana </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Iowa </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Kansas </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Kentucky </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Maine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Maryland </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Massachusetts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Michigan </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Minnesota </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Missouri </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Montana </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Nebraska </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Nevada </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">New Hampshire </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">New Jersey </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">New Mexico </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">New York </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">North Carolina </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Oklahoma </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Oregon </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Pennsylvania </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Rhode Island </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">South Dakota </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Tennessee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Virginia </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Washington </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">West Virginia </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Wisconsin </ITAG>Localities <ITAG tagnum="15">ALASKA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Anchorage </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ARIZONA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Phoenix </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">CONNECTICUT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> New Haven </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Washington </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">FLORIDA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Broward County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Clearwater </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Dade County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> (Metropolitan)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Escambia County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Gainesville </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Hillsborough Cty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Jacksonville </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Orlando </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Pensacola </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Pinellas County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> St. Petersburg </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Tallahassee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Tampa </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ILLINOIS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Bloomington </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Danville </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Elgin </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Evanston </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Hazel Crest </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Park Forest </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Springfield </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Urbana </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">INDIANA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Columbus </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> East Chicago </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Ft. Wayne </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Gary </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Hammond </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Marion </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> South Bend </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">IOWA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Des Moines </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Dubuque </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Iowa City </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">KANSAS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Kansas City </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Lawrence </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Olathe </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Saline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">KENTUCKY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Jefferson County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Lexington-Fayette </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">MARYLAND </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Howard County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Montgomery Cty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Prince Georges Cty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">MASSACHUSETTS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Boston </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Cambridge </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">MINNESOTA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Minneapolis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> St. Paul </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">MISSOURI </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Kansas City </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> St. Louis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">NEBRASKA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Lincoln </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Omaha </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">NEW YORK </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> New York </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Rockland County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">NORTH CAROLINA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Asheville </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Charlotte </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Mecklenburg Cty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> New Hanover Cty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Raleigh </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Winston-Salem </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">OHIO </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Dayton </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">PENNSYLVANIA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Allentown </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Harrisburg </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Philadelphia </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Pittsburgh </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Reading </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> York </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">SOUTH DAKOTA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Sioux Falls </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">TENNESSEE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Knoxville </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">TEXAS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Fort Worth </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">VIRGINIA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Arlington County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">WASHINGTON </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> King County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Seattle </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Tacoma </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">WEST VIRGINIA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Beckley </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Charleston </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Huntington </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">WISCONSIN </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Beloit </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15"> Madison </ITAG>The States and localities which had entered into an agreement for interimreferrals on September 12, 1988 (and whose agencies are therefore deemedcetified for a limited period) are: States <ITAG tagnum="15">Georgia </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Ohio </ITAG>Localities <ITAG tagnum="15">Lee County, FL </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">St. Joseph, MO </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Albany, NY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Durham, NC </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Greensboro, NC</ITAG>It is made clear that certification under this paragraph does not permitreferral of complaints alleging discrimination based on ``familial status''or ``handicap.'' Since these are new protected classes, HUD has not analyzedthe laws of these jurisdictions to determine whether ``on its face'' thelaw of any of these jurisdictions protects these classes in a manner substantiallyequivalent to the protection provided by the Act. Similarly it is made clear that no State or locality certified under thisparagraph is to be considered certified for the purpose of processing complaintsalleging coercion, intimidation or threats as described in andSection; 115.3(a)(5)(vii).HUD did not previously have authority to process such complaints and thereforeHUD has not analyzed the laws of these jurisdictions to make the appropriatedetermination. Further, the proposed regulation makes it clear that certification underthis paragraph does not imply that the administrative or judicial remediesprovided are substantially equivalent to those provided by the Act. Thisis a required conclusion since HUD could provide no administrative remediesbefore the Act and the current regulation, andSection; 115.3(b), specificallyexcludes a determination concerning judicial protection and enforcement.The requirement for publication of annual lists has been retained. Section 115.7 Denial of certification, section 115.8 withdrawal of certification,and section 115.9 conferences.These sections are retained with editorial changes. Section 115.10 Consequences of certification. This section is retained with editorial changes. A paragraph has been addedto reinforce the principle that currently recognized agencies do not becomecertified with regard to complaints alleging discrimination on the basisof ``handicap'' or ``familial status.'' A paragraph has been added to providefor action by the Secretary before referral to a certified agency in certaininstances, as mandated by statute. Section 115.11 Interim referrals. Section 115.11 is retained. A time limitation of two years in interim statushas been imposed. It was felt that two years was a sufficient time foran agency to show that it could conform to the performance standards ofandSection; 115.4. It is made clear that this does not apply to agenciesthat are certified under andSection;115.6(d) since these agencies enteredthis status with no foreknowledge of such limitation. <ITAG tagnum="81">PART 121_COLLECTION OF DATA </ITAG>The Department is proposing to recodify the provisions of 24 CFR Part 100,entitled ``Racial, Sex, and Ethnic Data'', as a new Part 121 of Title 24.Part 100 was originally adopted in 1971 under the heading ``Racial andEthnic Data'', to enable the Secretary of Housing and Urban Developmentto obtain information concerning minority-group identification to assistthe Secretary in carrying out responsibility for administering the nationalpolicies prohibiting discrimination and providing for fair housing. In1975, in light of the 1974 amendment of Title VIII to prohibit discriminationon the basis of sex, Part 100 was amended to provide for obtaining informationon sex, as well as minority-group, identification. Section 562 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub.L. 100-242, approved February 5, 1988) requires the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to collect data on the racial and ethnic characteristicsof persons eligible for, assisted, or otherwise benefitting under eachcommunity development, housing assistance, and mortgage and loan insuranceand guarantee program administered by the Secretary, and to include a summaryand evaluation of such data in the Secretary's annual report to the Congress.Section 808(e)(6) of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3608(e)(6), as addedby section 7(b)(1)(D) of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, requiresthe Secretary to collect data on the race, color, religion, sex, nationalorigin, age, handicap and family characteristics of persons and householdswho are applicants for, participants in, or beneficiaries or potentialbeneficiaries of, programs administered by the Department, to the extentthat such persons and households are within the coverage of the civil rightslaws and executive orders referred to in section 808(f) of the Fair HousingAct or specified by the Secretary by publication in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and to the extent that the Secretary determinesthe data to be necessary or appropriate. The existing provisions of Part 100 are not adequate for the purpose ofenabling the Secretary to carry out the new responsibilities mandated bythe legislation described above. Accordingly, the Department proposes torevise those provisions to provide appropriate regulatory authority forthis purpose.Since Part 100 would be used for other regulations under this proposedrule, the Department proposes to move the revised provisions of that partto a new Part 121_Collection of Data. Section 121.1 would describe the purpose of the new Part 121_to enablethe Secretary to carry out his or her responsibilities under the Fair HousingAct, Executive Order 11063, Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, andsection 562 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987. Theseauthorities prohibit discrimination in housing and in programs receivingfinancial assistance from the Department, and they direct the Secretary,among other things, to collect certain data to assess the extent of compliancewith these policies. Section 121.2 would provide for the furnishing of data by HUD program participantsconcerning the race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, handicap,and family characteristics of persons and households who are applicantsfor, participants in, or beneficiaries or potential beneficiaries of, programsadministered by the Department. The language proposed for this sectionis drawn largely from that contained in section 808(e)(6) of the Fair HousingAct, described above. <ITAG tagnum="85">Legislative Review Under Section 7(o) Of the Department of Housingand Urban Development Act and Comment Period Applicable to the ProposedRule</ITAG>The proposed rule was not submitted to the Committee on Banking, Housing,and Urban Affairs of the Senate of the Committee on Banking, Finance andUrban Affairs of the House of Representatives for prepublication reviewas described in section 7(o) of the Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(o)). Section 7(o)(2) requires certain rules to be transmittedto both Committees at least 15 calendar days of continuous session beforetheir publication for comment in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The last date for submission of a proposed ruleto the committees for the 15-day prepublication review during 1988 wasthe first week of October 1988. The next period of 15 days of continuoussession of Congress will not occur until early 1989. Section 13 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 provides that theSecretary shall issue rules to implement the amendments not later than180 days after the enactment of the Act (<T3>i.e</T3>., 180 days from September 13, 1988 or March 12, 1989). Section13 of the 1988 Amendments also requires HUD to consult with other appropriateFederal agencies and to give public notice and an opportunity for commenton the rules. (Also see section 812(d) and 815 of the Act.) Given the statutory 180-day time limit for the production of a final rule,the statutory requirements for public notice and comment, and the 1988congressional schedule, the Department has interpreted the statutory rulemakingschedule as an expression of congressional intent to exempt this rulemakingfrom the legislative review requirements under section 7(o)(2). As noted above, section 13 of the 1988 Amendments requires the Departmentto provide an opportunity for public notice and comment. For proposed rules,it is HUD's usual policy to afford the public not less than 60 days forthe submission of public comments (see 24 CFR 10.1). However, based onthe 180-day production schedule and the requirement that a final rule beeffective by March 19, 1989, the Department has provided 30 days for publiccomment on this proposed rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Other Matters</ITAG>This rule constitutes a ``major rule'' as defined in section 1(b) of ExecutiveOrder 12291. Analysis of the proposed rule indicates that it would notcause a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,Federal, State or local government agencies, or geographic regions or havea significant adverse affect on competition, employment, investment, productivity,innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to competewith foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets. However,analysis of the rule indicates that it may have an impact of $100 millionor more. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget in accordancewith section (6)(a)(4) of the Executive Order has waived the requirementfor the preparation of a preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis under section3 of the Executive Order. This waiver is based on the Director's determinationthat compliance with the requirement for a preliminary Regulatory ImpactAnalysis may unduly delay the rule and may prohibit the issuance of a finalrule effective by March 12, 1989. A final Regulatory Impact Analysis, however,will be prepared before the publication of the final rule. A Finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations in 24 CFR Part 50, which implementssection 102(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969. The Findingof No Significant Impact is available for public inspection during regularbusiness hours in the Office of General Counsel, Rules Docket Clerk, atthe address listed above. Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601), the undersigned herebycertifies that this rule does not have a significant economic impact ona substantial number of small entities. While the rule will require allentities, including small entities, to comply with certain accessibilitystandards in the design and construction of certain multifamily buildings,compliance with these standards will require a minimal expenditure of funds.In ``The Estimated Cost of Accessible Buildings,'' a study prepared forHUD by Edward Steinfeld, Department of Architecture, State University ofNew York at Buffalo, the cost of redesigning a high rise tower to complywith ANSI A117.1 standards was estimated to be 0.98 percent of the totalcost of the structure. The increase was 0.59 percent for garden style apartments.These estimates are based on compliance with the ANSI A117.1 standardswhich are more rigorous than the accessibility standards in the Fair HousingAct and are based on the redesign rather than a new design of a structure.HUD, therefore, believes that the figures overstate the economic burdenof compliance. Moreover, HUD notes that the accessibility requirementswill have no impact on many entities since such compliance with equal ormore rigorous standards is already required under many State and locallaws. The information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to OMB for review under section 3504(h) of the Paperwork ReductionAct of 1980. Sections 100.304(c)(2), 103.30, 115.3(a)(i), 115.5, 115.7and 115.9 of this proposed rule have been determined by the Departmentto contain collection of information requirements. Information on theserequirements are provided as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden Proposed Rule_Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of </T4>1980<H1>Description of information collection</H1><H1>Section No. 24 CFR affected</H1><H1>Number of respondents</H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent</H1><H1>Total annual respones</H1><H1>Hours per response</H1><H1>Total hours</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Policy and Procedures-Housing for Persons 55 years and older<D>andSection; 100.304(c)(2)</D><D>1,231</D><D>1</D><D>1,231</D><D>1</D><D>1,231</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Housing Discrimination Complaint Forms HUD-903 andamp; 903A Spanish Version(2529-0011)<D>andSection;andSection; 103.30 andamp; 115.3(a)(i)</D><D>8,400</D><D>1</D><D>8,400</D><D>1</D><D>8,400</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Certification Request Documentation (2529-0025)<D>andSection;andSection; 115.5, 115.7 andamp; 115.9</D><D>30</D><D>1</D><D>30</D><D>17</D><D>510</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total Annual Burden<D/><D/><D/><D/><D/><D>10,141</D></ITAG></ITAG>Collections of information conducted or sponsored by HUD during the conductof an administrative action or investigation against specific individualsor entities after a case file is opened are not covered by 5 CFR Part 1320_ControllingPaperwork Burdens on the Public (see 5 CFR 1320.3(c)). Accordingly, thetabulation above, does not include the information collection hours associatedwith andSection;andSection;104.420, 104.530, 104.540(b)(4), 104.540(c), 104.550(a),104.550(b), 104.590, 104.600(b), 104.620(b)(2), 104.700(a), 104.720, 104.790(b),104.910(d), 115.3(a) (ii), (iii) and (iv), and 115.4(b)(2)(i). No burdenhours are reported for Part 110 since public disclosure of informationoriginally supplied by the Federal Government to the recipient for thepurposes of disclosure is not a collection of information. (See 5 CFR 1230.7(c)(2)).No burden hours are included for andSection;121.2 because information collectionrequirements on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, handicap,and family characteristics will be imposed under the regulations applicableto the specific HUD program.The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under Executive Order No.12606_The Family, has determined that this rule, if implemented, may havea significant impact on family formation, maintenace and general well-beingbecause the rule provides Federal law enforcement assistance to familiesconfronting housing discrimination based on race, color, religion, nationalorigin, familial status or handicap. However, review under the Order isnot required because the statutory mandate leaves little effective discretionin the Department to lessen the family impact. In any event, the purposeof the statute is to have a positive impact on family values by offeringa measure of protection to persons confronting illegal discrimination.The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under section 6(a) of ExecutiveOrder No. 12612_Federalism, has determined that the policies containedin this rule would, if implemented, have federalism implications and aresubject to review under the Order. Specifically, the amended statute continuesto provide for referral to State and local fair housing enforcement agencies.However, in the future the determination of substantial equivalency willdepend upon State and local enforcement machinery that matches up withthe much-strengthened Federal law. Accordingly, the effect of the amendedFair Housing Act will be to encourage States and localities to amend theirlaws to match the Federal enforcement machinery, or suffer the eventualloss of recognition as substantially equivalent State or local agenciesand possible loss of function if citizens of the jurisdiction do not chooseto file complaints with State or local officials. Additionally, jurisdictionslosing equivalency status will lose eligibility for grant funds availableto co-enforcers of fair housing laws.While the rule would have federalism impacts, review under the FederalismExecutive Order is not required because the implementation of the statuteleaves little discretion with HUD to lessen these impacts. HUD's statutorymandate is clear_it must accept complaints nationwide, and refer complaintsfor processing (after the initial grandfather period) only to jurisdictionswith substantially equivalent laws. Moreover, since the statute addressesthe Federalism issue by declaring that certain conduct will be illegaland by providing machinery for referral to State and local authority underappropriate circumstances, further study of Federalism implications couldnot appreciably affect the approach taken in the implementing regulations.This rule was not listed in the Department's Semiannual Agenda of Regulationspublished April 25, 1988 (53 FR 13854) under Executive Order 12291 andthe Regulatory Flexibility Act.<ITAG tagnum="20">(The Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program number and titleis 14.400 Equal Opportunity in Housing.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>24 CFR Part 14Equal access to justice, Lawyers, Claims.24 CFR Part 100Fair housing, Incorporation by reference, Nondiscrimination.24 CFR Part 103Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing.24 CFR Part 104Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing.24 CFR Part 105Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing.24 CFR Part 106Administrative practice and procedure, Fair housing.24 CFR Part 109Advertising, Fair housing, Signs and symbols.24 CFR Part 110Fair housing, Signs and symbols.24 CFR Part 115Fair housing, Intergovernmental relations.24 CFR Part 121Fair housing, Statistics, Reporting and Recordkeeping requirements.Accordingly, Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations would be amendedto read as follows. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 14_IMPLEMENTATION OF THE EQUAL ACCESS TO JUSTICE ACT IN ADMINISTRATIVEPROCEEDINGS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 14 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 504(c)(1) of the Equal Access to Justice Act (5U.S.C. 504(c)(1); sec 7(d) of the Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>2. In andSection; 14.115, the phrase ``or'' at the end of paragraph (a)(8)would be deleted, the period at the end of paragraph (a)(9) would be deletedand in its place the phrase ``; or'' would be added, and a new paragraph(a)(10) would be added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 14.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proceedings covered. </ITAG>(a) * * * (10) Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620) and24 CFR Part 104. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>3. Part 100 would be redesignated as Part 121, and a new Part 100 wouldbe added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 100_DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT UNDER THE FAIR HOUSING ACT </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.1 Authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.5 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.10 Exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.20 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.50 Real estate practices prohibited. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.60 Unlawful refusal to sell or rent or to negotiate for the saleor rental. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.65 Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and in servicesand facilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.70 Other prohibited sale and rental conduct. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.75 Discriminatory advertisements, statements and notices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.80 Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.85 Blockbusting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.90 Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Discrimination in Residential Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.110 Discriminatory practices in residential real estate-relatedtransactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.115 Residential real estate-related transactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.120 Discrimination in the making of loans and in the provisionof other financial assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.125 Discrimination in the purchasing of loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.130 Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making availableloans or other financial assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.135 Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering or appraisingof residential real property. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart D_Prohibitions Against Discrimination Because of Handicap</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.200 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.201 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.202 General prohibitions against discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.203 Reasonable modifications of existing premises. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.204 Reasonable accommodations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.205 Design and construction requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.300 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.301 Exemption. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.302 State and Federal elderly housing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.303 62 or over housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.304 55 or over housing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion or Intimidation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">100.400 Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620;section 7(d), Department of HUD Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority. </ITAG>This regulation is issued under the authority of the Secretary of Housingand Urban Development to administer and enforce Title VIII of the CivilRights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988(the Fair Housing Act). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>(a) It is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutionallimitations, for fair housing throughout the United States. No person shallbe subjected to discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin in the sale, rental, or advertisingof dwellings, in the provision of brokerage services, or in residentialreal estate related transactions. (b) This part provides the Department's interpretation of the coverageof the Fair Housing Act regarding discrimination related to the sale orrental of dwellings, the provision of services in connection therewith,and the availability of real estate related transactions. (c) Nothing in this part relieves persons participating in a Federal orFederally Assisted program or activity from other requirements applicableto buildings and dwellings. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions. </ITAG>(a) This part does not: (1) Prohibit a religious organization, association, or society, or anynonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised or controlledby or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society,from limiting the sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings which it ownsor operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the samereligion, or from giving preference to such persons, unless membershipin such religion is restricted on account of race, color, or national origin;(2) Prohibit a private club, not in fact open to the public, which, incidentto its primary purpose or purposes, provides lodgings which it owns oroperates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting the rentalor occupancy of such lodgings to its members or from giving preferenceto its members; or (3) Limit the applicability of any reasonable local, State or Federal restrictionsregarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling;or (4) Prohibit conduct against a person because such person has been convictedby any court of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distributionof a controlled substance as defined in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802). (b) Nothing in this part regarding familial status applies with respectto housing for older persons as defined in Subpart E of this Part. (c) Nothing in this part, other than the prohibitions against discriminatoryadvertising, applies to: (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by an owner providedthe following conditions are met: (i) The owner does not own or have any interest in more than three singlefamily houses at any one time; and (ii) The house is sold or rented without the use of a real estate broker,agent or salesperson or the facilities of any person in the business ofselling or renting dwellings. If the owner selling the house does not residein it at the time of the sale or was not the most recent resident of thehouse prior to such sale, the exemption in this paragraph (c)(1) appliesto only one such sale in any 24-month period. (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied orintended to be occupied by no more than four families living independentlyof each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies one of suchliving quarters as his or her residence. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this Part: ``Aggrieved Person'' includes any person who_ (a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that such person will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur. ``Broker'' or ``Agent'' means any person authorized to perform an actionon behalf of another person regarding any matter related to the sale orrental of dwellings, including offers, solicitations or contracts and theadministration of matters regarding such offers, solicitations or contractsor any real estate related transactions. ``Department'' means the Department of Housing and Urban Development. ``Discriminatory Housing Practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersection 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Fair Housing Act. ``Dwelling'' means any building, structure or portion thereof, which isoccupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by oneor more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale or leasefor the construction or location thereon of any such building, structureor portion thereof, including mobile home parks, trailer courts, condominiums,cooperatives and time-sharing properties.``Fair Housing Act'' means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 asamended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620).``Familial status'' means one or more individuals (who have not attainedthe age of 18 years) being domiciled with_(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individualor individuals; or (b) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, withthe written permission of such parent or other person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familialstatus shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is the process of securinglegal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years.``Handicap'' is defined in andSection; 100.201.``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers fiduciaries,governmental entities, banks, building and loan associations, or otherfirms or enterprises.``Person in the business of selling or renting'' means any person who:(a) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as principal inthree or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwellingor any interest therein, or (b) Within the preceding twelve months, has participated as agent, otherthan in the sale of his or her own personal residence, in providing salesor rental facilities or sales or rental services in two or more transactionsinvolving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein, or(c) Is the owner of any dwelling designed or intended for occupancy by,or occupied by, five or more families.``Secretary'' means the Secretary of the Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment.``State'' means any of the several States, the District of Columbia, theCommonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Discriminatory Housing Practices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Real estate practices prohibited.</ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of conduct thatis unlawful housing discrimination under section 804 and section 806 ofthe Fair Housing Act. In general the prohibited actions are set forth undersections of this subpart which are most applicable to the discriminatoryconduct described. However, an action illustrated in one section can constitutea violation under other sections in the subpart. For example, the conductdescribed in andSection; 100.60(b)(3)-(5) would constitute a violation ofandSection; 100.65(a) as well as andSection; 100.60(a). (b) It shall be unlawful to:(1) Refuse to sell or rent a dwelling after a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer has been made, or to refuse to negotiate for thesale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, familialstatus, or national origin, or to discriminate in the sale or rental ofa dwelling because of handicap.(2) Discriminate in the terms, conditions or privileges of sale or rental,or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with salesor rentals because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(3) Engage in any conduct relating to the provision of housing which otherwisemakes unavailable or denies dwellings to persons because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status or national origin.(4) Make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or published,any advertisement, notice or statement that indicates any preference, limitationor discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin or an intention to make any such preference,limitation or discrimination. (5) Represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin that a dwelling is not available forsale or rental when such dwelling is in fact available.(6) Engage in blockbusting practices in connection with the sale or rentalof dwellings because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.(7) Deny access to or membership or participation in, or to discriminateagainst any person in his or her access to or membership or participationin, any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' association, orother service organization or facility relating to the business of sellingor renting a dwelling or in the terms or conditions of membership or participation,because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin.(c) The application of the Fair Housing Act with respect to persons withhandicaps is discussed in Subpart D of the Part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful refusal to sell or rent or to negotiate for the sale or rental.</ITAG>(a) It is unlawful for a person to refuse to sell or rent a dwelling toa person who has made a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer, because of race, color, religion, sex, familialstatus, or national origin, or to refuse to negotiate with a person forthe sale or rental of a dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex,familial status, or national origin or to discriminate against any personin the sale or rental of a dwelling because of handicap.(b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Failing to accept or consider a <T3>bona fide</T3> offer because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(2) Refusing to sell or rent a dwelling to, or to negotiate for the saleor rental of a dwelling with, any person because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(3) Imposing different sales prices or rental charges for the sale or rentalof a dwelling upon any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (4) Using different qualification criteria or applications, or sale orrental standards or procedures, such as income standards, application requirements,application fees, credit analysis or sale or rental approval proceduresor other requirements, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(5) Providing different information, promotional activity, encouragementor salesmanship because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin or operating a business in a manner that conveysthat housing is available only to persons of a particular race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(6) Evicting any tenants because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin or because of the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of a tenant's guest.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in terms, conditions and privileges and in servicesand facilities.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin to impose different terms, conditionsor privileges relating to the sale or rental of a dwelling or to deny orlimit services or facilities in connection with the sale or rental of adwelling.(b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Using different provisions in leases or contracts of sale such as thoserelating to rental charges, security deposits and the terms of a leaseand those relating to down payment and closing requirements because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Denying or limiting discounts, rebates, gifts or any other incentives,benefits or privileges available to persons in connection with the saleor rental of dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(3) Failing or delaying maintenance or repairs of sale or rental dwellingbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(4) Failing to process an offer for the sale or rental of a dwelling orto communicate an offer accurately because of race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin.(5) Limiting the use of privileges, services or facilities associated witha dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin of an owner, tenant or a person associated with himor her.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other prohibited sale and rental conduct.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin to restrict or attempt to restrictthe choices of a person by word or conduct in connection with seeking,negotiating for, buying or renting a dwelling so as to perpetuate, or tendto perpetuate, segregated housing patterns, or to discourage or obstructchoices in a community, neighorhood or development.(b) It shall be unlawful to because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin to engage in any conduct relating tothe provision of housing or of services and facilities in connection therewiththat otherwise makes unavailable or denies dwellings to persons.(c) Prohibited actions under paragraph (a), which are generally referredto as unlawful steering practices, include, but are not limited to:(1) Directing any person to dwellings in a particular community, neighborhoodor development because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin or referring because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin any purchaser or renterto persons in the business of selling or renting dwellings who sell orrent dwelling or provide sales or rental services principally in areaspredominantly or increasingly inhabited by persons of the prospect's race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Discouraging any person from inspecting, purchasing or renting a dwellingbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin or because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin of persons in a community, neighborhood or development.(3) Exaggerating drawbacks or failing to inform any person of desirablefeatures of a dwelling or of a community, neighborhood, or developmentin order to discourage the purchase or rental of a dwelling because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(4) Communicating to any prospective purchaser or renter that he or shewould not be comfortable or compatible with existing residents of a community,neighborhood or development because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(5) Assigning any person to a particular section of a community, neighborhoodor development or to a particular floor of a building because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) Prohibited sales and rental activities under paragraph (b) include,but are not limited to:(1) Employing policies, procedures or activities with respect to the saleor rental of dwellings to encourage, permit or reward discriminatory housingpractices, such as assigning employees, brokers or agents to a sales orrental office because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of persons residing in the area of that office,or varying compensation provided to sales and rental employees, brokersor agents because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(2) Engaging in conduct which limits information available to a prospectivepurchaser or renter, such as showing a prospective purchaser or renterless desirable units in a project, providing different or more limitedtours of a subdivision, neighborhood or community, refusing to deal withpersons who cannot speak English or who cannot see or hear, when thereis a means to do so or using different listing books in order to discouragepersons from purchasing or renting dwellings because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(3) Discharging or taking other adverse action against an employee, brokeror agent because he or she refused to participate in a discriminatory housingpractice.(4) Employing codes or other devices to segregate or reject applicants,purchasers or renters, refusing to take or to show listings of dwellingsin certain areas because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin or refusing to deal with certain brokers oragents because one more of their clients are of a particular race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origins.(5) Denying or delaying the processing of an application made by a purchaseror renter or refusing to approve such a person for occupancy in a cooperativeor condominium dwelling because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin. (6) Publishing advertisements displaying the equal housing opportunityslogan, logotype or statement selectively because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, such as by using suchfair housing advertising techniques in predominantly minority areas andintegrated areas, but not using these techniques for dwellings locatedin primarily nonminority areas.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory advertisements, statements and notices.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to make, print or publish or cause to be madeprinted or published any notice, statement or advertisement with respectto the sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitationor discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin or an intention to make any such preference,limitation or discrimination.(b) The prohibitions in this section shall apply to all written or oralnotices or statements by a person engaged in the sale or rental of a dwelling.Written notices and statements include any applications, flyers, brochures,deeds, signs, banners, posters, billboards or any documents used with respectto the sale or rental of a dwelling.(c) Discriminatory notices, statements and advertisements include, butare not limited to:(1) Using words, phrases, photographs, illustrations, symbols or formswhich convey that dwellings are available or not available to a particulargroup of persons based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.(2) Expressing to agents, brokers, employees, prospective sellers or rentersor any other persons a preference for or limitation on any purchaser orrenter based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin of such persons.(3) Selecting media or locations for advertising the sale or rental ofdwellings in order to deny particular segments of the housing market informationabout housing opportunities because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(4) Refusing to publish advertising for the sale or rental of dwellingsor requiring different charges or terms for such advertising because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) Part 109 of this Title 24 provides information to assist persons toadvertise dwellings in a nondiscriminatory manner and describes the mattersthe Department will review in evaluating compliance with the Fair HousingAct in investigating complaints alleging discriminatory housing practicesinvolving advertising.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory representations on the availability of dwellings.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin to provide inaccurate or untrue informationabout the availability of dwellings for sale or rental.(b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Indicating through words or conduct that a dwelling which is availablefor inspection, sale, or rental has been sold or rented, because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Representing that covenants or other deed, trust or lease provisionswhich purport to restrict the sale or rental of dwellings to persons becauseof race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originpreclude the sale or rental of a dwelling to a person.(3) Enforcing covenants or other deed, trust or lease provisions in orderto preclude the sale or rental of a dwelling to any person because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(4) Limiting information, by word or conduct, regarding suitably priceddwellings available for inspection, sale or rental, because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Blockbusting.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unalwful, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce aperson to sell or rent a dwelling by representations regarding the entryor prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of aparticular race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national originor with a handicap.(b) In establishing a discriminatory housing practice under this sectionit is not necessary that there was in fact profit as long as profit wasa factor for engaging in the blockbusting activity.(c) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Engaging, for profit, in conduct to convey to a person that a neighborhoodis undergoing or is about to undergo a change in the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of persons residingin it in order to encourage the person to offer a dwelling for sale orrental.(2) Encouraging, for profit, any person to sell or rent a dwelling throughassertions that the entry or prospective entry of persons of a particularrace, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin or withhandicaps can or will result in undesirable consequences for the project,neighborhood or community, such as a lowering of property values, an increasein criminal or antisocial behavior or a decline in the quality of schoolsor other services or facilities.(3) Engaging in uninvited solicitations for listings in a neighborhoodwhich are different or more intense than uninvited solicitation activityin other neighborhoods, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the provision of brokerage services.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership orparticipation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organizationor other service, organization, or facility relating to the business ofselling or renting dwellings, or to discriminate against any person inthe terms or conditions of such access, membership or participation onaccount of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(b) Prohibited actions under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Setting different fees for access to or membership in a multiple listingservice based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(2) Denying or limiting benefits accruing to members in a real estate brokers'organization because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.(3) Imposing different standards or criteria for membership in real estatesales or rental organization based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Discrimination in Real Estate-Related Transactions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discriminatory practices in real estate-related transactions.</ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of the conductthat is unlawful housing discrimination under section 805 of the Fair HousingAct.(b) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available such a transaction, or in the termsor conditions of such a transaction, because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Residential real estate-related transactions.</ITAG>(a) The term ``real estate-related transactions'' means:(1) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance_(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing or maintaining adwelling; or(ii) Secured by residential real estate, or(2) The selling, brokering or appraising of residential real estate property.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.120 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the availability of loans and other financial assistance.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity whose business includesengaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available loans or other financial assistancefor a dwelling, or which is or is to be secured by a dwelling because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(b) Prohibited practices under this section include, but are not limitedto:(1) Refusing to provide a loan or other financial assistance to any personfor the purchase, construction, repair or maintenance of a dwelling orrefusing to provide a loan or other financial assistance which is or wouldbe secured by residential real estate because of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Failing or refusing to provide to any person, in connection with aresidential real estate-related transaction, information regarding theavailability of loans or other financial assistance, application requirements,procedures or standards for the review and approval of loans or financialassistance, or providing information which is inaccurate or different fromthat provided others, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(3) Making or causing to be made any advertisement or any oral or writtennotice or statement, as described in andSection; 100.75(b) of this Part,with respect to loans or other financial assistance for dwellings or whichare secured by residential real estate indicating any preference, limitation,condition, or distinction, or an intention to make any preference, limitation,condition, or distinction, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(4) Denying or limiting services, facilities or privileges in connectionwith a loan or other financial assistance for a dwelling, or, in connectionwith a loan or other financial assistance which is or would be securedby residential real estate because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(5) Discouraging any person from inquiring about or making an applicationfor a loan or other financial assistance for a dwelling, or in connectionwith a loan or other financial assistance which is or would be securedby residential real estate because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(6) Failing or refusing to provide information, or to accept an applicationor to approve a long or other financial assistance for a dwelling becauseof the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin of the present or prospective residents or occupants of dwellingsin the area.(7) Engaging in any conduct, because of the race, color, religion, sex,handicap, familial status, or national origin of any person seeking a loanor other financial assistance, or because of the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of any person associatedwith such persons with regard to a loan or other financial assistance fora dwelling which would otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.125 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the purchasing of loans.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity engaged in the purchasingof loans or other debts of securities which support the purchase, construction,improvement, repair or maintenance of a dwelling, or which are securedby residential real estate, to refuse to purchase such loans, debts, orsecurities, or to impose different terms or conditions for such purchases,because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(b) Unlawful conduct under this section includes, but is not limited to:(1) Purchasing loans or other debts or securities which relate to, or whichare secured by dwellings in certain communities or neighborhoods but notin others because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of person in such neighborhoods or communities.(2) Pooling or packaging loans or other debts or securities which relateto, or which are secured by dwellings differently because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(3) Imposing or using different terms or conditions on the marketing orsale of securities issued on the basis of loans or other debts or securitieswhich relate to, or which are secured by dwellings because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.130 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discrimination in the terms and conditions for making available loansor other financial assistance.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or entity engaged in the makingof loans or in the provision of other financial assistance relating tothe purchase, construction, improvement repair or maintenance of dwellingsor which are secured by residential real estate to impose different termsor conditions for the availability of such loans or other financial assistancebecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(b) Unlawful conduct under this section includes, but is not limited to:(1) Using different qualification requirements, processing procedures,or evaluation standards in accepting applications or in approving loansand other financial assistance for dwellings or which are secured by dwellingsbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(2) Using different policies, practices or procedures in evaluating orin determining creditworthiness of any person in connection with the provisionof any loan or other financial assistance for a dwelling or for any loanor other financial assistance which is secured by residential real estatebecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(3) Determining the type of loan or other financial assistance to be providedwith respect to dwelling or fixing the amount, interest rate, durationor other terms for a loan or other financial assistance for a dwellingor which is secured by residential real estate because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(4) Failing to make available the same information or the same types ofloans or other financial assistance which are for a dwelling or which are,or would be, secured by dwellings because of the race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin of the present or theprospective residents or occupants of dwellings in the area of the dwellingfor which such loan or other financial assistance is sought or in the areain which a dwelling, which is provided for security, is located.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.135 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful practices in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residentialreal property.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in the selling, brokering or appraising of residentialreal property to discriminate against any person in making available suchservices, or in the terms or conditions of the availability of such servicesbecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(b) For the purposes of this section, the term appraisal means an estimateor opinion of the value of a specified residential real property made ina commercial context in connection with the sale, rental, financing orrefinancing of a dwelling or in connection with any activity that otherwiseaffects the availability of a residential real estate-related transaction,whether the appraisal is oral or written, or transmitted formally or informally.The appraisal includes all written comments and other documents submittedas support for the estimate or opinion of value.(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a person engaged in the businessof making or furnishing appraisals of residential real property from takinginto consideration factors other than race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin.(d) Practices which are unlawful under this section include, but are notlimited to:(1) Taking into consideration any factor in connection with the selling,brokering or appraising of residential real property because of race, color,religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(2) Imposing different standards or procedures in the selling or brokeringof dwellings or in conducting an appraisal of residential real propertybecause of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin.(3) Instructing or encouraging any person, either by statement or conduct,or imposing standards requiring any person, to consider any factor whichrelates to race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin in the selling or brokering of residential real-estate transactionsor in making an appraisal of residential real property.(4) Using an appraisal of residential real property in connection withthe sale, rental, or financing of any dwelling where the person knows orreasonably should know that the appraisal takes into consideration a factoror factors based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin, or using any information contained in an appraisalreport with respect to an appraisal which relates to race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Prohibitions Against Discrimination Because of Handicap</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this subpart is to effectuate sections (6)(a) and (b) and15 of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this subpart:``Accessible'', when used with respect to the public and common use areasof a building containing covered multifamily dwellings, means that thepublic or common use areas of the building can be approached, entered,and used by individuals with physical handicaps. The phrase ``readily accessibleto and usable by'' is synonymous with accessible. A public or common usearea that complies with the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1 oranother standard that affords handicapped persons access essentially equivalentto or greater than that required by ANSI A117.1 is ``accessible'' withinthe meaning of this paragraph. ``Accessible route'' means a continuous unobstructed path connecting accessibleelements and spaces in a building or within a site that can be negotiatedby a person with a severe disability using a wheelchair and that is alsosafe for and usable by people with other disabilities. Interior accessibleroutes may include corridors, floors, ramps, elevators and lifts. Exterioraccessible routes may include parking access aisles, curb ramps, walks,ramps and lifts. A route that complies with the appropriate requirementsof ANSI A117.1 is an ``accessible route''.``ANSI A117.1'' means the American National Standard for buildings andfacilities providing accessibility and usability for physically handicappedpeople. This incorporation by reference was approved by the Director ofthe Federal Register in accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552(a) and 1 CFR Part51. Copies may be obtained from American National Standards Institute,Inc., 1430 Broadway, New York, New York 10018. Copies may be inspectedat the Department of Housing and Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street,SW., Room 10276, Washington, DC, or at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Room 8401, Washington, DC.``Building'' means a structure, facility or the portion thereof that containsor serves one or more dwelling units.``Building entrance on an accessible route'' means an accessible entranceto a building that is connected by an accessible route within the boundaryof the site to public transportation stops, to accessible parking and passengerloading zones, and to public streets or sidewalks, if available. A buildingentrance that complies with ANSI A117.1 complies with the requirementsof this paragraph.``Common use areas'' means rooms, spaces or elements inside or outsideof a building that are made advailable for the use of residents of a buildingor the guests thereof. These areas include hallways, lounges, lobbies,laundry rooms, refuse rooms and passageways among and between buildings.``Controlled substance'' means any drug or other substance, or immediateprecursor included in the definition in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (21 U.S.C. 802).``Covered multifamily dwellings'' means buildings consisting of 4 or moredwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and groundfloor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of 4 or more dwellingunits.``Dwelling unit'' means any building, structure or portion thereof whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone person or family. Examples of dwelling units include single familydetached houses, townhouses, apartments, and condominiums. ``Entrance'' means any access point to a building used by residents forthe purpose of entering.``Exterior'' means all areas of the premises outside of an individual dwellingunit.``First occupancy'' means a building that has never before been used forany purpose.``Ground floor'' means a floor of a building with a building entrance onan accessible route. A building may have more than one ground floor.``Handicap'' means, with respect to a person, a physical or mental impairmentwhich substantially limits one or more major life activities; a recordof such an impairment; or being regarded as having such an impairment.This term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlledsubstance. For purposes of this part, an individual shall not be consideredto have a handicap solely because that individual is a transvestite. Asused in this definition:(a) ``Phyiscal or mental impairment'' includes:(1) Any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, oranatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: Neurological;musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory, including speech organs;cardiovascular; reproductive; digestive; genito-urinary; hemic and lymphatic;skin; and endocrine; or(2) Any mental or psychological disorder, such as mental retardation, organicbrain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities.The term ``physical or mental impairment'' includes, but is not limitedto, such diseases and conditions as orthopedic, visual, speech and hearingimpairments, cerebral palsy, autism, epilepsy, muscular dystrophy, multiplesclerosis, cancer, heart disease, diabetes, mental retardation, emotionalillness, drug addiction (other than addiction caused by current, illegaluse of a controlled substance) and alcoholism.(b) ``Major life activities'' means functions such as caring for one'sself, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing,learning and working.(c) ``Has a record of such an impairment'' means has a history of, or hasbeen misclassified as having, a mental or physical impairment that substantiallylimits one or more major life activities.(d) ``Is regarded as having an impairment'' means:(1) Has a physical or mental impairment that does not substantially limitone or more major life activities but that is treated by another personas constituting such a limitation;(2) Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one ormore major life activities only as a result of the attitudes of otherstoward such impairment; or(3) Has none of the impairments defined in paragraph (a) of this definitionbut is treated by another person as having such an impairment.``Interior'' means the spaces, parts, components or elements of an individualdwelling unit. ``Modification'' means any change to the public or common use areas ofa building or any change to a dwelling unit.``Premises'' means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components orelements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the publicand common use areas of a building.``Public use areas'' means rooms or spaces of a building that are madeavailable to the general public. Public use may be provided at a buildingthat is privately or publicly owned.``Site'' means a parcel of land bounded by a property line or a designatedportion of a public right of way.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General prohibitions against discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful to discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwisemake unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because ofa handicap of_(1) That buyer or renter; (2) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling afterit is so sold, rented, or made available; or(3) Any person associated with that person.(b) It shall be unlawful to discriminate against any person in the terms,conditions, or privileges of the sale or rental of a dwelling, or in theprovision of services or facilities in connection with such dwelling, becauseof a handicap of_(1) That buyer or renter;(2) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling afterit is so sold, rented, or made available; or(3) Any person associated with that person.(c) It shall be unlawful to make an inquiry to determine whether an applicantfor a dwelling, a person intending to reside in that dwelling after itis so sold, rented or made available, or any person associated with thatperson, has a handicap or to make inquiry as to the nature or severityof a handicap of such a person. However, this paragraph does not prohibitthe following inquiries, provided these inquiries are made of all applicants,whether or not they have handicaps: (1) Inquiry into an applicant's ability to meet the requirements of ownershipor tenancy;(2) Inquiry to determine whether an applicant is qualified for a dwellingavailable only to persons with handicaps or to persons with a particulartype of handicap;(3) Inquiry to determine whether an applicant for a dwelling is qualifiedfor a priority available to persons with handicaps or to persons with aparticular type of handicap;(4) Inquiring whether an applicant for a dwelling is a current illegalabuser or addict of a controlled substance;(5) Inquiring whether an applicant has been convicted of the illegal manufactureor distribution of a controlled substance.(d) Nothing in this subpart requires that a dwelling be made availableto an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to thehealth or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result insubstantial physical damage to the property of others.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable modifications of existing premises.</ITAG>(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to permit, at the expenseof a handicapped person, reasonable modifications of existing premises,occupied or to be occupied by a handicapped person, if the proposed modificationsmay be necessary to afford the handicapped person full enjoyment of thepremises of a dwelling. In the case of a rental, the landlord may, whereit is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on therenter agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the conditionthat existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.The landlord may not, however, increase for handicapped persons any customarilyrequired security deposit for this purpose.(b) The application of paragraph (a) may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (1): </T4>A tenant with a handicap asks his or her landlordfor permission to install grab bars in the bathroom at his or her own expense.It is necessary to reinforce the walls with blocking between studs in orderto affix the grab bars. It is unlawful for the landlord to refuse to permitthe tenant, at the tenant's own expense, from making the modificationsnecessary to add the grab bars. However, the landlord may condition permissionfor the modification on the tenant agreeing to restore the bathroom tothe condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear ortear excepted. It would be reasonable for the landlord to require the tenantto remove the grab bars at the end of the tenancy. The landlord may alsoreasonably require that the wall to which the grab bars are to be attachedbe repaired and restored to its original condition, reasonable wear andtear excepted. However, it would be unreasonable for the landlord to requirethe tenant to remove the blocking, since the reinforced walls will notundermine the integrity of the wall or otherwise interfere in any way withthe landlord's or the next tenant's use and enjoyment of the premises andmay be needed by some future tenant. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (2): </T4>An applicant for rental housing has a child who usesa wheelchair. The bathroom door in the dwelling unit is too narrow to permitthe wheelchair to pass. The applicant asks the landlord for permissionto widen the doorway at the applicant's own expense. It is unlawful forthe landlord to refuse to permit the applicant to make the modification.Further, the landlord may <T3>not</T3>, in usual circumstances, condition permission for the modificationon the applicant paying for the doorway to be narrowed at the end of thelease because a wider doorway will not interfere with the landlord's orthe next tenant's use and enjoyment of the premises.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable accommodations.</ITAG>(a) It is unlawful for any person to refuse to make reasonable accommodationsin rules, policies, practices, or services, when such accommodations maybe necessary to afford a handicapped person equal opportunity to use andenjoy a dwelling unit, including public and common use areas.(b) The application of this section may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (1): </T4>A blind applicant for rental housing wants to livein a dwelling unit with a seeing eye dog. The building has a ``no pets''policy. It is a violation of andSection; 100.204 for the owner or managerof the apartment complex to refuse to permit the applicant to live in theapartment with a seeing eye dog because, without the seeing eye dog, theblind person will not have an equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (2): </T4>Progress Gardens is a 300 unit apartment complexwith 450 parking spaces which are available to tenants and guests of ProgressGardens on a ``first come first served'' basis. John applies for housingin Progress Gardens. John is mobility impaired and is unable to walk morethan a short distance and therefore requests that a parking space nearhis unit be reserved for him so he will not have to walk very far to getto his apartment. It is a violation of andSection;100.204 for the owner ormanager of Progress Gardens to refuse to make this accommodation. Withouta reserved space, John might be unable to live in Progress Gardens at allor, when he has to park in a space far from his unit, might have greatdifficulty getting from his car to his apartment unit. The accommodationtherefore is necessary to afford John an equal opportunity to use and enjoya dwelling. The accommodation is reasonable because it is feasible andpractical under the circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Design and construction requirements.</ITAG>(a) Covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991shall be designed and constructed to have at least one building entranceon an accessible route unless it is impractical to do so because of theterrain or unusual characteristics of the site. The burden of establishingimpracticality because of terrain or unusual site characteristics is onthe person or persons who designed or constructed the housing facility.(b) The application of paragraph (a) may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (1):</T4> A real estate developer plans to construct six townhouses on a site with a hilly terrain. Because of the terrain, it willbe necessary to climb a long and steep stairway in order to enter eachtownhouse. Since there is no practical way to provide an accessible routeto any of the town houses, one need not be provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (2):</T4> A real estate developer plans to construct a buildingconsisting of 10 units of multifamily housing on a waterfront site thatfloods frequently. Because of this unusual characteristic of the site,the builder plans to construct the building on stilts. It is customaryfor housing in the geographic area where the site is located to be builton stilts. The housing may lawfully be constructed on the proposed siteon stilts even though this means that there will be no practical way toprovide an accessible route to the building entrance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (3):</T4> A real estate developer plans to construct a multifamilyhousing facility on a particular site. The developer would like the facilityto be built on the site to contain as many units as possible. Because ofthe configuration and terrain of the site, it is possible to constructa building with 105 units on the site provided the site does not have anaccessible route leading to the building entrance. It is also possibleto construct a building on the site with an accessible route leading tothe building entrance. However, such a building would have no more than100 dwelling units. The building to be constructed on the site must havea building entrance on an accessible route because it is not impracticalto provide such an entrance because of the terrain or unusual characteristicsof the site.</ITAG>(c) All covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13,1991 with a building entrance on an accessible route shall be designedand constructed in such a manner that_(1) The public and common use areas are readily accessible to and usableby handicapped persons;(2) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premisesare sufficiently wide to allow passage by handicapped persons in wheelchairs;and(3) All premises within covered multifamily dwelling units contain thefollowing features of adaptable design:(i) An accessible route into and through the covered dwelling unit;(ii) Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmentalcontrols in accessible locations;(iii) Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grabbars around the toilet, tub, shower, stall and shower seat, where suchfacilities are provided; and(iv) Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchaircan maneuver about the space.(d) The application of paragraph (c) may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (1):</T4> A developer plans to construct a 100 unit condominiumapartment building with one elevator. In accordance with paragraph (a),the building has at least one accessible route leading to an accessibleentrance. All 100 units are covered multifamily dwelling units and theyall must be designed and constructed so that they comply with the accessibilityrequirements of paragraph (c).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (2):</T4> A developer plans to construct 30 garden apartmentsin a three story building. The building will not have an elevator. Thebuilding will have one accessible entrance which will be on the first floor.Since the building does not have an elevator, only the ``ground floor''units are covered multifamily units. The ``ground floor'' is the firstfloor because that is the floor that has an accessible entrance. All ofthe dwelling units on the first floor must meet the accessibility requirementsof paragraph (c) and must have access to at least one of each type of publicor common use area available for residents in the building.</ITAG>(e) Compliance with the appropriate requirements of ANSI A117.1 sufficesto satisfy the requirements of paragraph (c)(3).(f) Compliance with a duly enacted law of a State or unit of general localgovernment that includes the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c) satisfiesthe requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c).(g)(1) It is the policy of HUD to encourage States and units of generallocal government to include, in their existing procedures for the reviewand approval of newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinationsas to whether the design and construction of such dwellings are consistentwith paragraphs (a) and (c).(2) A State or unit of general local government may review and approvenewly constructed multifamily dwellings for the purpose of making determinationsas to whether the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (c) are met.(h) Determinations of compliance or noncompliance by a State or a unitof general local government under paragraph (f) or (g) are not conclusivein enforcement proceedings under the Fair Housing Amendments Act.(i) This subpart does not invalidate or limit any law of a State or politicalsubdivision of a State that requires dwellings to be designed and constructedin a manner that affords handicapped persons greater access than is requiredby this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Housing for Older Persons</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this subpart is to effectuate the exemption in the FairHousing Amendments Act of 1988 that relates to housing for older persons.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Exemption.</ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status in this part shall not applyto housing for older persons if it meets the conditions in andSection;andSection;100.302, 100.303 or 100.304.(b) Nothing in this part limits the applicability of any reasonable local,State, or Federal restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupantspermitted to occupy a dwelling.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State and federal elderly housing programs.</ITAG>The provisions regarding familial status in this part shall not apply tohousing provided under any Federal or State program that the Secretarydetermines is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons,as defined in the State or Federal program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">62 or over housing.</ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status in this part shall not applyto housing intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of ageor older. Housing satisfies the requirements of this section even though:(1) There are persons residing in such housing on September 13, 1988 whoare under 62 years of age, provided that all new occupants are persons62 years of age or older;(2) There are unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved foroccupancy by persons 62 years of age or over.(b) The following examples illustrate the application of paragraph (a):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (1):</T4> John and Mary apply for housing at the Vista Heightsapartment complex which is an elderly housing complex operated for persons62 years of age or older. John is 62 years of age. Mary is 59 years ofage. If Vista Heights wishes to retain its ``62 or over'' exemption itmust refuse to rent to John and Mary because Mary is under 62 years ofage. However, if Vista Heights does rent to John and Mary, it might qualifyfor the ``55 or over'' exemption in andSection; 100.304.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example (2):</T4> The Blueberry Hill retirement community has 100 dwellingunits. On September 13, 1988, 15 units were vacant and 35 units were occupiedwith at least one person who is under 62 years of age. The remaining 50units were occupied by persons who were all 62 years of age or older. BlueberryHill can qualify for the ``62 or over'' exemption as long as all unitsthat were newly occupied after September 13, 1988 were occupied by personswho were 62 years of age or older. The people under 62 in the 35 unitspreviously described need not be required to leave for Blueberry Hill toqualify for the ``62 or over'' exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.304</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">55 or over housing.</ITAG>(a) The provisions regarding familial status shall not apply to housingintended and operated for occupancy by at least one person 55 years ofage or older per unit, <T3>Provided that</T3> the housing satisfies the requirements of andSection;100.304(b)(1) <T3>or</T3> (b)(2) <T3>and</T3> the requirements of andSection; 100.304(c).(b)(1) The housing facility has significant facilities and services specificallydesigned to meet the physical and social needs of older persons. ``Significantfacilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or socialneeds of older persons'' include an accessible physical environment, congregatedining facilities, social and recreational programs, emergency and preventivehealth care or programs, continuing education, welfare, information andcounseling, recreational, homemaker, outside maintenance and referral services,transportation to facilitate access to social services, and services designedto encourage and assist residents to use the services and facilities availableto them (the housing facility need not have all of these features to qualifyfor the exemption under this subparagraph); or(2) It is not practicable to provide significant facilities and servicesdesigned to meet the physical and social needs of older persons and thehousing facility is necessary to provide important housing opportunitiesfor older persons. The following factors, among others, are relevant indetermining whether a housing facility satisfies the requirements of paragraph(b)(2)_(i) Whether the owner or manager of the housing facility has endeavoredto provide significant facilities and services designed to meet the physicaland social needs of older persons.(ii) The cost of providing such services, including the availability ofsuch services at little or no cost to the owners or managers of the facility.(iii) The amount of rent charged, if the dwellings are rented. The priceof the dwellings, if they are offered for sale.(iv) The income range of the residents of the housing facility.(v) The demand for housing for older persons in the relevant geographicarea.(vi) The range of housing choices for older persons within the relevantgeographic area.(vii) The availability of other similarly priced housing for older personsin the relevant geographic area.(viii) The vacancy rate of the housing facility.(c)(1) At least 80% of the units in the housing facility are occupied byat least one person 55 years of age or older per unit <T3>except that </T3>a newly constructed housing facility for first occupancyafter March 12, 1989 need not comply with this paragraph (c)(1) until 25%of the units in the facility are occupied; and(2) The owner or manager of a housing facility publishes and adheres topolicies and procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or managerto provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. The followingfactors, among others, are relevant in determining whether the owner ormanager of a housing facility has complied with the requirements of paragraph(c)(2):(i) The manner in which the housing facility is described to prospectiveresidents.(ii) The nature of any advertising designed to attract prospective residents.(iii) Age verification procedures.(iv) Lease provisions.(v) Written rules and regulations.(vi) Actual practices of the owner or manager in enforcing relevant leaseprovisions and relevant rules or regulations.(d) Housing satisfies the requirements of this section even though:(1) On September 13, 1988, under 80% of the occupied units in the housingfacility are occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older perunit, provided that at least 80% of the units that are occupied by newoccupants after September 13, 1988 are occupied by at least one person55 years of age or older.(2) There are unoccupied units, provided that at least 80% of such unitsare reserved for occupancy by at least one person 55 years of age or over.(e) The application of this section may be illustrated by the followingexamples:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example 1:</T4> A. John and Mary apply for housing at the Valley Heightsapartment complex which is a 100 unit housing complex that is operatedfor persons 55 years of age or older in accordance with all the requirementsof this section. John is 56 years of age. Mary is 50 years of age. Eighty(80) units are occupied by at least one person who is 55 years of age orolder. Eighteen (18) units are occupied exclusively by persons who areunder 55 years of age. These 18 units were all occupied by new occupantsafter September 13, 1988. Two (2) units are vacant. At the time John andMary apply for housing, Valley Heights qualifies for the ``55 or over''exemption because 82% of the occupied units (80/98) at Valley Heights areoccupied by at least one person 55 years old or older. If John and Maryare accepted for occupancy, then 81 out of the 99 occupied units (82%)will be occupied by at least one person who is 55 years of age or olderand Valley Heights will continue to qualify for the ``55 or over'' exemption.If John and Mary had both been under 55 years old, they still could haveoccupied a unit without Valley Heights losing its exemption because, inthat case, 80 out of 99 occupied units (81%) would have been occupied byat least one person 55 years of age or older.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. If only 78 out of the 98 occupied units had been occupied by atleast one person 55 years of age or older, Valley Heights would still qualifyfor the exemption, but could not rent to John or Mary if they were bothunder 55 without losing the exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example 2: </T4>Green Meadow is a 1,000 unit retirement community thatprovides significant facilities and services specifically designed to meetthe physical or social needs of older persons. On September 13, 1988, GreenMeadow published and thereafter adhered to policies and procedures demonstratingan intent to provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. On September13, 1988, 100 units were vacant and 300 units were occupied only by peoplewho were under 55 years old. Consequently, on September 13, 1988, 67% ofthe Green Meadow's occupied units (600 out of 900) were occupied by atleast one person 55 years of age or older. Under paragraph (d)(1), GreenMeadow qualifies for the ``55 or over'' exemption even though, on September13, 1988, under 80% of the occupied units in the housing facility wereoccupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit, providedthat at least 80% of the units that were occupied by new occupants afterSeptember 13, 1988 are occupied by at least one person 55 years of ageor older. Under paragraph (d), Green Meadow qualifies for the ``55 or over''exemption, even though it has unoccupied units, provided that at least80% of its unoccupied units are reserved for occupancy by at least oneperson 55 years of age or over.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example 3: </T4>Waterfront Gardens is a 200 unit housing facility constructedafter March 12, 1989. The owner and manager of Waterfront Gardens intendsto operate the new facility in accordance with the requirements of thissection. Waterfront Gardens need not comply with the requirement in paragraph(c)(1) that at least 80% of the occupied units be occupied by at leastone person 55 years of age or older per unit <T3>until </T3>50 units (25%) are occupied. When the 50th unit is occupied,then 80% of the 50 occupied units (<T3>i.e., </T3>40 units) must be occupied by at least one person who is55 years of age or older for Waterfront Gardens to qualify for the ``55or over'' exemption.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Interference, Coercion, or Intimidation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 100.400. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited interference, coercion or intimidation.</ITAG>(a) This subpart provides the Department's interpretation of the conductthat is unlawful housing discrimination under section 818 of the Fair HousingAct.(b) It shall be unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interferewith any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of thatperson having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of that person havingaided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, anyright granted or protected by this part.(c) Conduct made unlawful under this section includes, but is not limitedto, the following:(1) Coercing a person, either orally, in writing, or by other means todeny or limit the benefits provided a person in connection with the saleor rental of a dwelling or in connection with a residential real estate-relatedtransaction because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(2) Threatening, intimidating or interfering with persons in their enjoymentof a dwelling because of the race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin of such persons, or of visitors or associatesof such persons.(3) Threatening an employee or agent with dismissal or an adverse employmentaction or taking such adverse employment action for any effort to assista person seeking access to the sale or rental of a dwelling or seekingaccess to any residential real estate-related transaction, because of therace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national originof that person or of any person associated with that person.(4) Intimidating or threatening any person because that person is engagingin activities designed to make other persons aware of, or to encouragesuch other persons to exercise rights granted or protected by this part.(5) Retaliating against any person because that person has made a complaint,testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in a proceeding underthe Fair Housing Act.4. Part 103 would be added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 103_FAIR HOUSING_COMPLAINT PROCESSING</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.1 Purpose and applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.5 Other civil rights authorities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.9 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Complaints</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.10 Submission of information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.15 Who may file complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.20 Persons against whom complaints may be filed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.25 Where to file complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.30 Form and content of complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.40 Date of filing of complaint.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.42 Amendment of complaint.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.45 Service of notice on aggrieved person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.50 Notification of respondent; joinder of additional or substituterespondents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.55 Answer to complaint.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.100 Notification and referral to substantially equivalent Stateor local agencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.105 Cessation of action on referred complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.110 Reactivation of referred complaints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.115 Notification upon reactivation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.200 Investigations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.205 Systemic processing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.215 Conduct of investigation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.220 Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.225 Completion of the investigation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.230 Final investigative report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.300 Conciliation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.310 Conciliation agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.315 Relief sought for aggrieved persons.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.320 Provisions sought for the public interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.325 Termination of conciliation efforts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.330 Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosure ofinformation obtained during conciliation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.335 Review of compliance with conciliation agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.400 Reasonable cause determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.405 Issuance of charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.410 Election of administrative proceeding or civil action.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Other Action by the Department</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.500 Prompt judicial action.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">103.510 Other action by HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620;section 7(d), Department of HUD Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Purpose and Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and applicability.</ITAG>(a) This part contains the procedures established by the Department ofHousing and Urban Development for the investigation and conciliation ofcomplaints under section 810 of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3610, asamended by the Fair Housing Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-430, approved September13, 1988).(b)(1) This part applies to:(i) Complaints filed on or after March 12, 1989 that involve alleged discriminatoryhousing practices that occur on or after March 12, 1989 or involve allegeddiscriminatory practices that occur before and continue on or after March12, 1989; and(ii) Complaints filed before March 12, 1989 that involve alleged discriminatoryhousing practices that occur before and continue on or after March 12,1989, where the complainant elects under andSection; 105.81 to proceed underthis part.(2) Part 104 governs the administrative proceedings before an administrativelaw judge adjudicating charges issued under andSection; 103.405.(3) Part 105 contains the procedures established by HUD for the investigationand conciliation of complaints filed with HUD under section 810 of theFair Housing Act, as it existed prior to the amendment of the Act by theFair Housing Amendments Act of 1988.(c) The procedures under this part for the investigation and conciliationof complaints will be conducted in accordance with section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other civil rights authorities.</ITAG>In addition to the Fair Housing Act, other civil rights authorities maybe applicable in a particular case. Thus, where a person charged with adiscriminatory housing practice in a complaint filed under section 810of the Fair Housing Act is also prohibited from engaging in similar practicesunder Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000d-2000d-5),section 109 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.5309), Executive Order No. 11063 of November 20, 1962, on Equal Opportunityin Housing (27 FR 11527-30, November 24, 1962), section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794) or other applicable law, the person may alsobe subject to action by HUD or other Federal agencies under the rules,regulations, and procedures prescribed under Title VI (24 CFR Parts 1 and2), section 109 (24 CFR 570.602)), Executive Order 11063 (24 CFR Part 107),section 504 (24 CFR Part 8), or other applicable law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part,<T3>Aggrieved person </T3>includes any person who:(a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that he or she will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur.<T3>Assistant Secretary </T3>means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity in HUD.<T3>Attorney General </T3>means the Attorney General of the United States.<T3>Complainant</T3> means the person (including the Assistant Secretary)who files a complaint under this part.<T3>Conciliation </T3>means the attempted resolution of issues raised bya complaint, or by the investigation of a complaint, through informal negotiationsinvolving the aggrieved person, the respondent, and the Assistant Secretary.<T3>Conciliation agreement </T3>means a written agreement setting forththe resolution of the issues in conciliation.<T3>Discriminatory housing practice </T3>means an act that is unlawfulunder section 804, 805, 806 or 818 of the Fair Housing Act, as describedin Part 100.<T3>Dwelling </T3>means any building, structure, or portion thereof, whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone or more families, or any vacant land which is offered for sale or leasefor the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure,or portion thereof, including mobile home parks and trailer courts.<T3>Fair Housing Act </T3>means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,42 U.S.C. 3600-3620, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988.<T3>General Counsel </T3>means the General Counsel of HUD.<T3>HUD </T3>means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Person </T3>includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts,unincorporated organizations, trustees, trusteesin cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers, fiduciaries,governmental entities, banks, building and loan associations, or otherfirms or enterprises.<T3>Personal service </T3>means handing a copy of the document to the personto be served or leaving a copy of the document with a person of suitableage and discretion at the place of business, residence or usual place ofabode of the person to be served.<T3>Receipt of notice </T3>means the day that personal service is completedby handing or delivering a copy of the document to an appropriate personor the date that a document is delivered by certified mail.<T3>Respondent </T3>means:(a) The person or other entity accused in a complaint of a discriminatoryhousing practice; and (b) Any other person or entity identified in the course of investigationand notified as required with respect to respondents so identified underandSection; 103.50.<T3>State </T3>means any of the several States, the District of Columbia,the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States.<T3>Substantially equivalent State of local agency </T3>means a State orlocal agency certified by HUD under 24 CFR Part 115 (including agenciescertified for interim referrals).<T3>To rent </T3>includes to lease, to sublease, to let, and otherwiseto grant for consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by theoccupant.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Complaints</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of information.</ITAG>(a) Any person may submit information concerning alleged discriminatoryhousing practices to the Assistant Secretary. Where the information constitutesa complaint within the meaning of this part and is furnished by an aggrievedperson, it will be considered to be filed under andSection; 103.40. Whereadditional information is required for purposes of perfecting a complaintunder this part, HUD shall advise what additional information is neededand will provide appropriate assistance in the filing of the complaint.(b) If the submitted information warrants, HUD may also concurrently initiatecompliance reviews under other appropriate civil rights authorities, suchas Executive Order No. 11063 on Equal Opportunity in Housing, Title VIof the Civil Rights Act of 1964, section 109 of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974, or section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.The information may also be made available to any other Federal, Stateor local agency having an interest in the matter. In making available suchinformation, steps will be taken to protect the confidentiality of anyinformant or complainant, where desired by the informant or claimant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Who may file complaints.</ITAG>Any aggrieved person or the Assistant Secretary may file a complaint nolater than one year after an alleged discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or terminated. The complaint may be filed with the assistanceof an authorized representative of an aggrieved person, including any organizationacting on behalf of an aggrieved person.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Persons against whom complaints may be filed.</ITAG>(a) A complaint may be filed against any person alleged to be engaged,to have engaged, or to be about to engage, in a discriminatory housingpractice.(b) A complaint may also be filed against any person who directs or controls,or has the right to direct or control, the conduct of another person withrespect to any aspect of the sale, rental, advertising or financing ofdwellings or the provision of brokerage services relating to the sale orrental of dwellings if that other person, acting within the scope or hisor her authority as employee or agent of the directing or controlling person,is engaged, has engaged, or is about to engage, in a discriminatory housingpractice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Where to file complaints.</ITAG>(a)(1) Complaints may be delivered or mailed to the Assistant Secretary.Complaints should be sent to: Fair Housing, Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment, Washington DC 20410, or any Regional or Field Office of HUD.A list of Regional Offices (with addresses and areas of jurisdiction) andField Offices (with addresses) is contained in an appendix to Part 105.(2) Aggrieved persons may provide information to be contained in a complaintby telephone to any Regional or Field Office of HUD. HUD will reduce informationprovided by telephone to writing on the prescribed complaint form and sendthe form to the aggrieved person to be signed and attested to as providedin andSection; 103.30(a).(3) Complaints may be delivered or mailed to any substantially equivalentState or local agency. Complaints filed with a substantially equivalentState or local agency shall be considered to be complaints dual filed withthe agency under its own law, and with HUD under this part.(b) Generally, complaints will be processed through HUD's Regional Administratorhaving jurisdiction in the State in which the alleged discriminatory housingpractice occurred. However, where a complaint has been identified for systemicprocessing under andSection; 103.205, that complaint may be processed inthe Office of the Assistant Secretary in Washington, D.C.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Form and content of complaint. </ITAG>(a) Each complaint must be in writing and must be signed by the aggrievedperson filing the complaint. If the complaint is filed by HUD, it willbe signed by the Assistant Secretary. The complaint shall be attested tobefore a notary public or a duly authorized representative of the AssistantSecretary. The signature and attestation may be made at any time duringthe investigation.(b) The Assistant Secretary may require complaints to be made on prescribedforms. Complaint forms will be available in any Regional or Field Officeof HUD or in any substantially equivalent State or local agency. Notwithstandingthe requirement for use of the prescribed form, HUD will accept any writtenstatement which substantially sets forth the allegations of a discriminatoryhousing practice under the Fair Housing Act (including any such statementfiled with a substantially equivalent State or local agency) as a FairHousing Act complaint. Personnel in these offices will provide appropriateassistance in filling out forms and in filing a complaint.(c) Each complaint must contain substantially the following information:(1) The name and address of the aggrieved person. (2) The name and address of the respondent.(3) A description and the address of the dwelling which is involved, ifappropriate. (4) A concise statement of the facts, including pertinent dates, constitutingthe alleged discriminatory housing practice. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Date of filing of complaint. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) below, a complaint is filed whenit is received by HUD, or dual filed with HUD through a substantially equivalentState or local agency, in a form that reasonably meets the standards ofandSection; 103.30. (b) The Assistant Secretary may determine that a complaint is filed forthe pruposes of the one-year period for the filing of complaints, uponthe submission of written information (including information provided bytelephone and reduced to writing by an employee of HUD) identifying theparties and describing generally the alleged discriminatory housing practice.(c) Where a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice that iscontinuing, as manifested in a number of incidents of such conduct, thecomplaint shall be timely if filed within one year of the last allegedoccurrence of that practice. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment of complaint. </ITAG>Complainants may reasonably and fairly amend the complaint at any timeto cure technical defects or omissions, including failure to attest toa complaint, to clarify or amplify the allegations in a complaint, or tojoin additional or substitute respondents. Except for the purposes of notifyingrespondent under andSection; 103.50, amended complaints will be consideredas having been made as of the original filing date. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service of notice on aggrieved person.</ITAG>Upon the filing of a complaint, the Assistant Secretary shall notify, bycertified mail or personal service, each aggrieved person on whose behalfthe complaint was filed. The notice must:(a) Acknowledge the filing of the complaint and state the date that thecomplaint was accepted for filing (b) Include a copy of the complaint. (c) Advise the aggrieved person of the time limits applicable to complaintprocessing and of the procedural rights and obligations of the aggrievedperson under this part and Part 104 of this title. (d) Advise the aggrieved person of this or her right to commence a civilaction under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act in an appropriate UnitedStates District Court, not later than two years after the occurrence ortermination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice. The noticewill state that the computation of this two-year period excludes any timeduring which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104 with respectto a complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice will also state that the time period includes the time duringwhich an action arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement undersection 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending. (e) Advise the aggrieved person that retaliation against any person becausehe or she made a complaint or testified, assisted, or participated in aninvestigation or conciliation under this part or an administrative proceedingunder Part 104, is a discriminatory housing practice that is prohibitedunder section 818 of the Fair Housing Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification of respondent; joinder of additional or substitute respondents.</ITAG>(a) Within ten days of the filing of a complaint under andSection; 103.40or the filing of an amended complaint under andSection; 103.42, the AssistantSecretary shall serve a notice on each respondent by certified mail orby personal service. A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint,but who is identified in the course of the investigation under SubpartD of this part as a person who is alleged to be engaged, to have engaged,or to be about to engage in the discriminatory housing practice upon whichthe complaint is based, may be joined as an additional or substitute respondentby service of a notice under this section within ten days of the identification.(b)(1) The notice shall identify the alleged discriminatory housing practiceupon which the complaint is based, and include a copy of the complaint.(2) The notice shall state the date that the complaint was accepted forfiling.(3) The notice shall advise the respondent of the time limits applicableto complaint processing under this part and of the procedural rights andobligations of the respondent under this part and Part 104, including theopportunity to submit an answer to the complaint within 10 days of thereceipt of the notice.(4) The notice shall advise the respondent of the aggrieved person's rightto commence a civil action under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act inan appropriate United States District Court, not later than two years afterthe occurrence or termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice shall state that the computation of this two-year period excludesany time during which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104with respect to a complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. The notice shall also state that the time period includesthe time during which an action arising from a breach of a conciliationagreement under section 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending.(5) If the person is not named in the complaint, but is being joined asan additional or substitute respondent, the notice shall explain the basisfor the Assistant Secretary's belief that the joined person is properlyjoined as a respondent.(6) The notice shall advise the respondent that retaliation against anyperson because he or she made a complaint or testified, assisted or participatedin an investigation or conciliation under this part or an administrativeproceeding under Part 104, is a discriminatory housing practice that isprohibited under section 818 of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Answer to complaint.</ITAG>(a) The respondent may file an answer not later than ten days after receiptof the notice described in andSection;103.50. The respondent may assert anydefense that might be available to a defendant in a court of law. The answermust be attested to before a notary public or a duly authorized representativeof the Assistant Secretary.(b) An answer may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time with theconsent of the Assistant Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Referral of Complaints to State and Local Agencies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification and referral to substantially equivalent State or localagencies.</ITAG>(a) Whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice thatis within the jurisdiction of a substantially equivalent State or localagency and the agency is certified or may accept interim referrals underPart 115 with regard to the alleged discriminatory housing practice, theAssistant Secretary shall notify the agency of the filing of the complaintand refer the complaint to the agency for further processing before HUDtakes any action with respect to the complaint. The Assistant Secretaryshall notify the State or local agency of the referral by certified mail.(b) The Assistant Secretary shall notify the aggrieved person and the respondent,by certified mail or personal service, of the notification and referralunder paragraph (a) of this section. The notice shall advise the aggrievedperson and the respondent of the aggrieved person's right to commence acivil action under section 813 of the Fair Housing Act in an appropriateUnited States District Court, not later than two years after the occurrenceor termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice. The noticewill state that the computation of this two-year period excludes any timeduring which a proceeding is pending under this part or Part 104 with respectto a complaint or charge based on the alleged discriminatory housing practice.The notice will also state that the time period includes the time duringwhich an action arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement undersection 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act is pending.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.105</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cessation of action on referred complaints.</ITAG>(a) After a complaint is referred under andSection;103.100, the AssistantSecretary shall not take any further action with respect to the complaint,except as provided in andSection;103.110.(b) A referral under andSection;103.100 does not prohibit the Assistant Secretaryfrom taking appropriate action to review or investigate matters in thecomplaint that raise issues cognizable under other civil rights authoritiesapplicable to departmental programs (see andSection;103.5).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reactivation of referred complaints. </ITAG>The Assistant Secretary may reactivate a complaint referred under andSection;103.100 for processing by HUD if: (a) The substantially equivalent State or local agency consents to thereactivation; (b) The Assistant Secretary determines that, with respect to the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice, the agency no longer qualifies for certificationas a substantially equivalent State or local agency and may not acceptinterim referrals; or (c) The substantially equivalent State or local agency has failed to commenceproceedings with respect to the complaint within 30 days of the date thatit received the notification and referral of the complaint; or the agencycommenced proceedings within this 30-day period, but the Assistant Secretarydetermines that the agency has failed to carry the proceedings forwardwith reasonable promptness. HUD shall not reactivate a complaint underthis paragraph (c) until the appropriate HUD Regional Office has conferredwith the agency to determine the reason for the delay in processing ofthe complaint. If the Assistant Secretary believes that the agency willproceed expeditiously following the conference, the Assistant Secretarymay leave the complaint with the agency for a reasonable time, notwithstandingthe expiration of the 30-day period or a previous failure to carry theproceedings forward with reasonable promptness. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.115</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification upon reactivation. </ITAG>(a) Whenever a complaint referred to a State or local fair housing agencyunder andSection; 103.100 is reactivated under andSection; 103.110, the AssistantSecretary shall notify the substantially equivalent State or local agency,the aggrieved person and the respondent of HUD's reactivation. The notificationmust be made by certified mail or personal service. (b) The notification to the respondent and the aggrieved person shall advisethe aggrieved person and the respondent of the time limits applicable tocomplaint processing and of the procedural rights and obligations of theaggrieved person and the respondent under this part and Part 104. The noticeshall advise the respondent and the aggrieved person of the aggrieved person'sright to commence a civil action under section 813 of the Fair HousingAct in an appropriate United States District Court, not later than twoyears after the occurrence or termination of the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. The notice will state that the computation of this two-yearperiod excludes any time during which a proceeding is pending under thispart or Part 104 with respect to a complaint or charge based on the allegeddiscriminatory housing practice. The notice will also state that the timeperiod includes the time during which an action arising from a breach ofa conciliation agreement under section 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Actis pending. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Investigation Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Investigations. </ITAG>(a) Upon the filing of a complaint under andSection; 103.40, the AssistantSecretary shall initiate an investigation. The purposes of an investigationare: (1) To obtain information concerning the events or transactions that relateto the alleged discriminatory housing practice identified in the complaint.(2) To document policies or practices of the respondent involved in thealleged discriminatory housing practice raised in the complaint. (3) To develop factual data necessary for the General Counsel to make adetermination under andSection; 103.400 whether reasonable cause exists tobelieve that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is aboutto occur, and to take other actions provided under this part. (b) Upon the written direction of the Assistant Secretary, HUD may initiatean investigation of housing practices to determine whether a complaintshould be filed under Subpart B. Such investigations shall be conductedin accordance with the procedures described under this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Systemic processing. </ITAG>Where the Assistant Secretary determines that the alleged discriminatorypractices contained in a complaint are prevasive or institutional in nature,or that the processing of the complaint will involve complex issues, novelquestions of fact or law, or will impact on a large number of persons,the Assistant Secretary may identify the complaint for systemic processing.This determination can be based on the face of the complaint or on informationgathered in connection with an investigation. Systemic investigations mayfocus not only on documenting facts involved in the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice that is the subject of the complaint but also on reviewof other policies and procedures related to matters under investigation,to make sure that they also comply with the nondiscrimination requirementsof the Fair Housing Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conduct of investigation. </ITAG>(a) In conducting investigations under this part, the Assistant Secretaryshall seek the voluntary cooperation of all persons to obtain access topremises, records, documents, individuals, and other possible sources ofinformation; to examine, record, and copy necessary materials; and to takeand record testimony or statements of persons reasonably necessary forthe furtherance of the investigation. (b) The Assistant Secretary and the respondent may conduct discovery inaid of the investigation by the same methods and to the same extent thatparties may conduct discovery in an administrative proceeding under Part104, except that the Assistant Secretary shall have the power to issuesubpoenas described in andSection; 104.590 in support of the investigationor at the request of the respondent. Subpoenas issued by the AssistantSecretary must be approved by the General Counsel before issuance. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.220 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperation of Federal, State and local agencies. </ITAG>The Assistant Secretary, in processing Fair Housing Act complaints, mayseek the cooperation and utilize the services of State and local agenciesand of other appropriate Federal agencies. In accordance with section 808(d) and (e) of the Fair Housing Act and Executive Order No. 12259, otherFederal agencies, including any agency having regulatory or supervisoryauthority over financial institutions, are responsible for ensuring thattheir programs and activities relating to housing and urban developmentare administered in a manner affirmatively to further the goal of fairhousing, and for cooperating with the Assistant Secretary in furtheringthe purposes of the Fair Housing Act, including investigations under thispart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.225 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Completion of investigation. </ITAG>The investigation will remain open until the reasonable cause determinationis made under andSection;103.400, or a conciliation agreement is executedand approved under andSection;103.310. Unless it is impracticable to do so,HUD shall complete the investigation of the alleged discriminatory housingpractice within 100 days of the filing of the complaint (or where the AssistantSecretary reactivates the complaint, within 100 days after service of thenotice of reactivation under andSection;103.115). If the Assistant Secretaryis unable to complete the investigation within the 100-day period, HUDshall notify the aggrieved person and the respondent, by certified mailor personal service, of the reasons for the delay. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.230 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final investigative report. </ITAG>(a) At the end of each investigation under this part, the Assistant Secretaryshall prepare a final investigative report. The investigative report shallcontain: (1) The names and dates of contacts with witnesses, except that the reportwill not disclose the names of witnesses that request anonymity. HUD, however,may be required to disclose the names of such witnesses in the course ofan administrative hearing under Part 104 or a civil action under TitleVIII of the Fair Housing Act; (2) A summary and the dates of correspondence and other contacts with theaggrieved person and the respondent; (3) A summary description of other pertinent records; (4) A summary of witness statements; and (5) Answers to interrogatories. (b) A final investigative report may be amended at any time, if additionalevidence is discovered. (c) Notwithstanding the prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosureof information contained in andSection;103.330, the Assistant Secretary shallmake information derived from an investigation, including the final investigativereport, available to the aggrieved person and the respondent, upon request,at any time following the completion of the investigation. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Conciliation Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.300 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation. </ITAG>(a) During the period beginning with the filing of the complaint and endingwith the filing of a charge or the dismissal of the complaint by the GeneralCounsel, the Assistant Secretary shall, to the extent feasible, attemptto conciliate the complaint. (b) In conciliating a complaint, HUD shall attempt to achieve a just resolutionof the complaint and to obtain assurances that the respondent will satisfactorilyremedy any violations of the rights of the aggrieved person, and take suchaction as will assure the elimination of discriminatory housing practices,or the prevention of their occurrence, in the future. (c) Generally, officers, employees, and agents of HUD engaged in the investigationof a complaint under this part will not participate or advise in the conciliationof the same complaint or in any factually related complaint. Where therights of the aggrieved party and the respondent can be protected and theprohibitions with respect to the disclosure of information obtained duringconciliation can be observed, the investigator may suspend fact findingand engage in efforts to resolve the complaint by conciliation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.310 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conciliation agreement. </ITAG>(a) The terms of a settlement of a complaint shall be reduced to a writtenconciliation agreement. The conciliation agreement shall seek to protectthe interests of the aggrieved person, other persons similarly situated,and the public interest. The types of relief that may be sought for theaggrieved person are described in andSection;103.315. The provisions thatmay be sought for the vindication of the public interest are describedin andSection;103.320. (b)(1) The agreement must be executed by the respondent and the complainant.The agreement is subject to the approval of the Assistant Secretary, whowill indicate approval by signing the agreement. The Assistant Secretaryshall approve an agreement and, if the Assistant Secretary is the complainant,shall execute the agreement, only if: (i) The complainant and the respondent agree to the relief accorded theaggrieved person; (ii) The provisions of the agreement will adequately vindicate the publicinterest; and (iii) If the Assistant Secretary is the complainant, the aggrieved personis satisfied with the relief provided to protect his or her interest. (2) The General Counsel may issue a charge under andSection;103.405 if theaggrieved person and the respondent have executed a conciliation agreementthat has not been approved by the Assistant Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.315 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relief sought for aggrieved persons. </ITAG>(a) The following types of relief may be sought for aggrieved persons inconciliation: (1) Monetary relief in the form of damages, including damages caused byhumiliation or embarrassment, and attorney fees;(2) Other make-whole relief, including access to the dwelling at issue,or to a comparable dwelling, the provision of services or facilities inconnection with a dwelling, or other specific relief; or (3) Injunctive relief appropriate to the elimination of discriminatoryhousing practices affecting the aggrieved person or other persons. (b) The conciliation agreement may provide for binding arbitration of thedispute arising from the complaint. Arbitration may award appropriate reliefas described in paragraph (a) of this section. The aggrieved person andthe respondent may, in the conciliation agreement, limit the types of reliefthat may be awarded under binding arbitration. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.320 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Provisions sought for the public interest. </ITAG>The following are types of provisions that may be sought for the vindicationof the public interest: (a) Elimination of discriminatory housing practices. (b) Prevention of future discriminatory housing practices. (c) Remedial affirmative activities to overcome discriminatory housingpractices. (d) Reporting requirements. (e) Monitoring and enforcement activities. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.325 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of conciliation efforts. </ITAG>(a) HUD may terminate its efforts to conciliate the complaint if the respondentfails or refuses to confer with HUD; the aggrieved person or the respondentfail to make a good faith effort to resolve any dispute; or HUD finds,for any reason, that voluntary agreement is not likely to result. (b) Where the aggrieved person has commenced a civil action under an Actof Congress or a State law seeking relief with respect to the alleged discriminatoryhousing practice, and the trial in the action has commenced, HUD shallterminate conciliation unless the court specifically requests assistancefrom the Assistant Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.330 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibitions and requirements with respect to disclosure of informationobtained during conciliation. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section and andSection;103.230(c),nothing that is said or done in the course of conciliation under this partymay be made public, used in an investigation, or used as evidence in asubsequent administrative hearing under Part 104 or in civil actions underTitle VIII of the Fair Housing Act, without the written consent of thepersons concerned. (b) Conciliation agreements shall be made public, unless the aggrievedperson and respondent request nondisclosure and the Assistant Secretarydetermines that disclosure is not required to further the purpose of theFair Housing Act. Notwithstanding a determination that disclosure of aconciliation agreement is not required, the Assistant Secretary may publishtabulated descriptions of the results of all conciliation efforts. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.335 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of compliance with conciliation agreements. </ITAG>HUD may, from time to time, review compliance with the terms of any conciliationagreement. Whenever HUD has reasonable cause to believe that a respondenthas breached a conciliation agreement, the General Counsel shall referthe matter to the Attorney General with a recommendation for the filingof a civil action under section 814(b)(2) of the Fair Housing Act for theenforcement of the terms of the conciliation agreement. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Issuance of Charge </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;103.400 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable cause determination. </ITAG>(a) If a conciliation agreement under andSection;103.310 has not been executedby the complainant and the respondent, and approved by the Assistant Secretary,the General Counsel, within the time limits set forth in paragraph (c)of this section below, shall determine whether, based on the totality ofthe factual circumstances known at the time of the decision, reasonablecause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurredor is about to occur. The reasonable cause determination shall be basedon all facts concerning the alleged discriminatory housing practice, providedby complainant and respondent and otherwise, disclosed during the investigation.In making the reasonable cause determination, the General Counsel shallconsider whether the facts concerning the alleged discriminatory housingpractice are sufficient to warrant the initiation of a civil action inFederal court. (1) If the General Counsel determines that reasonable cause exists, theGeneral Counsel shall immediately issue a charge under andSection;103.405on behalf of the aggrieved person, unless the matter involves the legalityof any State or local zoning or other land use law or ordinance. If theGeneral Counsel determines that the matter involves local zoning or landuse laws or ordinances, the General Counsel shall immediately refer thematter to the Attorney General for appropriate action under section 814(b)(1)of the Fair Housing Act, and shall notify the aggrieved person and therespondent of this action by certified mail or personal service. (2) If the General Counsel determines that no reasonable cause exists,the General Counsel shall dismiss the complaint, notify the aggrieved personand the respondent of the dismissal by certified mail or personal serviceand make public disclosure of the dismissal. (b) The General Counsel may not issue a charge under paragraph (a) of thissection regarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice, if an aggrievedperson has commenced a civil action under an Act of Congress or a Statelaw seeking relief with respect to the alleged discriminatory housing practice,and the trial in the action has commenced. If a charge may not be issuedbecause of the commencement of such a trial, the General Counsel shallso notify the aggrieved person and the respondent by certified mail orpersonal service. (c)(1) The General Counsel shall make a reasonable cause determinationwithin 100 days after the filing of the complaint (or where the AssistatSecretary has reactivated a complaint, within 100 days after service ofthe notice of reactivation under andSection;103.115), unless it is impracticableto do so. (2) If the General Counsel is unable to make the determination within thetime limits specified in pragraph (c)(1), HUD will notify the aggrievedperson and the respondent, by certified mail or personal service, of thereasons for the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.405</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of charge.</ITAG>(a) A charge:(1) Shall consist of a short and plain statement of the facts upon whichthe General Counsel has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur;(2) Shall be based on the final investigative report; and(3) Need not be limited to facts or grounds that are alleged in the complaintfiled under Subpart B of this part.(b) Within three days after the issuance of the charge, the General Counselshall:(1) Obtain a time and place for hearing from the Chief Docket Clerk ofthe Office of Administrative Law Judges;(2) File the charge along with the notifications described in andSection;104.410(b) with Office of Administrative Law Judges;(3) Serve the charge and notifications in accordance with andSection; 104.410(c);and(4) Notify the Assistant Secretary of the filing of the charge.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Election of administrative proceeding or civil action.</ITAG>(a) If a charge is issued under andSection; 103.405, a complainant (includingthe General Counsel, if HUD filed the complaint), a respondent, or an aggrievedperson on whose behalf the complaint is filed may elect, in lieu of anadministrative proceeding under Part 104, to have the claims asserted inthe charge decided in a civil action under section 812(o) of the Fair HousingAct.(b) The election must be made not later than 20 days after the receiptof service of the charge, or in the case of the General Counsel, not laterthan 20 days after service. The notice of the election must be filed withthe Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative Law Judges and servedon the General Counsel, the respondent, and the aggrieved persons on whosebehalf the complaint was filed. The notification will be filed and servedin accordance with the procedures established under Part 104.(c) If an election is not made under this section, the General Counselwill maintain an administrative proceeding based on the charge in accordancewith the procedures under Part 104.(d) If an election is made under this section, the General Counsel shallpromptly notify and authorize the Attorney General to commence and maintaina civil action seeking relief under section 812(o) of the Fair HousingAct on behalf of the aggrieved person in an appropriate United States DistrictCourt. Such notification and authorization shall include transmission ofthe file in the case, including a copy of the final investigative reportand the charge, to the Attorney General.(e) The General Counsel shall be available for consultation concerningany legal issues raised by the Attorney General regarding how best to proceedin the event that commencement of a civil action would implicate Rule 11of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Other Actions by the Department</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prompt judicial action.</ITAG>(a) If at any time following the filing of a complaint, the General Counselconcludes that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposesof this part or Part 104, the General Counsel will request that the AttorneyGeneral commence a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminaryrelief pending final disposition of the complaint. Before making the determinationthat prompt judicial action is necessary, the General Counsel will consultwith the Assistant Attorney General for the Civil Rights Division. Thecommencement of a civil action by the Attorney General under this sectionwill not affect the initiation or continuation of proceedings under thispart or administrative proceedings under Part 104.(b) If the General Counsel has reason to believe that a basis exists forthe commencement of proceedings under section 814(a) of the Fair HousingAct (Pattern or Practice Cases), proceedings under section 814(c) of theFair Housing Act (Enforcement of Subpoenas), or proceedings by any governmentallicensing or supervisory authorities, the General Counsel will transmitthe information upon which that belief is based to the Attorney Generaland to other appropriate authorities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 103.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other action by HUD.</ITAG>In addition to the actions described in andSection; 103.500, HUD may pursueone or more of the following courses of action:(a) Refer the matter to the Attorney General for appropriate action (e.g.,enforcement of criminal penalties under section 811(c) of the Act).(b) Take appropriate steps to initiate proceedings leading to the debarmentof the respondent under 24 CFR Part 24, or initiate other actions leadingto the imposition of administrative sanctions where HUD determines thatsuch actions are necessary to the effective operation and administrationof Federal programs or activities.(c) Take appropriate steps to initiate proceedings under:(1) 24 CFR Part 1, implementing Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964;(2) 24 CFR 570.912, implementing section 109 of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974;(3) 24 CFR Part 8, implementing section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of1973; or(4) 24 CFR Part 107, implementing Executive Order No. 11063.(d) Inform any other Federal, State or local agency with an interest inthe enforcement of respondent's obligations with respect to nondiscriminationin housing.5. A new Part 104 would be added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 104_ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS UNDER SECTION 812 OF THE FAIRHOUSING ACT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.10 Scope of rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.20 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.30 Time computations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.40 Service and filing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.100 Designation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.110 Authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.120 Disqualification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.130 Ex Parte communications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.140 Separation of functions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Parties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.200 In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.210 Representation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.220 Standards of conduct.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Pleadings and Motions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.400 In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.410 The charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.420 Answer to charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.430 Request for intervention.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.440 Amendments and supplemental pleadings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.450 Motions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Discovery</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.500 Discovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.510 Depositions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.520 Use of Deposition at hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.530 Written interrogatories.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.540 Production of documents and other evidence; entry upon landfor inspection and other purposes; and physical and mental examinations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.550 Admissions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.560 Supplementation of responses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.570 Protective orders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.580 Failure to make or cooperate in discovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Subpoenas</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.590 Subpoenas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Prehearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.600 Prehearing statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.610 Prehearing conference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.620 Settlement negotiations before a settlement judge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Hearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.700 Date and place of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.710 Conduct of hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.720 Waiver of right to appear.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.730 Evidence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.740 In camera and protective orders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.750 Exhibits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.760 Authenticity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.770 Stipulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.780 Record of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.790 Arguments and briefs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.800 End of hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.810 Receipt of evidence following hearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.900 Dismissal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.910 Initial decision of administrative law judge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.920 Service of initial decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.925 Resolution of charge.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.930 Final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.935 Action upon issuance of final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.940 Attorney's fees and costs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart J_Judicial Review and Enforcement of Final Decision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.950 Judicial Review of final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">104.955 Enforcement of final decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);section 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C.3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of rules.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability. </T3>This part contains the rules of practice and procedureestablished by the Department of Housing and Urban Development for administrativeproceedings before an Administrative Law Judge adjudicating the claimsasserted in a charge issued under Part 103, where no party_the complainant,the respondent, or an aggrieved party_elects to have the claims decidedin a civil action under section 812(o) of the Fair Housing Act. The provisionsof this part do not apply to complaints processed under Part 105.(b) <T3>General application of rules. </T3>Hearings under this subpart shallbe conducted as expeditiously and inexpensively as possible, consistentwith the needs and rights of the parties to obtain a fair hearing and acomplete record.(c) <T3>Conduct of proceedings. </T3>The Department will reasonably accommodatepersons with disabilities who are participants in the hearing process orinterested members of the general public.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><T3>Aggrieved person </T3>includes any person who:(a) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or(b) Believes that he or she will be injured by a discriminatory housingpractice that is about to occur.<T3>Attorney General </T3>means the Attorney General of the United States.<T3>Charge </T3>means the statement of facts issued under andSection; 103.405upon which HUD has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatoryhousing practice has occurred or is about to occur.<T3>Complainant </T3>means the person (including the Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity) who filed the complaint under Part103 of this title.<T3>Complaint </T3>means a complaint filed under Part 103 of this title.<T3>Discriminatory housing practice </T3>means an act that is unlawfulunder Part 100 of this title.<T3>Fair Housing Act </T3>means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,42 U.S.C. 3600-3620, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988.<T3>General Counsel </T3>means the General Counsel of HUD.<T3>Hearing </T3>means that part of an administrative proceeding that involvesthe submission of evidence, either by oral presentation or written submission,and includes the submission of briefs and oral arguments on the evidenceand applicable law.<T3>HUD </T3>means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.<T3>Party </T3>means a person or agency named or admitted as a party toa proceeding. Party includes an aggrieved person who intervenes under andSection;104.430.<T3>Person </T3>includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title II of the United States Code, receivers,fiduciaries governmental entities, banks, building and loan associations,or other firms or enterprises.<T3>Personal service </T3>means handing a copy of the document to the personto be served or leaving a copy of the document with a person of suitableage and discretion at the place of business, residence or usual place ofabode of the person to be served.<T3>Prevailing party </T3>has the same meaning as the term has in section722 of the Revised Statutes of the United States (42 U.S.C. 1988).<T3>Respondent </T3>means the person accused in a charge of a discriminatoryhousing practice.<T3>State </T3>means any of the several States, the District of Columbia,the Commonweath of Puerto Rico, or any of the territories and possessionsof the United States.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Time computations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>In computing time under this part, the time periodshall begin the day following the act, event, or default and include thelast day of the period, unless the last day is a Saturday, Sunday, or legalholiday observed by the Federal Government, in whch case the time periodincludes the next business day. When the prescribed time period is sevendays or less, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shallbe excluded from the computation.(b) <T3>Modification of time periods. </T3>Except for time periods requiredby statute, the administrative law judge may enlarge or reduce any timeperiod required under this part where necessary to avoid prejudicing thepublic interest or the rights of the parties.(c) <T3>Entry of orders. </T3>In computing any time period involving the dateof the issuance of an order or decision by an administrative law judge,the date of issuance shall be the date the order or decision is servedby the Chief Docket Clerk.(d) <T3>Computation of time for delivery by mail.</T3>(1) Documents shall not be considered filed until received by the ChiefDocket Clerk. However, when documents are filed by mail, three days shallbe added to the prescribed time period.(2) Service is effected at the time of mailing.(3) When a party has the right or is required to take an action withina prescribed period after the service of a document upon the party, andthe document is served by mail, three days shall be added to the prescribedperiod.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;104.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service and filing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Generally. </T3>Copies of all filed documents shall be served on allparties of record. All filed documents shall clearly designate the docketnumber, if any, and title of the proceeding. All documents to be filedshall be delivered or mailed to the Chief Docket Clerk, Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges, Room 2158, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410.(b) <T3>By parties.</T3> Parties shall file all documents with the Office ofAdministrative Law Judges with a copy to all other parties of record. Serviceof documents upon any party may be made by personal service or by mailinga copy to the last known address. When a party is represented by an attorney,service shall be made upon the attorney. The person serving the documentshall certify to the manner and date of service.(c) <T3>By the Office of Administrative Law Judges.</T3> The Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges shall serve all notices, order, decisions and all other documentsby mail to the last known address.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Administrative Law Judge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.100 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Designation.</ITAG>Proceedings under this part shall be presided over by an administrativelaw judge appointed under 5 U.S.C. 3105. The presiding administrative lawjudge shall be designated by the Chief Administrative Law Judge at HUD.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority.</ITAG>The administrative law judge shall have all powers necessary to the conductof fair and impartial hearings including, but not limited to, the power:(a) To conduct hearings in accordance with this part.(b) To administer oaths and affirmations and examine witnesses.(c) To issue subpoenas in accordance with andSection; 104.590.(d) To rule on offers of proof and receive evidence.(e) To take depositions or have depositions taken when the ends of justicewould be served.(f) To regulate the course of the hearing and the conduct of parties andtheir counsel.(g) To hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of the issuesby consent of the parties.(h) To dispose of motions, procedural requests, and similar matters.(i) To make initial decisions as described under Subpart I of this Part.(j) To exercise such powers vested in the Secretary as are necessary andappropriate for the purpose of the hearing and conduct of the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.120 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disqualification.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Disqualification.</T3> If an administrative law judge finds that thereis a basis for his or her disqualification in a proceeding, the administrativelaw judge shall withdraw from the proceeding. Withdrawal is accomplishedby entering a notice in the record and by providing a copy of the noticeto the Chief Administrative Law Judge.(b) <T3>Motion for recusal.</T3> If a party believes that the presiding administrativelaw judge should be disqualified in a proceeding for any reason, the partymay file a motion to recuse with the administrative law judge. The motionshall be supported by an affidavit setting forth the alleged grounds fordisqualification. The administrative law judge shall rule on the motion.If the administrative law judge denies the motion, the administrative lawjudge shall incorporate a written statement of the reasons for the denialin the record.(c) <T3>Redesignation of administrative law judge.</T3> If an administrativelaw judge is disqualified, the Chief Administrative Law Judge shall designateanother administrative law judge to preside over further proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.130 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ex parte communications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> An ex parte communication is any direct or indirect communicationconcerning the merits of a pending proceeding, made by a party in the absenceof any other party, to the administrative law judge assigned to the proceedingand which was neither on the record nor on reasonable prior notice to allparties. Ex parte communications do not include communications made forthe sole purpose of scheduling hearings, requesting extensions of time,or requesting information on the status of cases.(b) <T3>Prohibition.</T3> Ex parte communications are prohibited.(c) <T3>Procedure upon receipt.</T3> If the administrative law judge receivesan ex parte communication that the administrative law judge knows or hasreason to believe is prohibited, the administrative law judge shall promptlyplace the communication, or a written statement of the substance of thecommunication, in the record and shall furnish copies to all parties. Unauthorizedcommunications shall not be taken into consideration in deciding any matterin issue. Any party making a prohibited ex parte communication may be subjectto sanctions including, but not limited to, exclusion from the proceeding,and an adverse ruling on the issue that is the subject of the prohibitedcommunication.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.140 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separation of functions.</ITAG>No officer, employee, or agent of the Federal government engaged in theperformance of investigative, conciliatory, or prosecutorial functionsin connection with the proceeding shall, in that proceeding or any factuallyrelated proceeding under this part, participate or advise in the decisionof the administrative law judge, except as a witness or counsel duringthe proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Parties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Parties.</T3> Parties to the proceeding include:(1) HUD. HUD files the charge under andSection; 103.405 of this title seekingappropriate relief for an aggrieved party and vindication of the publicinterest.(2) The respondent. The respondent is the person named in the charge issuedunder andSection; 103.405 of this title against whom relief is sought.(3) Intervenors. Any aggrieved person may intervene as a party to the proceeding.No other intervention will be permitted.(b) <T3>Rights of parties. </T3>Each party may appear in person, be representedby counsel, examine or cross-examine witnesses, introduce documentary orother relevant evidence into the record, and request the issuance of subpoenas.(c) <T3>Amicus curiae. </T3>Briefs of amicus curiae may be permitted at thediscretion of the administrative law judge. Such participants are not partiesto the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Representation. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Representation of HUD. </T3>HUD is represented by the General Counsel.(b) <T3>Representation of other parties. </T3>Other parties may be representedas follows:(1) Individuals may appear on their own behalf.(2) A member of a partnership may represent the partnership.(3) An officer of a corporation, trust or association may represent thecorporation, trust or association.(4) An officer or employee of any governmental unit, agency or authoritymay represent that unit, agency or authority.(5) An attorney admitted to practice before a Federal Court or the highestcourt in any State. The attorney's representation that he or she is ingood standing before any of these courts is sufficient evidence of theattorney's qualifications under this section, unless otherwise orderedby the administrative law judge.(c) <T3>Notice of appearance. </T3>Each attorney or other representative ofa party shall file a notice of appearance. The notice must indicate theparty on whose behalf the appearance is made. Any individual acting ina representative capacity may be required by the administrative law judgeto demonstrate authority to act in that capacity.(d) <T3>Withdrawal. </T3>An attorney or other representative of a party mustfile a written notice of intent before withdrawing from participation inthe proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.220 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards of Conduct. </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>All persons appearing in proceedings under this partshall act with integrity and in an ethical manner.(b) <T3/><T3>Exclusion. </T3>The administrative law judge may exclude parties ortheir representatives for refusal to comply with directions, continueduse of dilatory tactics, refusal to adhere to reasonable standards of orderlyand ethical conduct, failure to act in good faith, or violations of theprohibitions against ex parte communications. If an attorney is suspendedor barred from participation in a proceeding by an administrative law judge,the administrative law judge shall include in the record the reasons forthe action. An attorney who is suspended or barred from participation mayappeal to the Chief Administrative Law Judge. The proceeding shall notbe delayed or suspended pending disposition on the appeal, except thatthe administrative law judge shall suspend the proceeding for a reasonabletime to enable the party to obtain another attorney. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Pleadings and motions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Form. </T3>Every pleading, motion, brief, or other document shall containa caption setting forth the title of the proceeding, the docket numberassigned by the Office of Administrative Law Judges, and the designationof the type of document (<T3>e.g.</T3>, charge, answer or motion to dismiss).(b) <T3>Signature. </T3>Every pleading, motion, brief, or other document filedby a party shall be signed by the party, the party's representative, orthe attorney representing the party, and must include the signer's addressand telephone number. The signature constitutes a certification that thesigner has read the document; that to the best of the signer's knowledge,information and belief there is good ground to support the document; andthat it is not interposed for delay.(c) <T3>Timely filing. </T3>The administrative law judge may refuse to considerany motion or other pleading that is not filed in a timely fashion andin compliance with this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">The charge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Filing and service. </T3>Within three days after the issuance of acharge under andSection; 103.405, the General Counsel shall file the chargewith the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative Law Judgesand serve copies (with the additional information required under paragraph(b) of this section) on the respondent and the aggrieved person on whosebehalf the complaint was filed.(b) <T3>Contents. </T3>The charge shall consist of a short and plain statementof the facts upon which the General Counsel has found reasonable causeto believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is aboutto occur. The following notifications shall be served with the charge:(1) The notice shall state that a complaint (including HUD, if HUD filedthe complaint), a respondent, or an aggrieved person on whose behalf thecomplaint was filed may elect to have the claims asserted in the chargedecided in a civil action under section 812(o) of the Act, in lieu of anadministrative proceeding under this part. The notice shall state thatthe election must be made not later than 20 days after the receipt of theservice of the charge. Where HUD is the complainant, the General Counselmust make the election not later than 20 days after the service of thecharge. The notice shall state that the notification of the election mustbe served on the Chief Docket Clerk in the Office of Administrative LawJudges, the respondent, the aggrieved party on whose behalf the complaintwas filed, and the General Counsel.(2) The notice shall state that if an election is made under paragraph(b)(1) to use the administrative procedure:(i) The parties will have an opportunity for a hearing at a date and placespecified in the notice.(ii) The respondent will have an opportunity to file an answer to the chargewithin 30 days of the date of service of the charge.(iii) The aggrieved person may intervene as a party to the administrativeproceeding within 30 days of the date of service of the charge.(iv) All discovery must be concluded 15 days before the date set for hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.420</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Answer to charge.</ITAG>Within the 30 days after the service of the charge, a respondent contestingmaterial facts alleged in a charge or contending that the respondent isentitled to judgment as a matter of law shall file an answer to the charge.An answer shall include:(a) A statement that the respondent admits, denies, or does not have andis unable to obtain sufficient information to admit or deny, each allegationmade in the charge. A statement of lack of information shall have the effectof a denial. Any allegation that is not denied shall be deemed to be admitted.(b) A statement of each affirmative defense and a statement of facts supportingeach affirmative defense.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.430</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for intervention.</ITAG>Within 30 days after the service of the charge, any aggrieved person mayfile a request for intervention and participate as a party to the proceeding.No other intervention will be permitted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.440</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments and supplemental pleadings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Amendments. </T3>(1) By right. HUD may amend its charge once as a matterof right prior to filing of the answer.(2) By leave. Upon such conditions as are necessary to avoid prejudicingthe public interest and the rights of the parties, the administrative lawjudge may allow amendments to pleadings upon motion of the party.(3) Conformance to the evidence. When issues not raised by the pleadingsare reasonably within the scope of the original charge and have been triedby the express or implied consent of the parties, the issues shall be treatedin all respects as if they had been raised in the pleadings and amendmentsmay be made as necessary to make the pleading conform to evidence.(b) <T3>Supplemental pleadings. </T3>The administrative law judge may, uponreasonable notice, permit supplemental pleadings concerning transactions,occurrences or events that have happened or been discovered since the dateof the pleadings and which are relevant to any of the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.450</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Motions. </T3>Any application for an order or other request shall bemade by a motion which, unless made during an appearance before the administrativelaw judge, shall be made in writing. Motions or requests made during anappearance before the administrative law judge shall be stated orally andmade a part of the transcript. All parties shall be given a reasonableopportunity to respond to written or oral motions or requests.(b) <T3>Answers to written motions. </T3>Within five days after a written motionis served, any party to the proceeding may file an answer in support of,or in opposition to the motion. Unless otherwise ordered by the administrativelaw judge, no further responsive documents may be filed.(c) <T3>Oral argument. </T3>The administrative law judge may order oral argumenton any motion.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Discovery</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>This subpart governs discovery in aid of administrativeproceedings under this part. Except for time periods stated in these rules,to the extent that these rules conflict with discovery procedures in aidof civil actions in the United States District Court for the District inwhich the investigation of the discriminatory housing practice took place,the rules of the United States District Court apply.(b) <T3>Scope. </T3>The parties are encouraged to engage in voluntary discoveryprocedures. Discovery shall be conducted as expeditiously and inexpensivelyas possible, consistent with the needs of all parties to obtain relevantevidence. Unless otherwise ordered by the administrative law judge, theparties may obtain discovery regarding any matter, not privileged, whichis relevant to the subject matter involved in the proceeding, includingthe existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location ofdocuments or persons having knowledge of any discoverable matter. It isnot grounds for objection that information sought will not be admissibleif the information sought appears reasonably calculated to lead to thediscovery of admissible evidence.(c) <T3>Methods. </T3>Parties may obtain discovery by one or more of the followingmethods:(1) Deposition upon oral examination or written questions.(2) Written interrogatories.(3) Requests for the production of documents or other evidence, for inspectionand other purposes, and physical and mental examinations.(4) Requests for admissions.(d) <T3>Frequency and sequence. </T3>Unless otherwise ordered by the administrativelaw judge, the frequency or sequence of these methods is not limited.(e) <T3>Completion of discovery. </T3>All discovery shall be completed 15 daysbefore the date scheduled for hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Depositions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Depositions may be taken upon oral examination orupon written interrogatory before any person having the power to administeroaths.(b) <T3>Notice. </T3>Any party desiring to take the deposition of a witnessshall indicate to the witness and to all parties the time and place ofthe deposition, the name and post office address of the person before whomthe deposition is to be taken, the name and address of the witness, andthe subject matter of the testimony of the witness. Notice of the takingof a deposition shall be given not less than five days before the depositionis scheduled. The attendance of a witness may be compelled by subpoenaunder andSection; 104.590.(c) <T3>Procedure at deposition. </T3>Each witness deposed shall be placedunder oath or affirmation, and other parties shall have the right to cross-examine.The questions propounded and all answers and objections made to the propoundedquestions shall be reduced to writing; read by or to, and subscribed by,the witness; and certified by the person before whom the deposition wastaken.(d) <T3>Objections. </T3>During a deposition, a party or deponent may requestsuspension of the deposition on grounds of bad faith in the conduct ofthe examination, oppression of a deponent or party, or improper questioning.Upon the request for suspension, the deposition will be adjourned. Theobjecting party or deponent must immediately move the administrative lawjudge for a ruling on the objections. The administrative law judge maythen limit the scope or manner of taking the deposition.(e) <T3>Payment of costs of deposition. </T3>The party requesting the depositionshall bear all costs of the deposition.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.520</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of deposition at hearings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>At the hearing, any part or all of a deposition, sofar as admissible under the Federal Rules of Evidence, may be used againstany party who was present or represented at the taking of the depositionor who had due notice of the taking of the deposition, in accordance withthe following provisions:(1) Any deposition may be used by any party for the purpose of contradictingor impeaching the testimony of the deponent as a witness.(2) The deposition of expert witnesses may be used by any party for anypurpose, unless the administrative law judge rules that such use is unfairor a violation of due process.(3) The deposition of a party or of anyone who at the time of the takingof the deposition was an officer, director, or duly authorized agent ofa public or private corporation, partnership, or association that is aparty, may be used by any other party for any purpose.(4) The deposition of a witness, whether or not a party, may be used byany party for any purpose if the administrative law judge finds:(i) That the witness is dead;(ii) That the witness is out of the United States or more than 100 milesfrom the place of hearing, unless it appears that the absence of the witnesswas procured by the party offering the deposition;(iii) That the witness is unable to attend to testify because of age, sickness,infirmity, or imprisonment;(iv) That the party offering the deposition has been unable to procurethe attendance of the witness by subpoena; or (v) Whenever exceptional circumstances exist as to make it desirable, inthe interest of justice and with due regard to the importance of presentingthe testimony of witnesses orally in open hearing, to allow the depositionto be used.(5) If a part of a deposition is offered in evidence by a party, any otherparty may require the party to introduce all of the deposition that isrelevant to the part introduced. Any party may introduce any other partof the deposition.(6) Substitution of parties does not affect the right to use depositionspreviously taken. If a proceeding has been dismissed and another proceedinginvolving the same subject matter is later brought between the same partiesor their representatives or successors in interest, all depositions lawfullytaken in the former proceeding may be used in the latter proceeding.(b) <T3>Objections to admissibility. </T3>Except as provided in this paragraph,objection may be made at the hearing to receiving in evidence any depositionor part of a deposition for any reason that would require the exclusionof the evidence if the witness were present and testifying.(1) Objections to the competency of a witness or to the competency, relevancy,or materiality of testimony are not waived by failure to make them beforeor during the taking of the deposition, unless the basis of the objectionis one which might have been obviated or removed if presented at the time.(2) Errors and irregularities occurring at the oral examination in themanner of taking the deposition, in the form of the questions or answers,in the oath or affirmation, or in the conduct of parties, and errors ofany kind which might be obviated, removed or cured if promptly presented,are waived unless reasonable objection is made at the taking of the deposition.(3) Objections to the form of written interrogatories are waived unlessserved in writing upon the party propounding the interrogatories. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.530</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Written interrogatories.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Written interrogatories to parties. </T3>Any party may serve on anyother party written interrogatories to be answered by the party served.If the party served is a public or private corporation, a partnership,an association, or a governmental agency, the interrogatories may be answeredby any authorized officer or agent who shall furnish such information asmay be available to the party.(b) <T3>Responses to written interrogatories. </T3>Each interrogatory shallbe answered separately and fully in writing under oath or affirmation,unless the party objects to the interrogatory. If a party objects to aninterrogatory, the response shall state the reasons for the objection inlieu of an answer. The answer and objections shall be signed by the personmaking them, except that objections may be signed by the counsel for theparty. The party upon whom the interrogatories were served shall servea copy of the answers and objections upon all parties within 15 days afterservice of the interrogatories.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.540</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Production of documents and other evidence; entry upon land for inspectionand other purposes; and physical and mental examinations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Any party may serve on any other party a request to:(1) Produce and permit the party making the request, or a person actingon the party's behalf, to inspect and copy any designated documents, orto inspect and copy, test, or sample any tangible things that are in thepossession, custody, or control of the party upon whom the request is served;(2) Permit entry upon designated land or other property in the possessionor control of the party upon whom the request is served for the purposeof inspection and measuring, photographing, testing, or other purposesstated in paragraph (a)(1) of this section; or (3) Submit to a physical or mental examination by a physician.(b) <T3>Contents of request. </T3>The request shall:(1) Set forth the items to be inspected by individual item or by categoryof items;(2) Describe each item or category with reasonable particularity;(3) Specify a reasonable time, place and manner for making the inspectionand performing the related acts; and(4) Specify the time, place, manner, conditions, and scope of the physicalor mental examination, and the person or persons who will make the examination.A report of the examining physician shall be made in accordance with Rule35(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. (c) <T3>Response to request. </T3>Within 15 days of the service of the request,the party upon whom the request is served shall serve a written responseon the party submitting the request. The response shall state, with regardto each item or category:(1) That inspection and related activities will be permitted as requested;or(2) That objection is made to the request in whole or in part. If an objectionis made, the response must state the reasons for the objection<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.550</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Admissions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for admissions. </T3>A party may serve on any other party awritten request for the admission of the genuineness and authenticity ofany relevant document described in or attached to the request, or for theadmission of the truth of any specified relevant matter of fact.(b) <T3>Response to request. </T3>(1) Each matter for which an admission isrequested is admitted unless, within 15 days after service of the request,the party to whom the request is directed serves on the requesting party:(i) A written statement specifically denying the relevant matters for whichan admission is requested;(ii) A written statement setting forth in detail why the party cannot truthfullyadmit or deny the matters; or(iii) Written objections to the request alleging that the matters are privilegedor irrelevant, or that the request is otherwise improper.(2) The party to whom the request is directed may not give lack of informationor knowledge as a reason for failure to admit or deny, unless the partystates that it h as made a reasonable inquiry and that the informationknown or readily obtainable is insufficient to enable the party to admitor deny.(c) <T3>Sufficiency of response</T3>. The party requesting admissions may movefor a determination of the sufficiency of the answers or objections. Unlessthe administrative law judge determines that an objection is justified,the administrative law judge shall order that an answer be served. If theadministrative law judge determines that an answer does not comply withthe requirements of this section, the administrative law judge may ordereither that the matter is admitted or that an amended answer be served.(d) <T3>Effect of admission</T3>. Any matter admitted under this section isconclusively established unless, upon the motion of a party, the administrativelaw judge permits the withdrawal or amendment of the admission. Any admissionmade under this section is made for the purposes of the pending proceedingonly, is not an admission by the party for any other purposes, and maynot be used against the party in any other proceeding.(e) <T3>Service of requests</T3>. Each request for admission and each writtenresponse must be served on all parties and filed with the Office of AdministrativeLaw Judges.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.560 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supplementation of responses.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general</T3>. A party who responded to a request for discovery witha response that was complete when made is under no duty to supplement theresponse to include information acquired after the response was made except:(1) A party is under a duty to timely supplement responses with respectto any question directly addressed to:(i) The identity and location of persons having knowledge of discoverablematters; and(ii) The identity of each person expected to be called as an expert witnessat the hearing, the subject matter on which the expert witness is expectedto testify, and the substance of the testimony.(2) A party is under a duty to timely amend a previous response if theparty later obtains information upon the basis of which:(i) The party knows the response was incorrect when made; or(ii) The party knows the response though correct when made is no longertrue and the circumstances are such that a failure to amend the responseis, in substance, a knowing concealment.(b) <T3>By order or agreement</T3>. A duty to supplement responses may be imposedby order of the administrative law judge or by agreement of the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.570 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protective orders.</ITAG>Upon motion of a party or a person from whom discovery is sought or inaccordance with andSection; 104.580(c), the administrative law judge maymake appropriate orders to protect a party or person from annoyance, embarrassment,oppression, or undue burden or expense as a result of the requested discoveryrequest. The order may direct that:(a) The discovery may not be had;(b) The discovery may be had only on specified terms and conditions, includinga designation of time and place for discovery;(c) The discovery may be had by a method of discovery other than that selectedby the party seeking discovery;(d) Certain irrelevant matters may not be the subject of discovery, orthat the scope of discovery be limited to certain matters;(e) Discovery may be conducted with no one present other than persons designatedby the administrative law judge;(f) A trade secret or other confidential research, development or commercialinformation may not be disclosed, or may be disclosed only in a designatedway; or(g) To protect privileged matters, the administrative law judge may takesuch other action permitted under andSection; 104.740.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.580</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to make or cooperate in discovery.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Motion to compel discovery.</T3> If a deponent fails to answer a questionpropounded, or a party upon whom a request is made under andSection;andSection;104.530 through 104.550 fails to respond adequately, objects to a request,or fails to permit inspection as requested, the discovering party may movethe administrative law judge for an order compelling a response or an inspectionin accordance with the request. The motion shall:(1) State the nature of the request;(2) Set forth the response or objection of the party upon whom the requestwas served;(3) Present arguments supporting the motion; and(4) Attach copies of all relevant discovery requests and responses. (b) <T3>Evasive or incomplete answers.</T3> For the purposes of this section,an evasive or incomplete answer or response will be treated as a failureto answer or respond.(c) <T3>Administrative law judge ruling.</T3> In ruling on a motion under thissection, the administrative law judge may enter an order compelling a responseor an inspection in accordance with the request, may issue sanctions underparagragh (d) of this section, or may enter a protective order under andSection;104.570.(d) <T3>Sanctions.</T3> If a party fails to comply with an order (includingan order for taking a deposition, the production of evidence within theparty's control, a request for admission, or the production of witnesses),the administrative law judge may:(1) Draw an inference in favor of the requesting party with regard to theinformation sought;(2) Prohibit the party failing to comply with the order from introducingevidence concerning, or otherwise relying upon, testimony relating to theinformation sought;(3) Permit the requesting party to introduce secondary evidence concerningthe information sought;(4) Strike any appropriate part of the pleadings or other submissions ofthe party failing to comply with such order; or(5) Take such order action as may be appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Subpoenas</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.590</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general.</T3> This section governs the issuance of subpoenas inadministrative proceedings under this part. Except for time periods statedin these rules, to the extent that this rule conflicts with proceduresfor the issuance of subpoenas in civil actions in the United States DistrictCourt for the District in which the investigation of the discriminatoryhousing practice took place, the rules of the United States District Courtapply.(b) <T3>Issuance of subpoena.</T3> Upon the written request of a party, theChief Administrative Law Judge or the presiding administrative law judgemay issue a subpoena requiring:(1) The attendance of a witness for the purpose of giving testimony ata deposition;(2) The attendance of a witness for the purpose of giving testimony ata hearing; and(3) The production of relevant books, papers, documents or tangible things.(c) <T3>Time of request.</T3> Requests for subpoenas in aid of discovery mustbe submitted in time to permit the conclusion of discovery 15 days beforethe date scheduled for the hearing. If a request for subpoena of a witnessfor testimony at a hearing is submitted three days or less before the hearing,the subpoena shall be issued at the discretion of the Chief AdministrativeLaw Judge or the presiding administrative law judge, as appropriate.(d) <T3>Service.</T3> A subpoena may be served by any person who is not a partyand is not less than 18 years of age. Service on a person shall be madeby delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person and by tendering witnessfees and mileage to that person. When the subpoena is issued on behalfof HUD, witness fees and mileage need not be tendered with the subpoena.(e) <T3>Amount of witness fees and mileage.</T3> A witness summoned by a subpoenaissued under this part is entitled to the same witness and mileage feesas a witness in proceedings in United States District Courts. Fees payableto a witness summoned by a subpoena shall be paid by the party requestingthe issuance of the subpoena, or where the administrative law judge determinesthat a party is unable to pay the fees, the fees shall be paid by the Department.(f) <T3>Motion to quash or limit subpoena.</T3> Upon a motion by the personserved with a subpoena or by a party, made within five days of the serviceof the subpoena (but in any event not less than the time specified in thesubpoena for compliance), the administrative law judge may:(1) Quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable and oppressive orfor other good cause shown; or (2) Condition denial of the motion upon the advancement, by the party onwhose behalf the subpoena was issued, of the reasonable cost of producingsubpoenaed books, papers or documents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Where the circumstances require, the administrative law judg may actupon such a motion at any time after a copy of the motion has been servedupon the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued.(g) <T3>Failure to comply with subpoena.</T3> If a person fails to comply witha subpoena issued under this section, the party requesting the subpoenamay refer the matter to the Attorney General for enforcement in appropriateproceedings under section 814(c) of the Fair Housing Act.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G_Prehearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.600</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general.</T3> Before the commencement of the hearing, the administrativelaw judge may direct parties to file prehearing statements.(b) <T3>Contents of statement.</T3> The prehearing statement must state thename of the party or parties presenting the statement and, unless otherwisedirected by the administrative law judge, briefly set forth the following:(1) Issues involved in the proceeding.(2) Facts stipulated by the parties and a statement that the parties havemade a good effort to stipulate to the greatest extent possible.(3) Facts in dispute.(4) Witnesses (together with a summary of the testimony expected) and exhibitsto be presented at the hearing.(5) A brief statement of applicable law.(6) Conclusions to be drawn.(7) Estimated time required for presentation of the party's case.(8) Such other information as may assist in the disposition of the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.610 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing conference.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Before the commencement or during the course of thehearing, the administrative law judge may direct the parties to participatein a conference to expedite the hearing.(b) <T3>Matters considered. </T3>At the conference, the following matters maybe considered:(1) Simplification and clarification of the issues.(2) Necessary amendments to the pleadings.(3) Stipulations of fact and of the authenticity, accuracy, and admissibilityof documents.(4) Limitations on the number of witnesses.(5) Negotiation, compromise, or settlement of issues.(6) The exchange of proposed exhibits.(7) Matters of which official notice will be requested.(8) A schedule for the completion of actions discussed at the conference.(9) Such other information as may assist in the disposition of the proceeding.(c) <T3>Conduct of conference. </T3>The conference may be conducted by telephone,correspondence or personal attendance. Conferences, however, shall generallybe conducted by a conference call, unless the administrative law judgedetermines that this method is impracticable. The administrative law judgeshall give reasonable notice of the time, place and manner of the conference.(d) <T3>Record of conference. </T3>Unless otherwise directed by the administrativelaw judge, the conference will not be stenographically recorded. The administrativelaw judge will reduce the actions taken at the conference to a writtenorder or, if the conference takes place less than seven days before thebeginning of the hearing, may make a statement on the record summarizingthe actions taken at the conference.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.620 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Settlement negotiations before a settlement judge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Appointment of settlement judge. </T3>The administrative law judge,upon the motion of a party or upon his or her own motion, may request theChief Administrative Law Judge to appoint another administrative law judgeto conduct settlement negotiations. The order appointing the settlementjudge may confine the scope of settlement negotiations to specified issues.The order shall direct the settlement judge to report to the Chief AdministrativeLaw Judge within specified time periods.(b) <T3>Duties of settlement judge. </T3>(1) The settlement judge shall conveneand preside over conferences and settlement negotiations between the partiesand assess the practicalities of a potential settlement.(2) The settlement judge shall report to the Chief Administrative Law Judgedescribing the status of the settlement negotiations, evaluating settlementprospects, and recommending the termination or continuation of the settlementnegotiations.(c) <T3>Termination of settlement negotiations. </T3>Settlement negotiationsshall terminate upon the order of the Chief Administrative Law Judge issuedafter consultation with the settlement judge. The conduct of settlementnegotiations shall not unduly delay the commencement of the hearing.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Hearing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Date and place of hearing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Date. </T3>The hearing shall commence not later than 120 days followingthe issuance of the charge under andSection; 103.405, unless it is impracticableto do so. If the hearing cannot be commenced within this time period, theadministrative law judge shall notify HUD, the aggrieved persons on whosebehalf the charge was filed, and the respondent in writing of the reasonsfor the delay.(b) <T3>Place. </T3>The hearing will be conducted at a place in the vicinityin which the discriminatory housing practice is alleged to have occurredor to be about to occur.(c) <T3>Notification of time and place for hearing. </T3>The charge issuedunder andSection; 103.405 will specify the time, date and place for the hearing.The administrative law judge may change the time, date or place of thehearing, or may temporarily adjourn or continue a hearing for good causeshown, If such a change is made or the hearing is temporarily adjourned,the administrative law judge shall give the parties at least five daysnotice of the revised time, date and place for the hearing, unless otherwiseagreed by the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.710 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conduct of hearings.</ITAG>The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative ProcedureAct (5 U.S.C. 551-559).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.720</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waiver of right to appear.</ITAG>If all parties waive their right to appear before the administrative lawjudge or to present evidence and arguments, it is not necessary for theadministrative law judge to conduct an oral hearing. Such waivers shallbe made in writing and filed with the administrative law judge. Where waiversare submitted by all parties, the administrative law judge shall make arecord of the relevant written evidence submitted by the parties and pleadingssubmitted by the parties with respect to the issues in the proceeding.These documents shall constitute the evidence in the proceeding and thedecision shall be based upon this evidence. Such hearings shall be deemedto commence on the first day that written evidence may be submitted forthe record.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.730</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence.</ITAG>The Federal Rules of Evidence apply to the presentation of evidence inhearings under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.740</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">In camera and protective orders.</ITAG>The administrative law judge may limit discovery or the introduction ofevidence, or issue such protective or other orders necessary to protectprivileged communications. If the administrative law judge determines thatinformation in documents containing privileged matters should be made availableto a party, the administrative law judge may order the preparation of asummary or extract of the original. The summary or abstract may be admittedas evidence in the record.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.750</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exhibits.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Identification</T3>. All exhibits offered into evidence shall be numberedsequentially and marked with a designation identifying the party offeringthe exhibit.(b) <T3>Exchange of exhibits</T3>. One copy of each exhibit offered into evidencemust be furnished to each of the parties and to the administrative lawjudge. If the administrative law judge does not fix a time for the exchangeof exhibits, the parties shall exchange copies of exhibits at the earliestpracticable time before the commencement of the hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.760</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authenticity.</ITAG>The authenticity of all documents submitted as proposed exhibits in advanceof the hearing shall be admitted, unless a party files a written objectionto the exhibit before the commencement of the hearing. Upon a clear showingof good cause for failure to file such a written objection, the administrativelaw judge may permit the party to challenge the authenticity.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.770</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stipulations.</ITAG>The parties may stipulate to any pertinent facts by oral agreement at thehearing or by written agreement at any time. Stipulations may be submittedinto evidence at any time before the end of the hearing. When receivedinto evidence, the stipulation is binding on the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.780</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Record of hearing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Hearing record</T3>. All oral hearings shall be recorded and transcribedby a reporter designated by, and under the supervision of, the administrativelaw judge. The original transcript shall be a part of the record and shallconstitute the sole official transcript. All exhibits introduced as evidenceshall be marked for identification and incorporated as a part of the record.Transcripts may be obtained by the parties and by the public from the officialreporter at rates not to exceed the applicable rates fixed by the contractwith the reporter.(b) <T3>Corrections</T3>. Corrections to the official transcript will be permittedupon motion of a party. Motions for correction must be submitted withinfive days of the receipt of the transcript. Corrections of the officialtranscript will be permitted only where errors of substance are involvedand upon the approval of the administrative law judge.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.790</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Arguments and briefs.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Arguments</T3>. Following the submission of evidence at an oral hearing,the administrative law judge may hear oral arguments. The administrativelaw judge may limit the time permitted for such arguments to avoid unreasonabledelay.(b) <T3>Submission of written briefs</T3>. The administrative law judge maypermit the submission of written briefs following the adjournment of theoral hearing. Written briefs shall be simultaneously filed by all partiesand shall be due not later than 30 days following the adjournment of theoral hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.800</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">End of hearing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Oral hearings</T3>. Where there is an oral hearing, the hearing endson the day of the adjournment of the oral hearing or, where written briefsare permitted, on the date that the written briefs are due.(b) <T3>Hearing on written record</T3>. Where the parties have waived an oralhearing, the hearing ends on the date set by the administrative law judgeas the final date for the receipt of submissions by the parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.810</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Receipt of evidence following hearing.</ITAG>Following the end of the hearing, no additional evidence may be acceptedinto the record, except with the permission of the administrative law judge.The administrative law judge may receive additional evidence upon a determinationthat new and material evidence was not readily available before the endof the hearing, the evidence has been timely submitted, and its acceptancewill not unduly prejudice the rights of the parties. However, the administrativelaw judge shall include in the record any motions for attorney's fees (includingsupporting documentation), and any approved corrections to the transcripts.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Dismissals and Decisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.900</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Dismissal.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Election of judicial determination</T3>. If the complainant, the respondent,or the aggrieved person on whose behalf a complaint was filed makes a timelyelection to have the claims asserted in the charge decided in a civil actionunder section 812(o) of the Act, the administrative law judge shall dismissthe administrative proceeding.(b) <T3>Effect of a civil action on administrative proceeding.</T3> An administrativelaw judge may not continue an administrative proceeding under this partregarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice after the beginningof the trial of a civil action commenced by an aggrieved person under anAct of Congress or a State law seeking relief with respect to that discriminatoryhousing practice. If such a trial is commenced, the administrative lawjudge shall dismiss the administrative proceeding. The commencement ofa civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief under section810(e) or section 813(c)(1) of the Fair Housing Act does not affect administrativeproceedings under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.910</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial decision of administrative law judge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general</T3>. Within the time period set forth in paragraph (d)below, the administartive law judge shall issue an intial decision includingfindings of fact and conclusions of law upon each material issue of factor law presented on the record. The initial decision of the administrativelaw judge shall be based on the record of the proceeding.(b) <T3>Finding against respondent</T3>. If the administrative law judge findsthat a respondent has engaged, or is about to engage, in a discriminatoryhousing practice, the administrative law judge shall issue an initial decisionagainst the respondent and order such relief as may be appropriate. Therelief may include, but is not limited to, the following:(1) The administrative law judge may order the respondent to pay damagesto the aggrieved person (including damages caused by humiliation and embarrassment).(2) The administrative law judge may provide for injunctive or such otherequitable relief as may be appropriate. No such order may affect any contract,sale, encumbrance or lease consummated before the issuance of the initialdecision that involved a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer or tenant withoutactual knowledge of the charge issued under andSection; 104.405.(3) To vindicate the public interest, the administrative law judge mayassess a civil penalty against the respondent.(i) The amount of the civil penalty may not exceed:(A) $10,000, if the respondent has not been adjudged to have committedany prior discriminatory housing practice in any administrative hearingor civil action permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State or local governmental agency.(B) $25,000, if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed oneother discriminatory housing practice in any administrative hearing orcivil action permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State, or local government agency, and the adjudication wasmade during the five-year period preceding the date of filing of the charge.(C) $50,000, if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed twoor more discriminatory housing practices in any administrative hearingsor civil actions permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or localfair housing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conductedby a Federal, State, or local government agency, and the adjudicationswere made during the seven-year period preceding the date of the filingof the charge.(ii) The time periods set forth in paragraph (b)(3)(i)(B) and (C) do notapply if the acts constituting the discriminatory housing practice thatis the subject of the charge were committed by the same natural personwho has previously been adjudged to have committed acts constituting adiscriminatory housing practice in any administrative hearing or civilaction permitted under the Fair Housing Act or any State or local fairhousing law, or in any licensing or regulatory proceeding conducted bya Federal, State or local governmental agency.(iii) If the administrative law judge determines that more than one respondenthas been engaged or is about the engage in a discriminatory housing practice,the administrative law judge may assess a civil penalty, up to the maximumpermitted under paragraph (b)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section, against eachrespondent.(c) <T3>Finding in favor of respondent. </T3>If the administrative law judgefinds that a respondnet has not engaged, and is not about to engage, ina discriminatory housing practice, the administrative law judge shall makean initial decision dismissing the charge.(d) <T3>Date of issuance</T3>. The administrative law judge shall issue aninitial decision within 60 days after the end of the hearing, unless itis impracticable to do so. If the administrative law judge is unable toissue the initial decision within this time period (or within any succeeding60-day period following the initial 60-day period), the administrativelaw judge shall notify HUD, the aggrieved person on whose behalf the chargewas filed, and the respondent in writing of the reasons for the delay.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.920 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service of initial decision.</ITAG>Simultaneously with the issuance of the initial decision, the administrativelaw judge shall serve the initial decision on the respondent, the aggrievedperson on whose behalf the charge was filed, the General Counsel, the Secretaryof HUD and any intervenors. The initial decision will include a noticestating that the initial decision will become the final decision of theDepartment unless the Secretary issues a final decision under andSection;104.930 within 30 days of the date of issuance of the initial decision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.925 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Resolution of charge.</ITAG>At any time before the issuance of a final decision under andSection; 104.930,the parties may submit an agreement resolving the charge. The agreementmust be signed by the General Counsel, the respondent, and all aggrievedpersons upon whose behalf the charge was issued. The administrative lawjudge shall accept the agreement by issuing an initial decision based onthe agreed findings. The submission of an agreement resolving the chargeconstitutes a waiver of any right to challenge or contest the validityof a decision entered in accordance with the agreement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.930 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Issuance of final decision by Secretary. </T3>The Secretary of HUDmay review any finding of fact, conclusion of law, or order contained inthe initial decision of the administrative law judge and issue a finaldecision in the proceeding. The Secretary may affirm, modify or set aside,in whole or in part, the initial decision, or remand the initial decisionfor further proceedings. The Secretary shall serve the final decision onall parties no later than 30 days from the date of issuance of the initialdecision of the administrative law judge. The final decision shall be servedon the respondent, the aggrieved person on whose behalf the charge wasfiled, the General Counsel, and any intervenors.(b) <T3>No final decision by Secretary. </T3>If the Secretary of HUD does notserve a final decision within the time period described above, the initialdecision of the administrative law judge will become the final decisionof the Department. For the purposes of this part, such a final decisionwill be considered to have been issued 30 days following the date of issuanceof the initial decision.(c) <T3>Public disclosure. </T3>HUD shall make public disclosure of each finaldecision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.935 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Action upon issuance of a final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Licensed or regulated businesses. </T3>(1) If a final decision includesa finding that a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatoryhousing practice in the course of a business that is subject to licensingor regulation by a Federal, State or local governmental agency, the GeneralCounsel will notify the governmental agency of the decision by:(i) Sending copies of the findings of fact, conclusions of law and thefinal decision to the governmental agency by certified mail; and(ii) Recommending appropriate disciplinary action to the governmental agency,including, where appropriate, the suspension or revocation of the licenseof the respondent.(2) The General Counsel shall notify the appropriate governmental agencieswithin 30 days after the date of issuance of the final decision, unlessa petition for judicial review of the final decision as described in andSection;104.950 has been filed before the issuance of the notification of the agency.If such a petition has been filed, the General Counsel will provide thenotification to the governmental agency within 30 days of the date thatthe final decision is affirmed upon review. If a petition for judicialreview is timely filed following the notification of the governmental agency,the General Counsel will promptly notify the governmental agency of thepetition and withdraw his or her recommendation.(b) <T3>Notification to the Attorney General</T3>. If a final decision includesa finding that a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a discriminatoryhousing practice and another final decision including such a finding wasissued under this part within the five years preceding the date of issuanceof the final decision, the General Counsel shall notify the Attorney Generalof the decisions by sending a copy of the final decisions in each administrativeproceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.940 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Attorney's fees and costs.</ITAG>Following the issuance of the final decision under andSection; 104.930, anyprevailing party, except HUD, may apply for attorney's fees and costs.The administrative law judge will issue an initial decision awarding ordenying such costs. The initial decision will become the final decisionof HUD unless the Secretary reviews the initial decision and issues a finaldecision on fees and costs within 30 days. The recovery of reasonable attorney'sfees and costs will be permitted as follows:(a) If the respondent is the prevailing party: (1) HUD shall be liablefor reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the extent provided under theEqual Access to Justice Act (5 U.S.C. 504) and HUD's regulations at 24CFR Part 14; and (2) an intervenor shall be liable for reasonable attorney'sfees and costs only to the extent that the intervenor's participation inthe administrative proceeding was frivolous or vexatious, or was for thepurpose of harassment.(b) To the extent that an intervenor is a prevailing party, the respondentshall be liable for reasonable attorney's fees unless special circumstancesmake the recovery of such fees and costs unjust.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Judicial Review and Enforcement of Final Decision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.950 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Judicial review of final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Petition for review</T3>. Any party adversely affected by a final decisionunder andSection;104.930 may file a petition in the appropriate United StatesCourt of Appeals for review of the decision under section 812(i) of theFair Housing Act. The petition must be filed within 30 days of the dateof issuance of the final decision.(b) <T3>No petition for review</T3>. If no petition for review is filed underparagraph (a) within 45 days from the date of issuance of the final decision,the findings of facts and final decision shall be conclusive in connectionwith any petition for enforcement described under andSection; 104.955(a)filed thereafter by the General Counsel, and in connection with any petitionfor enforcement described under andSection; 104.955(b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 104.955 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Enforcement of final decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Enforcement by HUD</T3>. Following the issuance of a final decisionunder andSection; 104.930, the General Counsel may petition the appropriateUnited States Court of Appeals for the enforcement of the final decisionand for appropriate temporary relief or restraining order in accordancewith section 812(j) of the Fair Housing Act.(b) <T3>Enforcement by others</T3>. If before the expiration of 60 days fromthe date of issuance of the final decision under andSection; 104.930, nopetition for review of the final decision described under andSection; 104.950has been filed, and the General Counsel has not sought enforcement of thefinal decision as described in paragraph (a) of this section, any personentitled to relief under the final decision may petition the appropriateUnited States Court of Appeals for the enforcement of the final decisionin accordance with section 812(m) of the Fair Housing Act. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 105_FAIR HOUSING</ITAG>6. The authority citation for Part 15 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority</T4>: Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d))</ITAG>7. In andSection;105.1, paragraph (a) would be revised, paragraph (b) wouldbe redesignated as paragraph (d), and new paragraphs (b) and (c) wouldbe added, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 105.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purposes.</ITAG>(a) This part contains the procedures established by the Department ofHousing and Urban Development for the investigation and conciliation ofcomplaints under section 810 of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3610, asit existed before the amendment of the Act by the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-430, approved September 13, 1988).(b)(1) This part applies to:(i) Complaints filed before or after March 12, 1989 that involve allegeddiscriminatory housing practices that occurred before March 12, 1989 andare not alleged to have continued after March 12, 1989; and(ii) Complaints filed before March 12, 1989 that involve alleged discriminatoryhousing practices that occurred before and continue after March 12, 1989,unless the complainant elects under andSection; 105.81 to proceed under Part103.(2) Part 103 contains the procedures established by HUD for the investigationand conciliation of complaints under section 810 of the Act as amendedby the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988. HUD's regulations governingproceedings before an administrative law judge adjudicating a charge issuedunder andSection; 103.405 are contained in Part 104, and are not applicableto complaints processed under this Part 105.(c) The procedures under this part for the investigation and conciliationof complaints will be conducted in accordance with section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. Section 105.81 would be added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 105.81 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continuing violations.</ITAG>If at any time during investigation or conciliation, the Department determinesthat a complaint involves an alleged discriminatory housing practice thatcontinued after March 12, 1989, the Department shall notify the complainantand provide the complainant with a reasonable opportunity to elect to havethe complaint processed under Part 103, in lieu of the procedures underthis part. The notice shall describe the procedures available to the complainantunder each part and shall be made by certified mail. If such an electionis made, HUD shall notify the respondent of the election, and process thecomplaint under Part 103.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 106_FAIR HOUSING ADMINISTRATIVE MEETINGS UNDER THE FAIR HOUSINGACT</ITAG>9. The authority citation for Part 106 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>10. Section 106.1 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 106.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to establish procedures for public meetingsor conferences that may be used to assist the Assistant Secretary in achievingthe aims of the Fair Housing Act for the promotion and assurance of equalopportunity in housing with regard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap,familial status, or national origin, and, specifically, to carry out thoseresponsibilities delegated to him or her by the Secretary of Housing andUrban Development under sections 808(e)(1), (2), and (3), and 809 of theFair Housing Act.11. Section 106.2 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 106.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity in the Department of Housing and Urban Development.(b) ``Meeting'' means a public meeting or conference held under the authorityof the Fair Housing Act and this part.(c) ``Fair Housing Act'' means Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620.12. Part 109 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 109_FAIR HOUSING ADVERTISING</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.5 Policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.10 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.15 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.16 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.20 Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.25 Selective use of advertising media or content.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">109.30 Fair housing policy and practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Appendix I to Part 109_Fair Housing Advertising</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Policy.</ITAG>It is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutionallimitations, for fair housing throughout the United States. The provisionsof the Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620) make it unlawful to discriminatein the sale, rental, and financing of housing, and in the provision ofbrokerage and appraisal services, on account of race, color, religion,sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. Section 804(c) of theFair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3604(c), as amended, makes it unlawful to make,print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published, any notice,statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling,that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, oran intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination.However, the prohibitions of the act regarding familial status do not applywith respect to ``housing for older persons'', as defined in section 807(b)of the act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to assist all advertising media, advertisingagencies and all other persons who use advertising to make, print, or publish,or cause to be made, printed, or published, advertisements with respectto the sale, rental, or financing the dwellings which are in compliancewith the requirements of the Fair Housing Act. These regulations also describethe matters this Department will review in evaluating compliance with theFair Housing Act in connection with investigations of complaints allegingdiscriminatory housing practices involving advertising.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housingand Equal Opportunity.(b) ``Dwelling'' means any building, structure, or portion thereof whichis occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence byone or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale orlease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure,or portion thereof.(c) ``Family'' includes a single individual.(d) ``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor oganizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers,and fiduciaries.(e) ``To rent'' includes to lease, to sublease, to let and otherwise togrant for a consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by theoccupant.(f) ``Discriminatory housing practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersection 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Fair Housing Act.(g) ``Handicap'' means, with respect to a person_(1) A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or moreof such person's major life activities,(2) A record of having such an impairment, or (3) Being regarded as having such an impairment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction toa controlled substance (as defined in section 102 of the Controlled SubstancesAct (12 U.S.C. 802)). For purposes of this part, an individual shall notbe considered to have a handicap solely because that individual is a transvestite.(h) ``Familial status'' means one or more individuals (who have not attainedthe age of 18 years) being domiciled with_(1) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individualor individuals; or (2) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, withthe written permission of such parent or other person. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>This part describes the matters the Assistant Secretarywill review in evaluating compliance with the Fair Housing Act in connectionwith investigations of complaints alleging discriminatory housing practicesinvolving advertising. Use of these criteria will be considered by theAssistant Secretary in making determinations as to whether there is reasonablecause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred oris about to occur.(1) <T3>Advertising media. </T3>This part provides criteria for use by advertisingmedia in determining whether to accept and publish advertising regardingsales or rental transactions. Use of these criteria will be consideredby the Assistant Secretary in making determinations as to whether thereis reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or is about to occur.(2) <T3>Persons placing advertisements. </T3>A failure by persons placing advertisementsto comply with the provisions in this part, when found in connection withthe investigation of a compaint alleging the making or use of discriminatoryadvertisements, will be a basis for making a determination of reasonablecause to believe that a violation of section 804 has occurred or is aboutto occur.(b) <T3>Affirmative advertising efforts. </T3>Nothing in this part shall beconstrued to restrict advertising efforts designed to attract persons todwellings who would not ordinarily be expected to apply, when such effortsare pursuant to an affirmative marketing program or undertaken to remedythe effects of prior discrimination in connection with the advertisingor marketing of dwellings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of words, phrases, symbols, and visual aids.</ITAG>The following words, phrases, symbols, and forms typify those most oftenused in residential real estate advertising and convey either overt ortacit discriminatory intent. Their use should, therefore, be avoided inorder to eliminate their discriminatory effect. In considering a complaintunder the Fair Housing Act, the Assistant Secretary will normally considerthe use of these and comparable words, phrases, symbols, and forms to indicatea possible violation of the act and to establish a need for further proceedingson the complaint, if it is apparent from the context of the usage thatdiscrimination within the meaning of the act is likely to result.(a) <T3>Words descriptive of dwelling, landlord, and tenants. </T3>White privatehome, Colored home, Jewish home, Hispanic residence, adult building.(b) <T3>Words indicative of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.</T3>(1) <T3>Race</T3>_Negro, Black, Caucasin, Oriental, American Indian.(2) <T3>Color</T3>_White, Black, Colored.(3) <T3>Religion</T3>_Protestant, Christian, Catholic, Jew.(4) <T3>National origin</T3>_Mexican American, Puerto Rican, Philippine, Polish,Hungarian, Irish, Italian, Chicano, African, Hispanic, Chinese, Indian,Latino.(5) <T3>Sex</T3>_the exclusive use of words in advertisements, including thoseinvolving the rental of separate units in a single or multi-family dwelling,stating or tending to imply that the housing being advertised is availableto persons of only one sex and not the other, except where the sharingof living areas is involved. Nothing in this part shall restrict advertisementsof dwellings used exclusively for dormitory facilities by educational institutions.(6) <T3>Handicap</T3>_crippled, blind, deaf, mentally ill, retraded, impaired,handicapped, physically fit. Nothing in this part restricts the inclusionof information about the availability of accessible housing in advertisingof dwellings.(7) <T3>Familial status</T3>_adults, singles, mature persons. Nothing in thispart restricts advertisements of dwellings which are intended and operatedfor occupancy by older persons and which constitute ``housing for olderpersons'' as defined in Part 100 of this title.(8) <T3>Catch words</T3>_words such as restricted and exclusive should be avoided.Also, words and phrases used in a discriminatory context should be avoided,e.g., ``private'', ``integrated'', ``traditional'', ``board approval''or ``membership approval''.(c) <T3>Symbols or logotypes.</T3> Symbols or logotypes which imply or suggestrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.(d) <T3>Colloquialisms.</T3> Words or phrases used regionally or locally whichimply or suggest race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin.(e) <T3>Directions to real estate for sale or rent (use of maps or writteninstructions). </T3>Directions can imply a discriminatory preference, limitation,or exclusion. For example, references to real estate location made in termsof racial or national origin significant landmarks, such as an existingblack development (signal to blacks) or an existing development known forits inclusion of minorities (signal to whites) should not be used. Specificdirections which make reference to a racial or national origin significantarea may indicate a preference and should not be used. References to asynagogue, congregation or parish may also indicate a religious preferenceand should not be used.(f) <T3>Area (location) description. </T3>Names of facilities which cater toa particular racial, national origin or religious group such as countryclub or private school designations, or names of facilities which are usedexclusively by one sex, should not be used to describe an area.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selective use of advertising media or content.</ITAG>The selective use of advertising media or content when particular combinationsthereof are used exclusively with respect to various housing developmentsor sites can lead to discriminatory results and may indicate a violationof the Fair Housing Act. For example, the use of English language mediaalone or the exclusive use of media catering to the majority populationin an area, when, in such area, there are also available non-English languageor other minority media, may have discriminatory impact. Similarly, theselective use of human models in advertisements may have discriminatoryimpact. The following are examples of the selective use of advertisementswhich may be discriminatory:(a) <T3>Selective geographic advertisements. </T3>Such selective use may involvethe strategic placement of billboards; brochure advertisements distributedwithin a limited geographic area by hand or in the mail; advertising inparticular geographic coverage editions of major metropolitan newspapersor in newspapers of limited circulation which are mainly advertising vehiclesfor reaching a particular segment of the community; or displays or announcementsavailable only in selected sales offices.(b) <T3>Selective use of equal opportunity slogan or logo. </T3>When placingadvertisements, such selective use may involve placing the equal housingopportunity slogan or logo in advertising reaching some geographic areas,but not others, or with respect to some properties but not others.(c) <T3>Selective use of human models when conducting an advertising campaign.</T3>Selective advertising may involve an advertising campaign using humanmodels primarily in media that cater to one racial or national origin segmentof the population without a complementary advertising campaign that isdirected at other groups. Another example may involve use of racially mixedmodels by a developer to advertise one development and not others. Similarcare must be exercised in advertising in publications or other media directedat one particular sex, or at persons without children. Such selective advertisingmay involve the use of human models of members of only one sex, or of adultsonly, in displays, photographs or drawings to indicate preferences forone sex or the other, or for adults to the exclusion of children.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fair Housing policy and practices.</ITAG>In the investigation of complaints, the Assistant Secretary will considerthe implementation of fair housing policies and practices provided in thissection as evidence of compliance with the prohibitions against discriminationin advertising under the Fair Housing Act.(a) <T3>Use of Equal Housing Opportunity logotype, statement, or slogan. </T3>Alladvertisng of residential real estate for sale, rent, or financing shouldcontain an equal housing opportunity logotype, statement, or slogan asa means of educating the homeseeking public that the property is availableto all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin. The choice of logotype, statement or sloganwill depend on the type of media used (visual or auditory) and, in spaceadvertising, on the size of the advertisement. Table I (see appendix) indicatessuggested use of the logotype, statement, or slogan and size of logotype.Table II (see appendix) contains copies of the suggested Equal HousingOpportunity logotype, statement and slogan.(b) <T3>Use of human models. </T3>Human models in photographs, drawings, orother graphic techniques may not be used to indicate exclusiveness on thebasis of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or nationalorigin. If models are used in display advertising campaigns, the modelsshould be clearly definable as reasonably representing majority and minoritygroups in the metropolitan area, both sexes, and, when appropriate, familieswith children. Models, if used, should portray persons in an equal socialsetting and indicate to the general public that the housing is open toall without regard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status,or national origin, and is not for the exclusive use of one such group.(c) <T3>Coverage of local laws. </T3>Where the Equal Housing Opportunity statementis used, the advertisement may also include a statement regarding the coverageof any local fair housing or human rights ordinance regarding discriminationin the sale, rental or financing of dwellings.(d) <T3>Notification of fair housing_</T3>(1) <T3>Employees. </T3>All publishers of advertisements, advertising agencies,and firms engaged in the sale, rental or financing of real estate shouldprovide a printed copy of their nondiscriminatory policy to each employeeand officer.(2) <T3>Clients. </T3>All publishers of advertisements and advertising agenciesshould post a copy of their nondiscrimination policy in a conspicuous locationwherever persons place advertising and should have copies available forall firms and persons using their advertising services.(3) <T3>Publishers' notice. </T3>All publishers should publish at the beginningof the real estate advertising section a notice such as that appearingin Table III (see appendix). The notice can include a statement regardingthe coverage of any local fair housing or human rights ordinance regardingdiscrimination in the sale, rental or financing of dwellings.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix I to Part 109_Fair Housing Advertising</ITAG>The following three tables may serve as a guide for the use of the EqualHousing Opportunity logotype, statement, slogan, and publisher's noticefor advertising:<ITAG tagnum="84">Table I</ITAG>A simple formula can guide the real estate advertiser in using the EqualHousing Opportunity logotype, statement, or slogan.In all space advertising (advertising in regularly printed media such asnewspapers or magazines) the following standards should be used:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Size of advertisement </H1><H1>Size of logotype in inches</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">\1/2\ page or larger<D>2 x 2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">\1/8\ page up to \1/2\ page<D>1 x 1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 column inches to \1/8\ page<D>\1/2\ x \1/2\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Less than 4 column inches <D>(\1\)</D><F>\1\ Do not use.</F></ITAG></ITAG>In any other advertisements, if other logotypes are used in the advertisement,then the Equal Housing Opportunity logo should be of a size at least equalto the largest of the other logotypes; if no other logotypes are used,then the type should be bold display face which is clearly visible. Alternatively,when no other logotypes are used, 3 to 5 percent of an advertisement maybe devoted to a statement of the equal housing opportunity policy.In space advertising which is less that 4 column inches (one column 4 incheslong or two columns 2 inches long) of a page in size, the Equal HousingOpportunity slogan should be used. Such advertisements may be grouped withother advertisements under a caption which states that the housing is availableto all without regard to race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familialstatus, or national origin.<ITAG tagnum="84">Table II</ITAG>Illustrations of Logotype, Statement, and Slogan. Equal Housing OpportunityLogotype:<G/><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus 295A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/>Equal Housing Opportunity Statement: We are pledged to the letter and spiritof U.S. policy for the achievement of equal housing opportunity throughoutthe Nation. We encourage and support an affirmative advertising and marketingprogram in which there are no barriers to obtaining housing because ofrace, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.Equal Housing Opportunity Slogan: ``Equal Housing Opportunity.''<ITAG tagnum="84">Table III</ITAG>Illustration of Media Notice_Publisher's notice: All real estate advertisedherein is subject to the Federal Fair Housing Act, which makes it illegalto advertise ``any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin, orintention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination.''We will not knowingly accept any advertising for real estate which is inviolation of the law. All persons are hereby informed that all dwellingsadvertised are available on an equal opportunity basis.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 110_FAIR HOUSING POSTER</ITAG>13. The authority citation for Part 110 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>14. Section 110.1 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The regulations set forth in this part contain the procedures establishedby the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development with respect to the displayof a fair housing poster by persons subject to sections 804 through 806of the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 3604-3606.15. In andSection; 110.5, paragraphs (b), (e), (g) and (h) would be revisedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) ``Discriminatory housing practice'' means an act that is unlawful undersections 804, 805, 806, or 818 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) ``Person'' includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees,trustees in cases under Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers andfiduciaries.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) ``Fair housing poster'' means the poster prescribed by the Secretaryfor display by persons subject to sections 804 through 806 of the Act.(h) ``The Act'' means the Fair Housing Act (The Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988), 42 U.S.C. 3600-3620.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>16. In andSection; 110.10, paragraph (a) introductory text and paragraph(c) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Persons subject.</ITAG>(a) Except to the extent that paragraph (b) of this section applies, allpersons subject to section 804 of the Act, Discrimination in the Sale orRental of Housing and Other Prohibited Practices, shall post and maintaina fair housing poster as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) All persons subject to section 805 of the Act, Discrimination In ResidentialReal Estate-Related Transactions shall post and maintain a fair housingposter at all their places of business which participate in the coveredactivities.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>17. Section 110.15 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Location of posters.</ITAG>All fair housing posters shall be prominently displayed so as to be readilyapparent to all persons seeking housing accommodations or seeking to engagein residential real estate-related transactions or brokerage services ascontemplated by sections 804 through 806 of the Act.18. In andSection; 110.25, paragraph (a) would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 110.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Description of posters.</ITAG>(a) The fair housing poster shall be 11 inches by 14 inches and shall bearthe following legend: <G/><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus 299A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/><ITAG tagnum="71">Equal Housing Opportunity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We do business in accordance with the Fair Housing Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(The Civil Rights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing AmendmentsAct of 1988.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">It is illegal to discriminate against any person because of race,color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status or national origin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the sale or rental of housing or residential lots.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In advertising the sale or rental of housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the financing of housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the appraisal of housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the provision of real estate brokerage services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Blockbusting is also illegal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Anyone who feels he or she has been discriminated against should senda complaint to:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, Assistant Secretaryfor Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity, Washington, DC 20410.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Toll free numbers for filing complaints are: 1-800-424-8590 1-800-543-8294(TDD) or HUD Region or [Area Office stamp]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>19. Part 115 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 115_CERTIFICATION OF SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT AGENCIES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.2 Basis of determination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.3 Criteria for adequacy of law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.3a Criteria for adequacy of law_discrimination because of handicap.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.4 Performance standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.5 Request for certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.6 Procedure for certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.7 Denial of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.8 Withdrawal of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.9 Conferences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.10 Consequences of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">115.11 Interim referrals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>(a) Section 810(f) of the Fair Housing Act, (The Civil Rights Act of 1968,as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (the Act) providesthat: whenever a complaint alleges a discriminatory housing practice withinthe jurisdiction of a State or local public agency that has been certifiedby the Secretary as substantially equivalent, the Secretary shall referthe complaint to that certified agency before taking any action with respectto the complaint. Except with the consent of the certified agency, theSecretary, after referral is made, shall take no further action with respectto the complaint unless:(1) The certified agency has failed to commence proceedings with respectto the complaint before the end of the 30th day after the date of referral;(2) The certified agency, having commenced proceedings, fails to carryforward proceedings with reasonable promptness; or (3) The Secretary determines that the certified agency no longer qualifiesfor certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Secretary has delegated the exercise of functions and duties undersection 810(f) of the Act to the Assistant Secretary for Fair Housing andEqual Opportunity (the Assistant Secretary).(b) The purpose of this part is to set forth:(1) The basis for agency certification.(2) The procedure by which a determination to certify is made by the AssistantSecretary.(3) The basis and procedure for withdrawal of certification.(4) The consequences of certification.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis of determination.</ITAG>A determination to certify an agency as substantially equivalent involvesa two-phase procedure. The determination requires examination and an affirmativeconclusion by the Assistant Secretary on two separate inquiries:(a) Whether the law, administered by the agency, on its face, providesthat:(1) The substantive rights protected by the agency in the jurisdictionwith respect to which certification is to be made;(2) The procedures followed by the agency;(3) The remedies available to the agency; and(4) The availability of judicial review of the agency's actions; are substantiallyequivalent to those created by and under the act; and(b) whether the current practices and past performance of the agency demonstratethat, in operation, the law in fact provides rights and remedies whichare substantially equivalent to those provided in the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for adequacy of law.</ITAG>(a) In order for a determination to be made that a State or local fairhousing agency administers a law which, on its face, provides rights andremedies for alleged discriminatory housing practices that are substantiallyequivalent to those provided in the Act, the law or ordinance must:(1) Provide for an administrative enforcement body to receive and processcomplaints and provide that:(i) Complaints must be in writing;(ii) Upon the filing of a complaint the agency shall serve notice uponthe complainant acknowledging the filing and advising the complainant ofthe time limits and choice of forums provided under the law;(iii) Upon the filing of a complaint the agency shall promptly serve noticeon the respondent or person charged with the commission of a discriminatoryhousing practice advising of his or her procedural rights and obligationsunder the law or ordinance together with a copy of the complaint;(iv) A respondent may file an answer to a complaint.(2) Delegate to the administrative enforcement body comprehensive authority,including subpoena power, to investigate the allegations of complaints,and power to conciliate complaint matters, and require that:(i) The agency commence proceedings with respect to the complaint beforethe end of the 30th day after receipt of the complaint;(ii) The agency investigate the allegations of the complaint and completethe investigation in no more than 100 days after receipt of the complaint;(iii) If the agency is unable to complete the investigation within 100days it shall notify the complainant and respondent in writing of the reasonsfor not doing so;(iv) The agency make final administrative disposition of a complaint withinone year of the date of receipt of a complaint, unless it is impracticalto do so. If the agency is unable to do so it shall notify the complainantand respondent, in writing, of the reasons for not doing so;(v) Any concilation agreement arising out of conciliation efforts by theagency shall be an agreement between the respondent and the complainantand shall be subject to the approval of the agency;(vi) Each conciliation agreement shall be made public unless the complainantand respondent otherwise agree and the agency determines that disclosureis not required to further the purposes of the law or ordinance.(3) Not place any excessive burdens on the complainant that might discouragethe filing of complaints, such as:(i) A provision that a complaint must be filed within any period of timeless than 180 days after an alleged discriminatory housing practice hasoccurred or terminated;(ii) Anti-testing provisions;(iii) Provisions that could subject a complainant to costs, criminal penaltiesor fees in connection with filing of complaints.(4) Not contain exemptions that substantially reduce the coverage of housingaccommodations as compared to section 803 of the Act (which provides coveragewith respect to all dwellings except, under certain circumstances, singlefamily homes sold or rented by the owner and units in owner-occupied dwellingscontaining living quarters for no more than four families).(5) Be sufficiently comprehensive in its prohibitions to be an effectiveinstrument in carrying out and achieving the intent and purposes of theAct, <T3>i.e., </T3>prohibit the following acts:(i) Refusal to sell or rent based on discrimination because of race, color,religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(ii) Refusal to negotiate for a sale or rental based on discriminationbecause of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(iii) Otherwise making available or denying a dwelling based on discriminationbecause of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(iv) Discriminating in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale orrental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities inconnection therewith, based on discrimination because of race, color, religion,sex, familial status, or national origin;(v) Advertising in a manner that indicates any preference, limitation,or discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status,or national origin;(vi) Falsely representing that a dwelling is not available for inspection,sale, or rental because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status,or national origin;(vii) Coercion, intimidation, threats, or interference with any personin the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his or her having exercisedor enjoyed, or on account of his or her having aided or encouraged anyother person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right granted or protectedby section 803, 804, 805, or 806 of the Act;(viii) Blockbusting based on representations regarding the entry or prospectiveentry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin;(ix) Discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions byproviding that: It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whosebusiness includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactionsto discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction,or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction, because of race, color,religion, sex, familial status, or national origin. Such transactions include:(A) The making or purchasing of loans or the provision of other financialassistance for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaininga dwelling; or the making or purchasing of loans or the provision of otherfinancial assistance secured by residential real estate; or(B) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property;(x) Denying a person access to, or membership or participation in, a multiplelisting service, real estate brokers' organization, or other service onaccount of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin.(b) In addition to the factors described in paragraph (a) of this section,the provisions of the State or local law must afford administrative andjudicial protection and enforcement of the rights embodied in the law.(1) The agency must have authority to:(i) Seek prompt judicial action for appropriate temporary or preliminaryrelief pending final disposition of a complaint if the agency concludesthat such action is necessary to carry out the purposes of the law or ordinance;(ii) Issue subpoenas;(iii) Grant actual damages, or arrange to have adjudicated in court atagency expense the award of actual damages, to an aggrieved person;(iv) Grant injunctive or other equitable relief;(v) Assess a civil penalty against the respondent, or arrange to have adjudicatedin court at agency expense the award of punitive damages against the respondent.(2) Agency actions must be subject to judicial review upon applicationby any party aggrieved by a final agency order.(3) Judicial review of a final agency order must be in a court with authorityto grant to the petitioner, or to any other party, such temporary relief,restraining order, or other order as the court determines is just and proper;affirm, modify, or set aside, in whole or in part, the order or remandthe order for further proceedings; and enforce the order to the extentthat the order is affirmed or modified. (c) The requirement that the State or local law prohibit discriminationon the basis of familial status does not require that the State or locallaw limit the applicability of any reasonable local, State, or Federalrestrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupya dwelling. (d) The State or local law must assure that no prohibition based on discriminationbecause of familial status applies to housing for older persons substantiallyas described in Part 100 Subpart E. (e) A determination of the adequacy of a State or local fair housing law``on its face'' is intended to focus on the meaning and intent of the textof the law, as distinguished from the effectiveness of its administration.Accordingly, this determination is not limited to an analysis of the literaltext of the law but must take into account such relevant matters of Stateof local law, e.g., regulations, directives and rule of procedure, or interpretationsof the fair housing law by competent authorities, as may be necessary.(f) A law will be held to be not adequate ``on its face'' if it permitsany of the agency's decision making authority to be contracted out or delegatedto a non-governmental authority. For the purposes of this paragrpah, ``decisionmaking authority'' shall include: (1) Acceptance of the complaint; (2) Approval of the concliliation agreement; (3) Dismissal of a complaint; (4) Any action specified in andSection; 115.3(a)(2)(iv) or andSection; 115.3(b)(1).(g) Provide for civil enforcement of the law or ordinance by an aggrievedperson by the commencement of an action in an appropriate court not lessthan 1 year after the occurrence or termination of an alleged discriminatoryhousing practice. The court should be empowered to: (1) Award the plaintiff actual and puntitive damages; (2) Grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any temporary or permanentinjunction, temporary restraining order or other order; (3) allow reasonable attorney's fees and costs. <ITAG tagnum="80">115.3a </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for adequacy of law_discrimination because of handicap. </ITAG>(a) In addition to the provisions of andSection; 115.3, in order for a determinationto be made that a State or local fair housing agency administers a lawwhich, on its face provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatoryhousing practices, based on handicap, that are substantially equivalentto those provided in the Act, the law or ordinance must be sufficientlycomprehensive in its prohibitions to be an effective instrument in carryingout and achieving the intent and purposes of the Act, <T3>i.e., </T3>it must prohibit the following acts: (1) Advertising in a manner that indicates any preference, limitation,or discrimination because of handicap; (2) Falsely representing that a dwelling is not available for inspection,sales, or rental based on discrimination because of handicap; (3) Blockbusting, based on representations regarding the entry or prospectiveentry into the neighborhood of a person or persons with a particular handicap;(4) Discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions by providingthat: It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose businessincludes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminateagainst any person in making available such a transaction, or in the termsand conditions of such a transaction, because of handicap. Residentialand real estate-related transactions include: (i) The making or purchasing of loans or the provision of other financialassistance for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaininga dwelling; or the making or purchasing of loans or the provision of otherfinancial assistance secured by residential real estate; or (ii) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property;(5) Denying a person access to, or membership or participation in, multiplelisting services, real estate brokers' organizations, or other servicesbecause of handicap;(6) Discrimination in the sale or rental, or otherwise making unavailableor denying, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a handicap ofthat buyer or renter, or of a person residing in or intending to residein that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available, or of anyperson associated with the buyer or renter;(7) Discrimination against any person in the terms, conditions, or privilegesof sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilitiesin connection with the dwelling, because of a handicap of that person,of a person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after itis sold, rented, or made available, or of any person associated with thatperson.(b) For purposes of this section, discrimination includes_(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the handicapped person, reasonablemodifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by the handicappedperson, if the modifications may be necessary to afford the handicappedperson full enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a rental,the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permissionfor a modification on the renter's agreeing to restore the interior ofthe premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonablewear and tear excepted;(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices,or services, when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a handicappedperson equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamilydwellings for first occpancy after March 31, 1991, a failure to designand construct dwellings in such a manner that_(i) The dwellings have at least one building entrance on an accessibleroute, unless it is impractical to do so because of the terrain or unusualcharacteristics of the site;(ii) With respect to dwellings with a building entrance on a accessibleroute_(A) The public use and common use portions of the dwellings are readilyaccessible to and usable by handicapped persons;(B) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premisesare sufficiently wide to allow passage by handicapped persons in wheelchairs;and(C) All premises within covered multifamily dwelling units contain an accessibleroute into and through the dwelling; light switches, electrical outlets,thermostats, and other environmental controls in accessible locations;reinforcements in the bathroom walls to allow later installation of grabbars; and usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchaircan maneuver about the space.(c) The law or ordinance administered by the State or local fair housingagency may provide that compliance with the appropriate requirements ofthe American National Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibilityand usability for physically handicapped people (commonly cited as ``ANSIA117.1'') suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b)(3)(ii)(C).(d) As used in this section, the term ``covered multifamily dwellings''means buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings haveone or more elevators and ground floor units in other buildings consistingof four or more units.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance standards.</ITAG>(a) The initial and continued certification that a State or local fairhousing law provides rights and remedies substantially equivalent to thoseprovided in the Act will be dependent upon an assessment of the currentpractices and past performance of the appropriate State or local agencycharged with administration and enforcement of the law to determine that,in operation, the law is in fact providing substantially equivalent rightsand remedies. The performance standards set forth in paragraph (b) of thissection will be used in making this assessment.(b) A State or local agency must:(1) Engage in comprehensive and thorough investigative activities; and(2) Commence proceedings with respect to a complaint before the end ofthe 30th day after the receipt of the complaint, carry forward proceedingswith reasonable promptness, and in accordance with the memorandum of understandingdescribed in 24 CFR 111.104(a)(2), make final administrative dispositionof a complaint within one year of the date of receipt of the complaintand, within 100 days of receipt of the complaint, complete the followingproceedings:(i) Investigation, including the preparation of a final investigation reportcontaining_(A) The names and dates of contacts with witnesses;(B) A summary and dates of correspondence and other contacts with the aggrievedperson and the respondent;(C) A summary description of other pertinent records;(D) A summary of witness statements; and(E) Answers to interrogatories.(ii) Conciliation activity.(3) Conduct compliance reviews of all settlements, conciliation agreementsand orders issued by or entered into to resolve discriminatory housingpractices.(4) Consistently and affirmatively seek and obtain the type of relief designedto prevent recurrences of such practices;(5) Consistently and affirmatively seek the elimination of all prohibitedpractices under its fair housing law;(c) Where the State or local agency has duties and responsibilities inaddition to administration of the fair housing law, the Assistant Secretarymay consider such matters as the relative priority given to fair housingadministration, as compared to such other duties and responsibilities,and the compatibility or potential conflict of fair housing objectiveswith the agency's other duties and responsibilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for certification.</ITAG>(a) A request for certification under this part may be filed with the AssistantSecretary by the State or local official having principal responsibilityfor administration of the State or local fair housing law. The requestshall be supported by the following materials and information:(1) The text of the jurisdiction's fair housing law, the law creating andempowering the agency, any regulations and directives issued under thelaw, and any formal opinions of the State Attorney General or the chieflegal officer of the jurisdiction that pertain to the jurisdiction's fairhousing law.(2) Organization of the agency responsible for administering and enforcingthe law.(3) Funding and personnel made available to the agency for administrationand enforcement of the fair housing law during the current operating year,and not less than the preceding three operating years (or such lesser numberduring which the law was in effect).(4) Data demonstrating that the agency's current practices and past performancecomply with the performance standards described in andSection; 115.4.(5) Any additional information which the submitting official may wish tobe considered.(b) The request and supporting materials shall be filed with the AssistantSecretary for Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity, Department of Housingand Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410. Acopy of the request and supporting materials will be kept available forpublic examination and copying at: (1) The office of the Assistant Secretary,(2) the HUD Regional Office in whose jurisdiction the State or local jurisdictionseeking recognition is located, and (3) the office of the State or localagency charged with administration and enforcement of the State or locallaw.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure for certification.</ITAG>(a) Upon receipt of a request for certification filed under andSection; 115.5,the Assistant Secretary may request further information that he or sheconsiders relevant to the determinations required to be made under thispart.(b) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection;andSection; 115.3 and 115.3a that the State or localfair housing law, on its face, provides rights and remedies for allegeddiscriminatory housing practices which are substantially equivalent tothe rights and remedies provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shallinform the submitting State or local official in writing of that determination.Except under circumstances where the Assistant Secretary determines thatinterim referrals or other utilization of services under andSection; 115.11is appropriate, the Assistant Secretary shall publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> which advises the public of the determinationthat the law, on its face, is substantially equivalent, and shall inviteinterested persons and organizations, during a period of not less than30 days following publication of the notice, to file written comments relevantto the determination whether the current practices and past performanceof the State or local agency charged with administration and enforcementof such law demonstrates that, in operation, the State or local law infact provides rights and remedies which are substantially equivalent tothose provided in the Act. The <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice shall also invite comments on the Department'sdetermination as to the adequacy of the law on its face.(c) If the Assistant Secretary determines, on the basis of the standardsspecified in andSection; 115.4 and after considering the materials and informationsubmitted pursuant to andSection; 115.5, additional material obtained underparagraph (a) of this section, and any written comments filed under paragraph(b) of this section, that, in operation, a State or local fair housinglaw in fact provides rights and remedies which are substantially equivalentto those provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall offer to enterinto a written agreement with the appropriate State or local agency providingfor referral of complaints to the agency and for procedures for communicationbetween the agency and HUD that are adequate to permit the Assistant Secretaryto monitor the continuing substantial equivalency of the State or locallaw. The written agreement may, but need not, be incorporated in a Memorandumof Understanding as described in 24 CFR 111.104(a)(2). Upon execution ofa satisfactory agreement, the Assistant Secretary shall publish noticeof certification under this part in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>(d) During the period which begins on September 13, 1988 and ends January13, 1992, each State or locality recognized as substantially equivalentunder 24 CFR Part 115 (including any State or locality which had enteredinto an agreement for interim referrals under andSection; 115.11, unlessthe State or locality is subsequently denied recognition under 24 CFR 115.7)for the purposes of the Fair Housing Act before September 13, 1988 shall,for the purposes of this paragraph (d), be considered certified under thispart with respect to those matters for which the agency was previouslyrecognized. If the Secretary determines in an individual case that a Stateor locality has not been able to meet the certification requirements withinthis 40-month period because of exceptional circumstances (such as theinfrequency of legislative sessions in that jurisdiction), the Secretarymay extend the period of temporary certification to no later than September13, 1992.(1) No State, locality or agency thereof shall be considered certifiedunder this paragraph (d) for the purpose of processing complaints alleging_(i) Discrimination based on familial status;(ii) Discrimination based on handicap; or(iii) Coercion, intimidation or threats as described in andSection; 115.3(a)(5)(vii).(2) Certification under this paragraph (d) is not a determination thatthe administrative or judicial remedies provided by the State or localityis substantially equivalent to those provided by the Act.(e) Certification of a State or local fair housing agency under this partshall remain in effect until withdrawn under andSection; 115.8.(f) Not less frequently than annually, the Assistant Secretary will causeto be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice which sets forth:(1) An updated, consolidated list of all certified agencies;(2) A list of all agencies whose certification under this part has beenwithdrawn since publication of the previous notice;(3) A list of agencies with respect to which notice of denial of certificationhas been published under andSection; 115.7(c) since issuance of the previousnotice;(4) A list of agencies with respect to which a notice for comment has beenpublished under paragraph (b) of this section whose request for certificationremains pending.(5) A list of agencies for which notice of proposed withdrawal of certificationhas been published under andSection; 115.8(c) whose proposed withdrawal remainspending; and(6) A list of agencies with which an agreement for interim referrals orother utilization of services has been entered under andSection; 115.11 andremains in effect.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Denial of certification.</ITAG>(a) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection;andSection; 115.3 and 115.3a, that a State or localfair housing law, on its face, fails to provide rights and remedies foralleged discriminatory housing practices which are substantially equivalentto the rights and remedies provided in the Act, the Assistant Secretaryshall inform the submitting State or local official in writing of the reasonsfor that determination. The Assistant Secretary's advice may include specificationof the manner in which the State or local law could be amended in orderto provide substantially equivalent rights and remedies. The AssistantSecretary shall extend to the State or local official an opportunity tosubmit data, views, and arguments in opposition to the Assistant Secretary'sdetermination and to request an opportunity for a conference in accordancewith andSection; 115.9. If no submission or request is made, no further actionshall be required to be taken by the Assistant Secretary. If the Stateor local official submits materials but does not request a conference,the Assistant Secretary shall evaluate any arguments in opposition or othermaterials received from the State or local agency. If, after the evaluation,the Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that the law, on its face,fails to provide rights and remedies for allegedly discriminatory housingpractices that are substantially equivalent to the rights and remediesprovided in the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the submittingState or local official in writing that certification is denied.(b) If the Assistant Secretary determines, after considering the materialsand information submitted under andSection; 115.5, any additional informationobtained under andSection; 115.6(a), an assessment of the current practicesand past performance of the agency in meeting the standards of andSection;115.4(b), and any written comments received under andSection; 115.6(b), thatit has not been demonstrated that, in operation, a State or local fairhousing agency in fact provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatoryhousing practices which are substantially equivalent to those providedin the Act, the Assistant Secretary shall communicate this determinationin writing to the State or local agency and shall allow the agency notless than 15 days to submit data, views, and arguments in opposition andto request an opportunity for a conference in accordance with andSection;115.9. If a request for a conference is not received within the time provided,the Assistant Secretary shall evaluate any arguments in opposition or othermaterials received from the State or local agency and, if after that evaluationthe Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that certification shouldbe denied, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the submitting State orlocal official in writing that certification is denied.(c) Where comment on a request for certification was invited in accordancewith andSection; 115.6(b), notice of denial of certification under this sectionshall be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal of certification.</ITAG>(a) Not less frequently than every 5 years, the Assistant Secretary shalldetermine whether each agency certified under this part continues to qualifyfor certification. The Assistant Secretary shall take appropriate actionwith respect to any agency not so qualifying.(b) The Assistant Secretary shall periodically review the administrationof fair housing laws recognized under this part. If the Assistant Secretaryfinds, as a result of a periodic review, upon the petition of an interestedperson or organization, or otherwise, that taken as a whole, the agency'sadministration of its fair housing law or the law, on its face, no longermeets the requirements of this part, the Assistant Secretary shall proposeto withdraw the certification previously granted.(c) The Assistant Secretary shall propose withdrawal of certification unlessreview establishes that the current fair housing law administered by thecertified agency meets the criteria of andSection; 115.3 and that currentpractices and past performance of the agency meet the standards of andSection;115.4.(d) Before the Assistant Secretary publishes notice of a proposed withdrawalof certification, the Assistant Secretary shall inform the State or localagency in writing of his or her intention to withdraw certification. Thecommunication shall state the reasons for the proposed withdrawal and providethe agency not less than 15 days to submit data, views, and arguments inopposition and to request an opportunity for a conference in accordancewith andSection; 115.9.(e) Notice of a proposed withdrawal shall be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The notice shall allow the State or local agencyand other interested persons and organizations not less than 30 days inwhich to file written comments on the proposal.(f) If a request for a conference in accordance with andSection; 115.9 isnot received within the time provided, the Assistant Secretary shall evaluateany arguments in opposition or other materials received from the Stateor local agency and other interested persons or organizations, and if afterthat evaluation the Assistant Secretary is still of the opinion that certificationshould be withdrawn, the Assistant Secretary shall withdraw certificationand shall publish notice of the withdrawal in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conferences.</ITAG>(a) Whenever an opportunity for a conference is timely requested by a Stateor local agency in accordance with andSection; 115.7 or andSection; 115.8,the Assistant Secretary shall issue an order designating an officer whoshall preside at the conference. The order shall indicate the issues tobe resolved and any initial procedural instructions that might be appropriatefor a particular conference. It shall fix the date, time and place of theconference. The date shall not be less than 20 days after the date of theorder. The date and place shall be subject to change for good cause.(b) A copy of the order shall be served on the State or local agency and:(1) In the case of a denial of certification, on any person or organizationthat files a written comment in accordance with andSection; 115.6(b); or(2) In the case of a withdrawal of certification, on any person or organizationthat files a petition in accordance with andSection; 115.8(a) or writtencomment in accordance with andSection; 115.8(c).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The agency and all such persons and organizations shall be consideredto be participants in the conference. After service of the order designatingthe conference officer, and until the officer submits a recommended determination,all communications relating to the subject matter of the conference shallbe addressed to that officer.(c) The conference officer shall have full authority to regulate the courseand conduct of the conference. A transcript shall be made of the proceedingsat the conference. The transcript and all comments and petitions relatingto the proceedings shall be made available for inspection by interestedpersons.(d) The conference officer shall prepare proposed findings and a recommendeddetermination, a copy of which shall be served on each participant. Within20 days after service, any participant may file written exceptions. Afterthe expiration of the period for filing exceptions, the conference officershall certify the entire record, including the proposed findings and recommendeddetermination, and any exceptions to the findings and recommendations,to the Assistant Secretary, who shall review the record and issue a finaldetermination within 30 days. Where applicable, this determination shallbe published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consequences of certification.</ITAG>(a) Where all alleged violations of the Act contained in a complaint receivedby the Assistant Secretary appear to constitute violations of a State orlocal fair housing law administered by an agency that has been certifiedas substantially equivalent, the complaint shall be referred promptly tothe appropriate State or local agency, and no further action shall be takenby the Assistant Secretary with respect to such complaint, except as providedfor by the Act, this part, and by andSection;andSection; 103.100 through 103.115or 105.20 through 105.22 of this chapter.(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this section, no complaint based inwhole or in part on allegations of discrimination on the basis of familialstatus or handicap shall be referred to any State, locality or agency thereofwhose certification was granted in accordance with andSection; 115.6(d) orsection 810(f)(4) of the Act, without regard to whether the fair housinglaw administered by such certified agency appears to prohibit discriminationbased on familial status or handicap.(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this section, whenever the Secretaryhas reason to believe that a complaint shows a basis may exist for thecommencement of proceedings against any respondent under section 814(a)of the Act, or for proceedings by any governmental licensing or supervisoryauthorities, the Secretary shall transmit the information upon which thatbelief is based to the Attorney General, or to appropriate governmentallicensing or supervisory authorities. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 115.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interim referrals. </ITAG>If the Assistant Secretary determines after application of the criteriaset forth in andSection; 115.3, that a State or local fair housing law onits face provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatory housingpractices which are substantially equivalent to those provided in the Act,but that the law has not been in effect, or the appropriate State or localagency in operation, for a sufficient time to permit a demonstration ofcompliance with the performance standards described in andSection; 115.4,the Assistant Secretary may enter into a written agreement with the Stateor local agency providing for referral of complaints to the agency on suchterms and conditions as the Assistant Secretary shall prescribe, or providingfor other utilization of the services of the State or local agency andits employees upon agreed terms, and providing further for procedures forcommunications between the agency and HUD that are adequate to permit theAssistant Secretary to monitor the agency's administration and enforcementof its law and to assist the Assistant Secretary in making the determinationrequired in andSection; 115.2(b). The agreement may provide for reactivationof referred complaints by the Assistant Secretary without regard to thelimitations described in andSection; 115.10. If such an agreement for interimreferrals or other utilization of services is entered, the Assistant Secretarymay defer final determination under andSection; 115.6 or andSection; 115.7for a reasonable period determined by the Assistant Secretary to be necessaryin order to permit a fair assessment of the agency's performance. In noevent shall this period extend more than two years beyond the date of entryinto the agreement for interim referrals or other utilization of services.This two year limitation does not apply to agencies certified in accordancewith andSection; 115.6(d). However, an agreement under this section shallnot be extended beyond the date of certification under andSection; 115.6or denial of recognition under andSection; 115.7. Notice of entry into anagreement under this section shall be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. 20. PART 121, redesignated from Part 100, would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 121_COLLECTION OF DATA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">121.1 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">121.2 Furnishing of data by program participants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3600-3620);E.O. 11063, 27 FR 11527; sec. 602, Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.2000d-1); sec. 562, Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (42 U.S.C.3608a); sec. 2, National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1703; sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act, 42 U.S.C. 3535(d). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 121.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose </ITAG>The purpose of this part is to enable the Secretary of Housing and UrbanDevelopment to carry out his or her responsibilities under the Fair HousingAct, Executive Order 11063, dated November 20, 1962, Title VI of the CivilRights Act of 1964, and section 562 of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1987. These authorities prohibit discrimination in housing and inprograms receiving financial assistance from the Department of Housingand Urban Development, and they direct the Secretary to administer theDepartment's housing and urban development programs and activities in amanner affirmatively to further these policies and to collect certain datato assess the extent of compliance with these policies. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 121.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Furnishing of data by program participants. </ITAG>Participants in the programs administered by the Department shall furnishto the Department such data concerning the race, color, religion, sex,national origin, age, handicap, and family characteristics of persons andhouseholds who are applicants for, participants in, or beneficiaries orpotential beneficiaries of, those programs as the Secretary may determineto be necessary or appropriate to enable the Secretary to carry out hisor her responsibilities under the authorities referred to in andSection;121.1. Specific requirements for furnishing such data are imposed underthe individual program regulations contained under this Title 24.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: October 31, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel R. Pierce, Jr., </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-25506 Filed 11-4-88; 8:45] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-28-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>